Nevada, session 83, AB74.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 57 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 to 12,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 3. “Desk examination” means a targeted examination
that is conducted at a location other than the office of the insurer
or the location at which the records under review are stored.
Sec. 4. “Market analysis” means the process required by
sections 27 and 28 of this act whereby the Commissioner and
market conduct surveillance personnel collect and analyze
information to develop a baseline understanding of the
marketplace and to identify patterns or practices of insurers that
deviate significantly from the norm or that may pose a potential
risk to a consumer of insurance.
Sec. 5. 1. “Market conduct action” means any action that
the Commissioner may initiate to assess and address the market
practices of an insurer, including, without limitation, market
analysis, a targeted examination and any other action described in
section 30 of this act.
2. The term does not include any action by the Commissioner
to resolve any individual complaint of a consumer or other report
or a specific instance of misconduct.
Sec. 6. “Market conduct surveillance personnel” means any
person employed by or contracted with by the Commissioner to
-
*AB74*

– 7 –
collect, analyze, review or act on information in the insurance
marketplace that identifies patterns or practices of insurers.
Sec. 7. “Market conduct uniform examination procedures”
means the most recent set of guidelines, developed and adopted by
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, to be used
by market conduct surveillance personnel in conducting an
examination.
Sec. 8. “Market Regulation Handbook” means the most
recent handbook, developed and adopted by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, which:
1. Outlines the elements and objectives of market analysis
and the process by which states can establish and implement
programs of market analysis; and
2. Sets forth guidelines which document established practices
to be used by market conduct surveillance personnel in developing
and executing an examination.
Sec. 9. “On-site examination” means a targeted examination
that is conducted at the office of the insurer or the location at
which the records under review are stored.
Sec. 10. “Standardized Data Request” means the most recent
set of field names and descriptions, developed and adopted by the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners, for use by
market conduct surveillance personnel during an examination.
Sec. 11. “Targeted examination” means a focused
examination based on the results of market analysis to review
specific lines of business or specific business practices of an
insurer as described in section 13 of this act.
Sec. 12. “Third-party model or product” means a model or
product used by an insurer that was provided to the insurer by a
person not under direct or indirect corporate control of the
insurer.
Sec. 13. The specific lines of business or specific business
practices of an insurer that may be the subject of a targeted
examination include, without limitation:
1. Underwriting and rating;
2. Marketing and sales;
3. Complaint handling operations or management;
4. Advertising materials;
5. Licensing;
6. Policyholder services;
7. Nonforfeitures;
8. Claims handling; or
9. Policy forms and filings.
Sec. 14. If a change is made to any procedures, guidelines,
handbook or other work product of the National Association of
-
*AB74*

– 8 –
Insurance Commissioners referenced in this chapter that would
materially change the manner in which a market conduct action is
conducted, the Commissioner shall give notice and provide
interested parties with the opportunity for a hearing to be held
pursuant to NRS 679B.310 on the matter if:
1. The change cannot be implemented without an amendment
to an existing statute or regulation; or
2. The Commissioner chooses not to follow the change or
otherwise deviate from the most recent version of the procedures,
guidelines, handbook or other work product.
Sec. 15. 1. For the purpose of determining financial
condition, fulfillment of contractual obligations and compliance
with the law, the Commissioner shall, as often as he or she deems
advisable, examine the affairs, transactions, accounts, records and
assets of each person subject to regulation under this Code and of
any person as to any matter relevant to the financial affairs of the
person subject to regulation under this Code or to the
examination. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Code,
the Commissioner shall so examine each authorized insurer not
less frequently than every 5 years. In scheduling and determining
the nature, scope and frequency of examinations, the
Commissioner shall consider:
(a) The results of any analysis or any applicable financial
statement;
(b) Any change in management or ownership of the person
subject to regulation under this Code;
(c) Any applicable actuarial opinion or summary;
(d) Any applicable report of an independent certified public
accountant; and
(e) Any other applicable criteria set forth in the Market
Regulation Handbook and most recent edition of the Financial
Condition Examiners Handbook, published by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners that is in effect when the
Commissioner exercises his or her discretion pursuant to this
section.
2. In performing an examination pursuant to this section of a
person subject to regulation under this Code, the Commissioner
may examine or investigate any person, or the business of any
person, if the examination or investigation is, in the sole discretion
of the Commissioner, necessary or material to the examination of
the person subject to regulation under this Code.
3. The examination of an alien insurer must be limited to its
insurance transactions, assets, trust deposits and affairs in the
United States, except as otherwise required by the Commissioner.
-
*AB74*

– 9 –
4. The Commissioner shall in like manner examine each
insurer applying for an initial certificate of authority to transact
insurance in this State.
5. In lieu of an examination under this chapter, the
Commissioner may accept a report of the examination of a foreign
or alien insurer prepared by the Division for a foreign insurer’s
state of domicile or an alien insurer’s state of entry into the United
States.
6. As far as practicable, the examination of a foreign or alien
insurer must be made in cooperation with the supervisory officers
of insurance of other states in which the insurer transacts
business.
Sec. 16. To ascertain compliance with law, or relationships
and transactions between any person and any person subject to
regulation under this Code, the Commissioner may, as often as he
or she deems advisable, examine the accounts, records, documents
and transactions relating to such compliance or relationships of:
1. Any producer of insurance, solicitor, surplus lines broker,
general agent, adjuster, insurer representative, bail agent, motor
club agent or any other licensee or any other person the
Commissioner has reason to believe may be holding himself or
herself out as any of the foregoing.
2. Any person having a contract under which the person
enjoys in fact the exclusive or dominant right to manage or
control an insurer.
3. Any insurance holding company or other person holding
the shares of voting stock or the proxies of policyholders of a
domestic insurer, to control the management thereof, as voting
trustee or otherwise.
4. Any subsidiary of the person subject to regulation under
this Code.
5. Any person engaged in this State in, or proposing to
engage in this State in, or holding himself or herself out in this
State as so engaging or proposing, or in this State assisting in, the
promotion, formation or financing of an insurer or insurance
holding corporation, or corporation or other group to finance an
insurer or the production of its business.
6. Any independent review organization, as defined in
NRS 695G.026.
Sec. 17. 1. When the Commissioner determines to examine
the affairs of any person, the Commissioner shall designate one or
more examiners and instruct the examiner or examiners as to the
scope of the examination.
2. The Commissioner shall conduct each examination in an
expeditious, fair and impartial manner.
-
*AB74*

– 10 –
3. Upon any such examination the Commissioner, or the
examiner if specifically so authorized in writing by the
Commissioner, may administer oaths and examine under oath any
person as to any matter relevant to the affairs under examination
or relevant to the examination.
4. Every person being examined and the officers, attorneys,
employees, agents and representatives of the person shall make
freely available to the Commissioner or the examiners of the
Commissioner the accounts, records, documents, files,
information, assets and matters of the person which are in his or
her possession or control and relating to the subject of the
examination and shall facilitate the examination.
5. If the Commissioner or examiner finds any accounts or
records to be inadequate, or inadequately kept or posted, the
Commissioner may employ experts to reconstruct, rewrite, post or
balance the accounts or records at the expense of the person being
examined if that person has failed to maintain, complete or correct
the accounts or records after the Commissioner or examiner has
given the person written notice and a reasonable opportunity to do
so.
6. Neither the Commissioner nor any examiner may remove
any account, record, document, file or other property of the person
being examined from the offices or place of the person being
examined except with the written consent of the person before
removal or pursuant to an order of a court duly obtained. This
provision does not affect the making and removal of copies or
abstracts of any such account, record, document, file or other
property.
7. Any person who refuses without just cause to be examined
under oath or who willfully obstructs or interferes with an
examiner in the exercise of his or her authority pursuant to this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
8. This chapter does not limit the Commissioner’s authority:
(a) To terminate or suspend an examination in order to pursue
other legal or regulatory action.
(b) During any hearing or any legal action, to use and, if so
ordered by a court, to make public a final or preliminary report of
an examination, working papers or other documents of an
examiner or insurer, or any other information discovered or
developed during the course of an examination. Such documents
must be given their appropriate evidentiary weight and must not be
accepted as prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein.
Sec. 18. 1. No cause of action arises, nor may any liability
be imposed against any person for the act of communicating or
delivering information or data to the Commissioner or any
-
*AB74*

– 11 –
authorized representative or examiner of the Commissioner
pursuant to an examination made under this chapter, if the act of
communication or delivery was performed in good faith and
without fraudulent intent, the intent to deceive or gross
negligence.
2. The Commissioner, his or her authorized representative or
any examiner appointed by the Commissioner is entitled to an
award of attorney’s fees and costs if he or she is the prevailing
party in a civil cause of action for libel, slander or any other
relevant tort arising out of activities in carrying out the provisions
of this chapter and the party bringing the action was not
substantially justified in doing so. For the purposes of this
subsection, an action is substantially justified if the action had a
reasonable basis in law or fact at the time it was brought.
Sec. 19. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) The cost of an examination of an insurer, or of any person
described in subsection 1, 2, 5 or 6 of section 16 of this act, must
be borne by the person examined. Such costs include only the
reasonable compensation and per diem allowance of the
examiners of the Commissioner, including expert assistance, and
incidental expenses as necessarily incurred in the examination. As
to the costs incurred in any such examination, the Commissioner
shall give due consideration to scales and limitations
recommended by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners and outlined in the examination manual
sponsored by the Association.
(b) The person examined shall promptly pay the costs of the
examination upon presentation by the Commissioner of a
reasonably detailed written statement thereof.
2. The Commissioner may bill a person subject to regulation
under this Code for the examination of any person referred to in
subsection 1 of section 16 of this act and shall adopt regulations
governing such billings.
Sec. 20. 1. All money received by the Commissioner
pursuant to section 19 of this act must be deposited in the Fund
for Insurance Administration and Enforcement created by
NRS 680C.100.
2. Money for travel, per diem, compensation and other
necessary and authorized expenses incurred by an examiner or
other representative of the Division in the examination of any
person required to pay, and making payment of, the expense of
examination pursuant to section 19 of this act must be paid out of
the Fund for Insurance Administration and Enforcement as other
claims against the State are paid.
-
*AB74*

– 12 –
Sec. 21. The provisions of sections 22 to 26, inclusive, of this
act apply to an examination conducted by the Commissioner other
than a targeted examination.
Sec. 22. 1. If the Commissioner deems it necessary to value
any asset involved in an examination, the Commissioner may
submit a written request to the person being examined to appoint
one or more appraisers who by reason of education, experience or
special training, and disinterest, are competent to appraise the
asset. Selection of any such appraiser must be subject to the
written approval of the Commissioner. If no such appointment is
made within 10 days after the request was delivered to the person,
the Commissioner may appoint the appraiser or appraisers.
2. Any such appraisal must be expeditiously made, and a copy
of the appraisal furnished to the Commissioner and to the person
being examined.
3. The reasonable costs of the appraisal must be borne by the
person being examined.
Sec. 23. 1. Not later than 60 days after the completion of
an examination, the examiner designated by the Commissioner
shall file a verified report of examination, in writing, which must
be comprised only of facts appearing upon the books, records or
other documents of the person subject to regulation under this
Code, the agents of the person or other persons examined
concerning the affairs of the person, or as ascertained from the
testimony of the officers or agents of the person or other persons
examined concerning the affairs of the person, and such
conclusions and recommendations as the examiner finds
reasonably warranted from the facts. The report of examination
must be verified by the oath of the examiner making the report.
2. The report of examination of a person subject to regulation
under this Code verified pursuant to subsection 1 is prima facie
evidence in any action or proceeding for the receivership,
conservation or liquidation of the person brought in the name of
the State against the person, or the officers or agents of the
person, upon the facts stated therein.
Sec. 24. 1. Upon receipt of the verified report of
examination pursuant to section 23 of this act, the Commissioner
shall deliver a copy of the report to the person examined with a
notice affording the person 10 days or such additional reasonable
period as the Commissioner for good cause may allow within
which to review the report and make a written submission or
rebuttal with respect to recommended changes or any matters
contained in the report.
2. Within 30 days after the end of the period allowed for the
receipt of written submissions or rebuttals, the Commissioner shall
-
*AB74*

– 13 –
fully consider and review the report, together with any written
submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the
examiner’s working papers and enter an order:
(a) Adopting the report as filed or with modification or
corrections;
(b) Rejecting the report with directions to the examiner to
reopen the examination for purposes of obtaining additional data,
documentation or information, and requiring the refiling of the
report pursuant to subsection 1 of section 23 of this act; or
(c) For an investigatory hearing for purposes of obtaining
additional documentation, data, information and testimony.
3. If the report reveals that a person subject to regulation
under this Code is operating in violation of any law, regulation or
previous order of the Commissioner, the Commissioner may order
the person to take any action the Commissioner considers
necessary or appropriate to cure the violation.
Sec. 25. 1. If requested by the person examined, within the
period allowed under subsection 1 of section 24 of this act, or if
ordered pursuant to subsection 2 of that section, the
Commissioner shall hold a hearing relative to the report and shall
not file the report in the Division for public inspection until after
the hearing and the order of the Commissioner thereon.
2. If no hearing has been requested or ordered, the report of
examination, with modifications, if any, as the Commissioner
deems proper, must be filed in the Division for public inspection
within 30 days after the expiration of the period allowed for review
by the person examined. Otherwise the report must be so filed
within 30 days after final hearing thereon, except that the
Commissioner may withhold from public inspection any report for
so long as the Commissioner deems such withholding to be
necessary for the protection of the person examined against
unwarranted injury or to be in the public interest.
3. The Commissioner shall forward to the person examined a
copy of the report of examination as filed, together with any
recommendations or statements relating thereto which the
Commissioner deems proper.
4. If the report concerns the examination of a domestic
insurer, a copy of the report, or a summary thereof approved by
the Commissioner must be presented by the insurer’s chief
executive officer to the insurer’s board of directors or similar
governing body at its next regular board meeting. A copy of the
report must also be furnished by the secretary of the insurer, if
incorporated, or by the attorney-in-fact if a reciprocal insurer,
within 30 days after receipt of the report in final form by the
insurer, to each member of the insurer’s board of directors or
-
*AB74*

– 14 –
similar governing body, and the certificate of the secretary or
attorney-in-fact that a copy of the report of examination has been
so furnished shall be deemed to constitute knowledge of the
contents of the report by each such member.
Sec. 26. 1. The Commissioner may disclose the content of a
report of examination, preliminary report, or the results of an
examination, or any matter relating thereto, to the Division or any
agency of any other state or country that regulates insurance, or to
law enforcement officers of this or any other state, or to an agency
of the Federal Government at any time, if the agency or office
receiving the report or matter relating thereto agrees in writing to
hold it confidential in a manner consistent with this chapter.
Access may also be granted to the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners.
2. All working papers, recorded information, documents and
copies thereof produced by, obtained by or disclosed to the
Commissioner or any other person in the course of an
examination are confidential, are not subject to subpoena, and
may not be made public by the Commissioner or any other person,
except as necessary for a hearing or as provided in this section,
NRS 239.0115 and subsection 4 of section 25 of this act. A person
to whom information is given must agree in writing before
receiving the information to provide to it the same confidential
treatment as required by this section, unless the prior written
consent of the person to which it pertains has been obtained.
Sec. 27. For the purpose of conducting the analysis required
by section 28 of this act, the Commissioner and market conduct
surveillance personnel shall collect information from:
1. Data currently available to the Division;
2. Surveys and required reporting requirements;
3. Information collected by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners;
4. Other sources in public and private sectors; and
5. Other sources from within and outside the insurance
industry.
Sec. 28. 1. The Commissioner and market conduct
surveillance personnel shall analyze the information collected
pursuant to section 27 of this act to develop a baseline
understanding of the marketplace and to identify for further
review any insurer or pattern or practice of an insurer that
deviates significantly from the norm or that may pose a potential
risk to a consumer of insurance.
2. The Commissioner and market conduct surveillance
personnel shall use the Market Regulation Handbook as one
resource in performing the analysis required by subsection 1.
-
*AB74*

– 15 –
Sec. 29. Except as otherwise provided by law, every insurer
or other person from whom information is sought in connection
with a market conduct action, including the officers, directors and
agents of the insurer or other person, shall provide the
Commissioner or market conduct surveillance personnel
convenient and free access to all books, records, accounts, papers,
documents and any or all computer or other recordings relating to
the property, assets, business and affairs of the insurer. The
officers, directors, employees, producers of insurance and agents
of the insurer or other person shall facilitate market conduct
actions and aid in market conduct actions so far as it is in their
power to do so.
Sec. 30. 1. If the Commissioner determines, as the result of
market analysis, that further inquiry into an insurer or a pattern
or practice of an insurer is needed, the Commissioner may, subject
to section 32 of this act, initiate an on-site examination or, before
initiating an on-site examination, initiate one or more other
market conduct actions, including, without limitation:
(a) Correspondence with the insurer.
(b) An interview with the insurer.
(c) Information gathering.
(d) Policy and procedure reviews.
(e) Interrogatories.
(f) A review of any self-evaluation or compliance program of
the insurer, including, without limitation, membership in a best
practices organization.
(g) A desk examination.
(h) Any other investigation, review or other action the
Commissioner deems appropriate to assess the market practices of
the insurer.
2. Any market conduct action initiated by the Commissioner
must:
(a) Be cost effective for the Division and the insurer;
(b) Provide for the protection of consumers of insurance; and
(c) Focus on the general business practices and compliance
activities of the insurer rather than on identifying infrequent or
unintentional errors that do not cause significant harm to
consumers of insurance.
3. Before initiating a market conduct action, the
Commissioner may provide the insurer an opportunity to resolve
any concerns of the Commissioner raised by market analysis to the
satisfaction of the Commissioner.
4. The Commissioner shall notify an insurer in writing if the
Commissioner initiates a market conduct action which requires a
response or other participation from the insurer.
-
*AB74*

– 16 –
5. The Commissioner shall take reasonable steps to eliminate
duplicative inquiries and coordinate market conduct actions and
findings with other states.
Sec. 31. 1. The Commissioner may determine the
frequency and timing of market conduct actions. In determining
the frequency and timing of market conduct actions, the
Commissioner shall consider:
(a) The specific market conduct action to be initiated; and
(b) Whether extraordinary circumstances indicating a risk to
consumers warrant immediate action.
2. If the Commissioner has reason to believe that more than
one insurer is engaged in common practices that constitute
grounds for initiating a market conduct action, the Commissioner
may schedule and coordinate more than one market conduct
action simultaneously.
3. The Commissioner shall conduct any targeted examination
in accordance with the Market Regulation Handbook and the
market conduct uniform examination procedures.
4. To the greatest extent possible, the Division shall use the
Standardized Data Request during a targeted examination. The
Division may adopt by regulation a successor product to the
Standardized Data Request if the Commissioner determines the
successor product is substantially similar.
5. In lieu of a targeted examination of a foreign or alien
insurer licensed in this State, the Commissioner may accept an
examination report of another state if the Commissioner
determines that the state has a market surveillance system that is
comparable to the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 32. 1. To the greatest extent possible, the
Commissioner shall consider initiating a desk examination or
other market conduct action described in section 30 of this act
before initiating an on-site examination.
2. If the Commissioner determines that other market conduct
actions identified in section 30 of this act are not appropriate or if
the Commissioner has already conducted another market conduct
action but determines that further inquiry into an insurer or the
pattern or practices of an insurer is warranted, the Commissioner
may initiate and conduct an on-site examination.
3. If the Commissioner schedules an on-site examination, the
Commissioner shall post notice of that fact, in accordance with the
requirements set forth in section 34 of this act, on the system for
tracking examinations maintained by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners or its successor product or
organization, as determined by the Commissioner.
-
*AB74*

– 17 –
Sec. 33. Before conducting an on-site examination, market
conduct surveillance personnel shall prepare a work plan for the
examination that must include, without limitation:
1. The name and address of the insurer to be examined;
2. The name and contact information of a lead examiner who
will oversee the examination;
3. Notice of any personnel from outside the Division who will
assist in the examination;
4. The justification for the on-site examination;
5. The scope of the on-site examination;
6. The date on which the on-site examination is scheduled to
begin;
7. An estimate of the length of time that the on-site
examination will take;
8. A budget for the on-site examination; and
9. The factors which will be included in the billing for the on-
site examination.
Sec. 34. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
not later than 60 days before the date on which an on-site
examination is scheduled to begin, the Commissioner shall:
(a) Send to the insurer:
(1) Notice in writing of that fact;
(2) The work plan prepared pursuant to section 33 of this
act; and
(3) A request for the insurer to name an examination
coordinator and to provide the name and contact information of
that person to the Commissioner.
(b) Post notice of that fact on the system for tracking
examinations maintained by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners or its successor product or
organization, as determined by the Commissioner.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, not later
than 30 days before the date on which an on-site examination is
scheduled to begin, the Commissioner shall conduct a pre-
examination conference with the examination coordinator named
by the insurer pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and any
other key personnel, as determined by the Commissioner or
examination coordinator, as applicable.
3. If the on-site examination is initiated in response to
extraordinary circumstances pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of section 31 of this act, the Commissioner shall
comply with the provisions of this section as soon as is practicable.
4. Before completing an on-site examination, the lead
examiner named in the work plan prepared pursuant to section 33
of this act shall conduct an exit conference with the insurer.
-
*AB74*

– 18 –
5. As soon as is practicable after completing the examination,
the Commissioner shall send notice in writing to the insurer
confirming the date on which the on-site examination was
completed.
Sec. 35. 1. Except by mutual agreement in writing between
the Commissioner and the insurer to modify the following
timeline:
(a) Not later than 60 days after the date on which an on-site
examination is confirmed as complete pursuant to subsection 5 of
section 34 of this act, the Commissioner shall send a draft report
of examination results to the insurer.
(b) Not later than 30 days after the date on which the insurer
receives the draft report of examination results described in
paragraph (a), the insurer may send any written comments related
to the draft report to the Commissioner. The insurer is not
required by this paragraph to submit written comments. If the
insurer submits written comments pursuant to this paragraph, the
comments must not include the name of any person involved in
any aspect of the examination, except that the name of a person
may be included to acknowledge the involvement of the person in
the examination.
(c) Not later than 30 days after the date on which the
Commissioner receives any written comments from the insurer
pursuant to paragraph (b), or not later than 60 days after the date
on which the Commissioner sent the draft report pursuant to
paragraph (a) if the insurer does not submit any written
comments, the Commissioner shall send a final report of
examination results to the insurer in compliance with the
requirements of subsections 2 and 3.
(d) Not later than 30 days after the date on which the insurer
receives the final report of examination results, the insurer shall
be deemed to accept the final report and the findings of the final
report unless the insurer:
(1) Makes a written application for a hearing pursuant to
NRS 679B.310; or
(2) Makes a written request for a one-time extension from
the Commissioner of 30 additional days. The Commissioner may
grant a request for extension submitted pursuant to this
subparagraph if the Commissioner determines it is appropriate.
2. The Commissioner may make revisions or corrections to
the report of examination results at any time after sending a draft
report to the insurer pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
and before sending a final report to the insurer pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1. If the insurer submits any written
-
*AB74*

– 19 –
comments related to the draft report pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1, the Commissioner:
(a) Shall make a good faith effort to informally resolve any
issues raised in the written comments; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, shall include
the written comments in the final report of examination results,
either in the body of the report or as an appendix.
3. The final report of examination results must not include
the name of any person involved in any aspect of the examination,
except that the name of a person may be included to acknowledge
the involvement of the person in the examination. If the insurer
submits written comments pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection
1 in violation of the requirements of that paragraph, the
Commissioner shall redact the written comments in compliance
with the requirements of this subsection before including the
written comments in the final report.
Sec. 36. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Commissioner shall keep confidential the final report of
examination results created pursuant to section 35 of this act for
not less than 30 days after:
(a) The date on which the insurer accepts the report or is
deemed to accept the report; or
(b) The date on which any proceedings related to a hearing
requested by the insurer pursuant to NRS 679B.310 have
concluded.
2. So long as a court of competent jurisdiction has not stayed
the publication of the final report of examination results created
pursuant to section 35 of this act, the Commissioner shall make
the final report open for public inspection after the period of
confidentiality described in subsection 1 has expired.
3. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the
Commissioner from disclosing to the insurance regulatory body of
any other state or agency of the Federal Government, at any time,
any information discovered in the course of or the results of
targeted examination or any matter relating thereto, including,
without limitation, any draft report or final report of examination
results, if the state, agency or office receiving the information,
results or report agrees to hold the information, results or report
confidential in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 37. 1. Except as otherwise provided by law, in the
course of any market conduct action, market conduct surveillance
personnel shall have free and full access to all books and records,
employees, officers and directors, as practicable, of an insurer
during regular business hours.
-
*AB74*

– 20 –
2. An insurer utilizing a third-party model or product for any
of the activities which are the subject of a market conduct action
shall, upon the request of market conduct surveillance personnel,
make the details of the third-party model or product available.
3. All documents created, produced, disclosed to or obtained
by the Commissioner, the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners or any other person in the course of market
analysis or any other market conduct action shall be confidential
and privileged, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be
subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil
action. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “documents”
includes, without limitation, working papers, third-party models or
products, complaint logs and any copies of the foregoing.
4. Disclosure from an insurer to the Commissioner of any
documents, materials or other information subject to the
provisions of this section shall not be construed as a waiver of any
applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality.
Sec. 38. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 37 of this
act, the Commissioner may, in order to assist in the performance
of his or her duties:
1. Share documents, materials and other information,
including confidential and privileged documents, materials and
other information, with an agency of any other state or country
that regulates insurance, law enforcement officers of this or any
other state, an agency of the Federal Government or the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, if the recipient of the information has the legal
authority to and agrees to maintain the confidential and privileged
status of the information;
2. Receive documents, materials and other information,
including confidential and privileged documents, materials and
other information, from an agency of any other state or country
that regulates insurance, law enforcement officers of this or any
other state, an agency of the Federal Government or the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, if the Commissioner maintains the confidential and
privileged status of any information received with notice of or the
understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws
of the jurisdiction where the document, material or other
information originated; and
3. Enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
documents, materials and other information consistent with this
chapter.
Sec. 39. 1. Market conduct surveillance personnel must be
qualified by education, experience and, where applicable,
-
*AB74*

– 21 –
professional designations. The Commissioner may contract with
qualified outside market conduct surveillance personnel to
supplement existing market conduct surveillance personnel if the
Commissioner determines assistance is necessary.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, market
conduct surveillance personnel have a conflict of interest in a
market conduct action pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if
the market conduct surveillance personnel directly or indirectly:
(a) Are affiliated with the management of the insurer subject
to the market conduct action;
(b) Have been employed by the insurer subject to the market
conduct action; or
(c) Own a pecuniary interest in the insurer subject to the
market conduct action.
3. Nothing in the provisions of subsection 2 shall be
construed to automatically preclude a person from being:
(a) A policyholder or claimant under a policy of insurance;
(b) A grantee of a mortgage or similar instrument on the
residence of the person from a regulated entity, if under
customary terms and in the ordinary course of business;
(c) An owner of an investment in shares of regulated
diversified investment companies; or
(d) A settlor or beneficiary of a blind trust into which any
otherwise permissible holding has been placed.
Sec. 40. 1. Any fine or other penalty levied as the result of
a market conduct action must be consistent, reasonable and
justified.
2. In determining whether a fine or penalty is consistent,
reasonable and justified, the Commissioner shall consider:
(a) Any actions taken by the insurer to maintain membership
in and comply with the standards of any best practices
organizations that promote high ethical standards of conduct in
the marketplace; and
(b) The extent to which the insurer maintains any program of
regulatory compliance to assess, report and remediate any
problems detected by the insurer.
Sec. 41. 1. The Commissioner shall report data which is
collected during market analysis to the market information
systems which are used by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, or successor products as determined by the
Commissioner, including, without limitation, the Complaints
Database System, the Examination Tracking System and the
Regulatory Information Retrieval System.
-
*AB74*

– 22 –
2. The Division shall compile and maintain data and other
information in a manner that meets the requirements of the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
3. The Commissioner shall share information and coordinate
the market analysis and examination efforts of the Division with
other states through the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners.
Sec. 42. Chapter 679B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Governor or the Legislature proclaims the existence
of a state of emergency or issues a declaration of disaster pursuant
to NRS 414.070, the Commissioner may issue an order that
addresses any or all of the following matters related to policies
issued in this State:
(a) Reporting requirements for claims;
(b) Grace periods for payment of insurance premiums and
performance of other duties by an insured; or
(c) Temporary postponement of cancellations and
nonrenewals.
2. An order issued pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Must be approved by the Governor;
(b) Is effective for not more than 30 days unless the
Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, extends the
order for an additional period of not more than 30 days or any
subsequent additional period of not more than 30 days.
(c) Must specify, by line of insurance:
(1) The geographic areas in which the order applies, which
must be:
(I) Within, but may be less extensive than, the
geographic area specified in the proclamation of the existence of a
state of emergency or declaration of disaster; and
(II) Specified by an appropriate means of delineation
which may include, without limitation, delineation by zip code;
and
(2) The date on which the order becomes effective and the
date on which the order terminates.
3. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations that establish
general criteria for an order issued pursuant to subsection 1.
4. Nothing in this section prohibits the Commissioner from
adopting an emergency regulation in accordance with chapter
233B of NRS relating to a specific proclamation of a state of
emergency or declaration of disaster or otherwise limits or affects
the regulatory authority of the Commissioner as provided by law.
-
*AB74*

– 23 –
Sec. 43. NRS 679B.139 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679B.139 1. The Commissioner may adopt regulations
governing plans for providing welfare benefits to employees of
more than one employer. The regulations must provide standards
requiring the maintenance of specified levels of reserves and
specified levels of contributions which any such plan, or any trust
established under such a plan, must meet. If a plan does not meet the
standards, no benefits may be paid under the plan.
2. The Commissioner may conduct an examination of any
insurer which administers a plan for providing welfare benefits to
employees of more than one employer to determine whether the
insurer is complying with the Commissioner’s regulations. The cost
of the examination must be borne by the insurer in the manner
provided in [NRS 679B.290.] section 19 of this act. If the
Commissioner determines that the insurer is not complying with
the Commissioner’s regulations, the Commissioner shall require the
insurer not to pay benefits under the plan.
3. As used in this section, the term “plan for providing welfare
benefits for employees of more than one employer” is intended to be
equivalent to the term “employee welfare benefit plan which is a
multiple employer welfare arrangement” as used in federal statutes
and regulations.
Sec. 44. NRS 679B.142 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679B.142 1. The Commissioner shall deliver to the Secretary
of State a copy of an order of the Commissioner or of the district
court prohibiting [an insurer] a person from transacting insurance in
this state as a corporation, limited-liability company, limited
partnership or limited-liability partnership.
2. Upon receiving the order, the Secretary of State shall nullify
the charter of the corporation or limited-liability company or the
certificate of the limited partnership or limited-liability partnership.
3. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing a document
with the same name as a corporation, limited-liability company,
limited partnership or limited-liability partnership whose charter or
certificate has been nullified.
Sec. 45. NRS 679B.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679B.145 The Commissioner shall:
1. Publish a guide to rates for policies of insurance for motor
vehicles which contains:
(a) An explanation of the various types of coverage available.
(b) A list of all insurers which offer insurance for motor vehicles
in Nevada.
(c) [Comparisons of the cost for each type of insurance when
purchased from the five insurers who offer it at the highest price and
-
*AB74*

– 24 –
the five insurers who offer it at the lowest price, using one or more
hypothetical examples developed by the Commissioner.
(d)] Any other information which the Commissioner deems
appropriate and useful to the public.
2. Maintain the guide by republishing it with revised
information [at least once each year.] if the Commissioner
determines market conditions have changed enough to warrant an
update.
3. Distribute the guide and the information contained in the
guide in any manner the Commissioner deems appropriate.
Sec. 46. NRS 679B.152 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679B.152 1. Every insurer or organization for dental care
which pays claims on the basis of usual and customary fees [for
medical] or [dental care which are “usual and customary”] other
reimbursement methodology shall submit to the Commissioner a
complete description of the method it uses to determine those fees
[.] or of the other methodology, as applicable. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 239.0115, this information must be kept
confidential by the Commissioner. The fees [determined] or
methodology submitted by the insurer or organization [to be the
usual and customary fees] for [that] dental care are subject to the
approval of the Commissioner as being the usual and customary fees
or an appropriate reimbursement methodology in that locality.
[The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the provisions
of this subsection apply to medical or dental care provided to a
claimant under any contract of insurance.
2. Any contract for group, blanket or individual health
insurance and any contract issued by a nonprofit hospital, medical or
dental service corporation or organization for dental care, which
provides a plan for dental care to its insureds or members which
limits their choice of a dentist, under the plan to those in a
preselected group, must offer its insureds or members the option of
selecting a plan of benefits which does not restrict the choice of a
dentist. The selection of that option does not entitle the insured or
member to any increase in contributions by his or her employer or
other organization toward the premium or cost of the optional plan
over that contributed under the restricted plan.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to fees or
reimbursement methodologies used to reimburse a participating
provider of health care under a network plan issued pursuant to
NRS 687B.600 to 687B.850, inclusive.
Sec. 47. NRS 679B.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679B.180 1. The Commissioner may invoke the aid of the
courts through injunction or other proper process, mandatory or
otherwise, to enjoin any existing or threatened violation of any
-
*AB74*

– 25 –
provision of this Code, or to enforce any proper order made by or
action taken by the Commissioner.
2. If the Commissioner has reason to believe that any person
has violated any provision of this Code, or other law applicable to
insurance operations, for which criminal prosecution in the opinion
of the Commissioner would be in order, the Commissioner shall
give the information relative thereto to the appropriate district
attorney or to the Attorney General. The district attorney or
Attorney General shall promptly institute such action or proceedings
against such person as in the opinion of the district attorney or
Attorney General the information may require or justify.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, an attorney
employed by the Division or the Attorney General shall act as legal
counsel to the Division and the Commissioner in all matters
pertaining to the administration and enforcement of this Code.
Sec. 48. NRS 679B.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679B.220 1. The Commissioner shall communicate on
request of the regulatory officer for insurance in any state, province
or country any information which it is the duty of the Commissioner
by law to ascertain respecting authorized insurers.
2. The Commissioner may:
(a) Be a member of the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners or any successor organization . [;]
(b) Exchange with the [association] Association or any
successor organization any information, not otherwise confidential,
relating to applicants and licensees under this title . [;]
(c) Communicate with the [association] Association or any
successor organization concerning the business of insurance
generally . [;]
(d) Enter into contracts with or through the Association or any
successor organization for goods and services related to the
regulation of insurance. Any contract entered into pursuant to this
paragraph is not subject to the provisions of chapter 333 of NRS.
(e) Enter into compacts with the regulatory officers in other
states to:
(1) Further the uniform treatment of insurers throughout the
United States;
(2) Ensure market stability; or
(3) Ensure essential insurance is made available to Nevada
residents . [; and
(e)] (f) Participate in and support other cooperative activities of
public officers having supervision of the business of insurance.
Sec. 49. NRS 679B.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
679B.630 The Commissioner shall establish a program within
the Division to investigate any act or practice which:
-
*AB74*

– 26 –
1. Violates the provisions of NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,]
686A.325, inclusive [;] , and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this
act; or
2. Defrauds or is an attempt to defraud an insurer.
Sec. 50. NRS 680A.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
680A.120 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsections 2
and 5,] subsection 4, to qualify for authority to transact any one
kind of insurance as defined in NRS 681A.010 to 681A.080,
inclusive, or combinations of kinds of insurance as shown below, an
insurer shall possess and thereafter maintain unimpaired paid-in
capital stock, if a stock insurer, or unimpaired basic surplus, if a
mutual or a reciprocal insurer, and free surplus not less than 100
percent of the minimum required capital stock or minimum required
basic surplus, and when first so authorized shall possess initial free
surplus, all in amounts not less than as determined from the
following table:

FOREIGN MUTUAL RECIPROCAL
STOCK INSURERS INSURERS INSURERS
Minimum Minimum Minimum
Kind or Required Initial Required Initial Required Initial
Kinds of Capital Free Basic Free Basic Free
Insurance Stock Surplus Surplus Surplus Surplus Surplus

Life ................... 500,000 [1,000,000] 500,000 [1,000,000] N/A N/A
2,000,000 2,000,000
Health, Property,
Casualty, Surety,
Marine &
Transportation
Multiple
line ................ 500,000 [1,000,000] 500,000 [1,000,000] 500,000 [1,000,000]
2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Title .................. 500,000 [750,000] N/A N/A N/A N/A
1,500,000
Financial
[Guarantee]
Guaranty ...... 10,000,000 40,000,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A

2. [At the discretion of the Commissioner, a domestic insurer
holding a valid certificate of authority to transact insurance in this
state immediately prior to January 1, 1992, may, if otherwise
qualified therefor, continue to be so authorized while possessing the
amount of paid-in capital stock, if a stock insurer, or surplus, if a
mutual insurer, required by the laws of this state for such authority
-
*AB74*

– 27 –
immediately before January 1, 1992, for a period not to exceed 2
years. On or before January 1, 1994, the insurer shall meet the
requirements of subsection 1. The Commissioner shall not grant
such an insurer authority to transact any other or additional kinds of
insurance unless it then fully complies with the requirements as to
capital and surplus, as applied to all kinds of insurance which it then
proposes to transact, as provided by this section for like foreign
insurers applying for original certificates of authority pursuant to
this Code.
3.] Capital and surplus requirements are based upon all the
kinds of insurance transacted by the insurer in any and all areas in
which it operates or proposes to operate, whether or not only a
portion of such kinds are to be transacted in this state.
[4.] 3. As to surplus required for qualification to transact one or
more kinds of insurance and thereafter to be maintained, domestic
mutual insurers are governed by chapter 693A of NRS and domestic
reciprocal insurers are governed by chapter 694B of NRS.
[5.] 4. An insurer who transacts financial guaranty insurance in
this state must transact only one kind of insurance and possess and
maintain the minimum capital and surplus requirements pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 51. NRS 680A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
680A.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.472,
the Commissioner may refuse to continue or may suspend, limit or
revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority if the Commissioner finds
after a hearing thereon, or upon waiver of hearing by the insurer,
that the insurer has:
(a) Violated or failed to comply with any lawful order of the
Commissioner;
(b) Conducted business in an unsuitable manner;
(c) Willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with any
lawful regulation of the Commissioner; or
(d) Violated any provision of this Code other than one for
violation of which suspension or revocation is mandatory.
 In lieu of such a suspension or revocation, the Commissioner
may levy upon the insurer, and the insurer shall pay forthwith, an
administrative fine of not more than $2,000 for each act or violation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 696B of NRS, the
Commissioner shall suspend or revoke an insurer’s certificate of
authority on any of the following grounds if the Commissioner finds
after a hearing thereon that the insurer:
(a) Is in unsound condition, is being fraudulently conducted, or
is in such a condition or is using such methods and practices in the
conduct of its business as to render its further transaction of
-
*AB74*

– 28 –
insurance in this State currently or prospectively hazardous or
injurious to policyholders or to the public.
(b) With such frequency as to indicate its general business
practice in this State:
(1) Has without just cause failed to pay, or delayed payment
of, claims arising under its policies, whether the claims are in
favor of an insured or in favor of a third person with respect to the
liability of an insured to the third person; or
(2) Without just cause compels insureds or claimants to
accept less than the amount due them or to employ attorneys or to
bring suit against the insurer or such an insured to secure full
payment or settlement of such claims.
(c) Refuses to be examined, or its directors, officers, employees
or representatives refuse to submit to examination relative to its
affairs, or to produce its books, papers, records, contracts,
correspondence or other documents for examination by the
Commissioner when required, or refuse to perform any legal
obligation relative to the examination.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 681A.110, has
reinsured all its risks in their entirety in another insurer.
(e) Has failed to pay any final judgment rendered against it in
this State upon any policy, bond, recognizance or undertaking as
issued or guaranteed by it, within 30 days after the judgment
became final or within 30 days after dismissal of an appeal before
final determination, whichever date is the later.
3. In addition to the grounds specified in subsections 1 and 2,
the Commissioner may refuse to continue or may suspend, limit or
revoke an insurer’s certificate of authority if the Commissioner finds
after a hearing thereon, or upon waiver of hearing by the insurer,
that the insurer has failed to comply with any provision of NRS
439B.800 to 439B.875, inclusive, if applicable, or any applicable
regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
4. The Commissioner may, without advance notice or a hearing
thereon, immediately limit or suspend the certificate of authority of
any insurer as to which proceedings for receivership,
conservatorship, rehabilitation or other delinquency proceedings
have been commenced in any state by the public officer who
supervises insurance for that state.
5. No proceeding to suspend, limit or revoke a certificate of
authority pursuant to this section may be maintained unless it is
commenced by the giving of notice to the insurer within 5 years
after the occurrence of the charged act or omission. This limitation
does not apply if the Commissioner finds fraudulent or willful
evasion of taxes.
-
*AB74*

– 29 –
Sec. 52. NRS 680B.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
680B.010 The Commissioner shall collect in advance and
receipt for, and persons so served must pay to the Commissioner,
fees and miscellaneous charges as follows:
1. Insurer’s certificate of authority:
(a) Filing initial application ............................................... $2,450
(b) Issuance of certificate:
(1) For any one kind of insurance as defined in
NRS 681A.010 to 681A.080, inclusive ........................................ 283
(2) For two or more kinds of insurance as so
defined .......................................................................................... 578
(3) For a reinsurer ........................................................... 2,450
(c) Each annual continuation of a certificate ....................... 2,450
(d) Reinstatement pursuant to NRS 680A.180, 50
percent of the annual continuation fee otherwise
required.
(e) Registration of additional title pursuant to
NRS 680A.240 ................................................................................ 50
(f) Annual renewal of the registration of
additional title pursuant to NRS 680A.240 ..................................... 25
2. Charter documents, other than those filed
with an application for a certificate of authority.
Filing amendments to articles of incorporation,
charter, bylaws, power of attorney and other
constituent documents of the insurer, each document .................. $10
3. Annual statement or report. For filing annual
statement or report ........................................................................ $25
4. Service of process:
(a) Filing of power of attorney .................................................. $5
(b) Acceptance of service of process ........................................ 30
5. Licenses, appointments and renewals for
producers of insurance:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Appointment fee for each insurer ........................................ 15
(c) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
(d) Temporary license ............................................................... 10
(e) Modification of an existing license ..................................... 50
6. Surplus lines brokers:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
7. Managing general agents’ licenses,
appointments and renewals:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Appointment fee for each insurer ........................................ 15
(c) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
-
*AB74*

– 30 –
8. Adjusters’, as defined in NRS 684A.030,
licenses and renewals:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
9. Licenses and renewals for appraisers of
physical damage to motor vehicles:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
10. Insurance vending machines:
(a) Application and license, for each machine ...................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
11. Permit for solicitation for securities:
(a) Application for permit ..................................................... $100
(b) Extension of permit ............................................................. 50
12. Securities salespersons for domestic
insurers:
(a) Application and license ..................................................... $25
(b) Annual renewal of license ................................................... 15
13. Rating organizations:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $500
(b) Annual renewal ................................................................. 500
14. Certificates and renewals for administrators
licensed pursuant to chapter 683A of NRS:
(a) Application and certificate of registration ....................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal .............................................................. 125
15. For copies of the insurance laws of Nevada,
a fee which is not less than the cost of producing the
copies.
16. Certified copies of certificates of authority
and licenses issued pursuant to the Code ...................................... $10
17. For copies and amendments of documents
on file in the Division, a reasonable charge fixed by
the Commissioner, including charges for duplicating
or amending the forms and for certifying the copies
and affixing the official seal.
18. Letter of clearance for a producer of
insurance or other licensee if requested by someone
other than the licensee ................................................................... $10
19. Certificate of status as a producer of
insurance or other licensee if requested by someone
other than the licensee ................................................................... $10
20. Licenses, appointments and renewals for bail
agents:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Appointment for each surety insurer ................................... 15
-
*AB74*

– 31 –
(c) Triennial renewal of each license .................................... $125
21. Licenses and renewals for bail enforcement
agents:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
22. Licenses, appointments and renewals for
general agents for bail:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Initial appointment by each insurer ..................................... 15
(c) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
23. Licenses and renewals for bail solicitors:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
24. Licenses and renewals for title agents and
escrow officers:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
(c) Appointment fee for each title insurer ................................. 15
25. Certificate of authority and renewal for a
seller of prepaid funeral contracts ............................................... $125
26. Licenses and renewals for agents for prepaid
funeral contracts:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
27. Reinsurance intermediary broker or
manager:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each license ...................................... 125
28. Agents for and sellers of prepaid burial
contracts:
(a) Application and certificate or license .............................. $125
(b) Triennial renewal .............................................................. 125
29. Risk retention groups:
(a) Initial registration ............................................................ $250
(b) Each annual continuation of a certificate of
registration .................................................................................... 250
30. Required filing of forms:
(a) For rates and policies......................................................... $25
(b) For riders and endorsements ............................................... 10
31. Viatical settlements:
(a) Provider of viatical settlements:
(1) Application and license ........................................... $1,000
(2) Annual renewal ......................................................... 1,000
(b) Broker of viatical settlements:
(1) Application and license ................................................ 500
-
*AB74*

– 32 –
(2) Annual renewal .......................................................... $500
(c) Registration of producer of insurance acting
as a viatical settlement broker ....................................................... 250
32. Insurance consultants:
(a) Application and license ................................................... $125
(b) Triennial renewal .............................................................. 125
33. Licensee’s association with or designation,
appointment or sponsorship by an organization:
(a) Initial association, designation or sponsorship
and renewal of association, designation or
sponsorship, for each organization ............................................... $50
(b) Initial appointment and annual renewal of
appointment .................................................................................... 15
34. Purchasing groups:
(a) Initial registration and review of an
application ................................................................................... $100
(b) Each annual continuation of registration........................... 100
35. Exchange enrollment facilitators:
(a) Application and certificate .............................................. $125
(b) Triennial renewal of each certificate ................................. 125
(c) Temporary certificate .......................................................... 10
36. Agent who performs utilization reviews:
(a) Application and registration ............................................ $250
(b) Renewal of registration ..................................................... 250
37. Motor club:
(a) Filing of application ........................................................ $500
(b) Issuance of certificate........................................................ 283
38. Motor club agent:
(a) Application and license ..................................................... $78
(b) Appointment by each motor club .......................................... 5
(c) Triennial renewal of each license ........................................ 78
39. Title plant company:
(a) Application and license ..................................................... $10
(b) Renewal of license .............................................................. 10
40. Service contract provider:
(a) Application and registration ........................... [$2,000] $1,000
(b) Renewal of registration ...................................... [2,000] 1,000
41. In addition to any other fee or charge, all applicable fees
required of any person, including, without limitation, persons listed
in this section, pursuant to NRS 680C.110.
Sec. 53. NRS 681A.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
681A.020 1. “Casualty insurance” includes:
(a) Vehicle insurance. Insurance against loss of or damage to
any land vehicle or aircraft or any draft or riding animal or to
property while contained therein or thereon or being loaded or
-
*AB74*

– 33 –
unloaded therein or therefrom, from any hazard or cause, and
against any loss, liability or expense resulting from or incidental to
ownership, maintenance or use of any such vehicle, aircraft or
animal, together with insurance against accidental injury to natural
persons, irrespective of legal liability of the insured, including the
named insured, while in, entering, alighting from, adjusting,
repairing, cranking, or caused by being struck by a vehicle, aircraft
or draft or riding animal, if such insurance is issued as an incidental
part of insurance on the vehicle, aircraft or draft or riding animal.
(b) Liability insurance. Insurance against legal liability for the
death, injury or disability of any human being, or for damage to
property, including liability resulting from negligence in rendering
expert, fiduciary or professional services, and provisions of medical,
hospital, surgical, disability benefits to injured persons and funeral
and death benefits to dependents, beneficiaries or personal
representatives of persons killed, irrespective of legal liability of the
insured, when issued as an incidental coverage with or supplemental
to liability insurance.
(c) Workers’ compensation and employer’s liability. Insurance
of the obligations accepted by, imposed upon or assumed by
employers under law for death, disablement or injury of employees.
(d) Burglary and theft. Insurance against loss or damage by
burglary, theft, larceny, robbery, forgery, fraud, vandalism,
malicious mischief, confiscation, or wrongful conversion, disposal
or concealment, or from any attempt at any of the foregoing,
including supplemental coverage for medical, hospital, surgical and
funeral expense incurred by the named insured or any other person
as a result of bodily injury during the commission of a burglary,
robbery or theft by another, and, also, insurance against loss of or
damage to moneys, coins, bullion, securities, notes, drafts,
acceptances or any other valuable papers and documents, resulting
from any cause.
(e) Personal property floater. Insurance upon personal effects
against loss or damage from any cause.
(f) Glass. Insurance against loss or damage to glass, including its
lettering, ornamentation and fittings.
(g) Boiler and machinery. Insurance against any liability and
loss or damage to property or interest resulting from accidents to or
explosions of boilers, pipes, pressure containers, machinery or
apparatus, and to make inspection of and issue certificates of
inspection upon boilers, machinery and apparatus of any kind,
whether or not insured.
(h) Leakage and fire extinguishing equipment. Insurance against
loss or damage to any property or interest caused by the breakage or
leakage of sprinklers, hoses, pumps and other fire-extinguishing
-
*AB74*

– 34 –
equipment or apparatus, water pipes or containers, or by water
entering through leaks or openings in buildings, and insurance
against loss or damage to such sprinklers, hoses, pumps and other
fire-extinguishing equipment or apparatus.
(i) Credit and mortgage guaranty. Insurance against loss or
damage resulting from failure of debtors to pay their obligations to
the insured, and insurance of real property mortgage lenders against
loss by reason of nonpayment of the mortgage indebtedness.
(j) Elevator. Insurance against loss of or damage to any property
of the insured, resulting from the ownership, maintenance or use of
elevators, except loss or damage by fire, and to make inspection of
and issue certificates of inspection upon, elevators.
(k) Congenital defects. Insurance against congenital defects in
human beings.
(l) Livestock. Insurance against loss or damage to livestock, and
services of a veterinary for such animals.
(m) Entertainments. Insurance indemnifying the producer of any
motion picture, television, radio, theatrical, sport, spectacle,
entertainment, or similar production, event or exhibition against loss
from interruption, postponement or cancellation thereof due to
death, accidental injury or sickness of performers, participants,
directors or other principals.
(n) Miscellaneous. Insurance against any other kind of loss,
damage or liability properly a subject of insurance and not within
any other kind of insurance as defined in this chapter, if such
insurance is not disapproved by the Commissioner as being contrary
to law or public policy . [, including insurance for home protection
issued pursuant to NRS 690B.100 to 690B.180, inclusive.]
2. Provision of medical, hospital, surgical and funeral benefits,
and of coverage against accidental death or injury, as incidental to
and part of other insurance as stated under paragraphs (a) (vehicle),
(b) (liability), (d) (burglary), (g) (boiler and machinery) and (j)
(elevator) of subsection 1 shall for all purposes be deemed to be the
same kind of insurance to which it is so incidental, and is not subject
to provisions of this Code applicable to life and health insurances.
Sec. 54. NRS 681B.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
681B.400 1. The following types of information shall qualify
as confidential information:
(a) A memorandum in support of an opinion submitted pursuant
to NRS 681B.200 to 681B.260, inclusive, or 681B.350 and any
other documents, materials and other information, including,
without limitation, all working papers, and copies thereof, created,
produced or obtained by or disclosed to the Commissioner or any
other person in connection with such memorandum;
-
*AB74*

– 35 –
(b) All documents, materials and other information, including,
without limitation, all working papers, and copies thereof, created,
produced or obtained by or disclosed to the Commissioner or any
other person in the course of an examination authorized by
subsection 4 of [NRS 679B.230] section 15 of this act or subsection
7 of NRS 681B.300, provided that if an examination report or other
material prepared in connection with an examination authorized by
[NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this
act, is not held as private and confidential information in accordance
with the provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2 to
41, inclusive, of this act, an adopted examination report created in
accordance with the provisions of subsection 4 of [NRS 679B.230]
section 15 of this act or subsection 7 of NRS 681B.300 shall not be
deemed confidential information;
(c) Any reports, documents, materials and other information
developed by an applicable company in support of, or in connection
with, an annual certification by the applicable company in
accordance with the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
NRS 681B.360 evaluating the effectiveness of the company’s
internal controls with respect to a principle-based valuation, and any
other documents, materials and other information, including,
without limitation, all working papers, and copies thereof, created,
produced or obtained by or disclosed to the Commissioner or any
other person in connection with such reports, documents, materials
and other information;
(d) Any principle-based valuation report developed in
accordance with paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 681B.360,
and any other documents, materials and other information,
including, without limitation, all working papers, and copies thereof,
created, produced or obtained by or disclosed to the Commissioner
or any other person in connection with such report; and
(e) Any experience data and experience materials, and any other
documents, materials, data and other information, including, without
limitation, all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced
or obtained by or disclosed to the Commissioner or any other person
in connection with such data and materials.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Experience data” means all documents, materials, data and
other information submitted by an applicable company to the
Commissioner, a designated experience reporting agent or other
such person authorized to act on behalf of the Commissioner
pursuant to NRS 681B.500 and 681B.510.
(b) “Experience materials” means all documents, materials, data
and other information, including, without limitation, all working
papers, and copies thereof, created or produced in connection with
-
*AB74*

– 36 –
experience data including, without limitation, any potentially
company-identifying or personally identifiable information, that is
provided to or obtained by the Commissioner, a designated
experience reporting agent or other such person authorized to act on
behalf of the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 681B.500 and
681B.510.
Sec. 55. Chapter 683A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
An administrator shall report to the Commissioner:
1. Any administrative action taken against the administrator
in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in this
State, not later than 30 days after the date of the final disposition
of the matter. The report must include, without limitation, a copy
of the complaint filed, the order issued and any other relevant
legal documents.
2. Any criminal prosecution against the administrator in any
jurisdiction, not later than 30 days after the date of the initial
pretrial hearing. The report must include, without limitation, a
copy of the complaint filed, any order issued after the pretrial
hearing and any other relevant legal documents.
Sec. 56. NRS 683A.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.025 1. Except as limited by this section,
“administrator” means a person who:
(a) Directly or indirectly underwrites or collects charges or
premiums from or adjusts or settles claims of residents of this State
or any other state from within this State in connection with workers’
compensation insurance, life or health insurance coverage or
annuities, including coverage or annuities provided by an employer
for his or her employees;
(b) Administers an internal service fund pursuant to
NRS 287.010;
(c) Administers a trust established pursuant to NRS 287.015,
under a contract with the trust;
(d) Administers a program of self-insurance for an employer;
(e) Administers a program which is funded by an employer and
which provides pensions, annuities, health benefits, death benefits or
other similar benefits for his or her employees;
(f) Administers a program of pharmacy benefits for an
employer, insurer, internal service fund or trust; [or]
(g) Administers a service contract, as defined in NRS
690C.080; or
(h) Is an insurance company that is licensed to do business in
this State or is acting as an insurer with respect to a policy lawfully
issued and delivered in a state where the insurer is authorized to do
business, if the insurance company performs any act described in
-
*AB74*

– 37 –
paragraphs (a) to [(f),] (g), inclusive, for or on behalf of another
insurer unless the insurers are affiliated and each insurer is licensed
to do business in this State.
2. “Administrator” does not include:
(a) An employee authorized to act on behalf of an administrator
who holds a certificate of registration from the Commissioner.
(b) An employer acting on behalf of his or her employees or the
employees of a subsidiary or affiliated concern.
(c) A labor union acting on behalf of its members.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph [(g)] (h) of
subsection 1, an insurance company licensed to do business in this
State or acting as an insurer with respect to a policy lawfully issued
and delivered in a state in which the insurer was authorized to do
business.
(e) A producer of life or health insurance licensed in this State,
when his or her activities are limited to the sale of insurance.
(f) A creditor acting on behalf of his or her debtors with respect
to insurance covering a debt between the creditor and debtor.
(g) A trust and its trustees, agents and employees acting for it, if
the trust was established under the provisions of 29 U.S.C. § 186.
(h) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of subsection
1, a trust and its trustees, agents and employees acting for it, if the
trust was established pursuant to NRS 287.015.
(i) A trust which is exempt from taxation under section 501(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(a), its trustees and
employees, and a custodian, his or her agents and employees acting
under a custodial account which meets the requirements of section
401(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(f).
(j) A bank, credit union or other financial institution which is
subject to supervision by federal or state banking authorities.
(k) A company which issues credit cards, and which advances
for and collects premiums or charges from credit card holders who
have authorized it to do so, if the company does not adjust or settle
claims.
(l) An attorney at law who adjusts or settles claims in the normal
course of his or her practice or employment, but who does not
collect charges or premiums in connection with life or health
insurance coverage or with annuities.
3. As used in this section, “affiliated” means any insurer or
other person that directly, or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, controls or is controlled by, or is under common
control with, another insurer or other person.
-
*AB74*

– 38 –
Sec. 57. NRS 683A.0805 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.0805 As used in NRS 683A.0805 to 683A.0893,
inclusive, and section 55 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 683A.081 to
683A.084, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 58. NRS 683A.08522 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.08522 Each application for a certificate of registration as
an administrator must include or be accompanied by:
1. A financial statement of the applicant that has been reviewed
by an independent certified public accountant and which includes:
(a) A statement regarding the amount of money that the
applicant expects to collect from or disburse to residents of this state
during the next calendar year.
(b) Financial information for the 90 days immediately preceding
the date the application was filed with the Commissioner.
(c) An income statement and balance sheet for the 2 years
immediately preceding the application that are:
(1) Prepared in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles [;] , statutory accounting principles or other
recognized financial standards as the Commissioner may allow;
and
(2) Reviewed by an independent certified public accountant.
(d) A certification of the financial statement by an officer of the
applicant.
2. The documents used to create the business association of the
administrator, including articles of incorporation, articles of
association, a partnership agreement, a trust agreement and a
shareholders’ agreement.
3. The documents used to regulate the internal affairs of the
administrator, including the bylaws, rules or regulations of the
administrator.
4. A certificate of registration issued pursuant to NRS 600.350
for a trade name or trademark used by the administrator, if
applicable.
5. An organizational chart that identifies each person who
directly or indirectly controls the administrator and each affiliate of
the administrator.
6. A notarized affidavit from each person who manages or
controls the administrator, including each member of the board of
directors or board of trustees, each officer, partner and member of
the business association of the administrator, and each shareholder
-
*AB74*

– 39 –
of the administrator who holds not less than 10 percent of the voting
stock of the administrator. The affidavit must include:
(a) The personal history, business record and insurance
experience of the affiant;
(b) Whether the affiant has been investigated by any regulatory
authority or has had any license or certificate denied, suspended or
revoked in any state; and
(c) Any other information that the Commissioner may require.
7. The complete name and address of each office of the
administrator, including offices located outside this state.
8. A statement that sets forth whether the administrator has:
(a) Held a license or certificate to transact any kind of insurance
in this state or any other state and whether that license or certificate
has been refused, suspended or revoked;
(b) Been indebted to any person and, if so, the circumstances of
that debt; and
(c) Had an administrative agreement cancelled and, if so, the
circumstances of that cancellation.
9. A statement that describes the business plan of the
administrator. The statement must include information:
(a) Concerning the number of persons on the staff of the
administrator and the activities proposed in this state or in any other
state.
(b) That demonstrates the capability of the administrator to
provide a sufficient number of experienced and qualified persons for
the processing of claims, the keeping of records and, if applicable,
underwriting.
10. If the applicant intends to solicit new or renewal business,
proof that the applicant employs or has contracted with a producer
of insurance licensed in this state to solicit and take applications. An
applicant who intends to solicit insurance contracts directly or to act
as a producer must provide proof that the applicant is licensed as a
producer in this state.
11. If the applicant is not an insurer and is not [domiciled]
resident in this State, a copy of the license, certificate or other
authorization issued by the state in which the applicant is
[domiciled] resident which authorizes the applicant to act as an
administrator in that state, if any.
12. Any other information required by the Commissioner.
Sec. 59. NRS 683A.0857 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.0857 1. Each administrator shall file with the
Commissioner a bond which complies with NRS 679B.175,
continuous in form and in an amount determined by the
Commissioner of not less than $100,000.
-
*AB74*

– 40 –
2. The Commissioner shall establish schedules for the amount
of the bond required, based on the amount of money received and
distributed by an administrator.
3. The bond must inure to the benefit of any person damaged
by any fraudulent act or conduct of the administrator [and must be
conditioned upon faithful accounting and application of all money
coming into the administrator’s possession] in connection with his
or her activities as an administrator.
4. A replacement bond must meet all requirements for the
initial bond.
Sec. 60. NRS 683A.0873 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.0873 1. Each administrator shall maintain at his or her
principal office adequate books and records of all transactions
between the administrator, the insurer and the insured. The books
and records must be maintained in accordance with prudent
standards of recordkeeping for insurance and with regulations of the
Commissioner for a period of 5 years after the transaction to which
they respectively relate. After the 5-year period, the administrator
may [remove] return the books and records [from the State, store
their contents on microfilm or return them] to the appropriate
insurer.
2. The Commissioner may examine, audit and inspect books
and records maintained by an administrator under the provisions of
this section to carry out the provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to
679B.300,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive [.] , of this act.
3. The names and addresses of insured persons and any other
material which is in the books and records of an administrator are
confidential except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115 and
except when used in proceedings against the administrator.
4. The insurer may inspect and examine all books and records
to the extent necessary to fulfill all contractual obligations to insured
persons, subject to restrictions in the written agreement between the
insurer and administrator.
Sec. 61. NRS 683A.0877 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.0877 1. All insurance charges and premiums collected
by an administrator on behalf of an insurer and return premiums
received from an insurer are held by the administrator in a fiduciary
capacity.
2. Money must be remitted within 15 days to the person or
persons entitled to it, or be deposited within 15 days in one or more
fiduciary accounts established and maintained by the administrator
in a bank, credit union or other financial institution . [in this state.]
-
*AB74*

– 41 –
The fiduciary accounts must be separate from the personal or
business accounts of the administrator.
3. If charges or premiums deposited in an account have been
collected for or on behalf of more than one insurer, the administrator
shall cause the bank, credit union or other financial institution where
the fiduciary account is maintained to record clearly the deposits
and withdrawals from the account on behalf of each insurer.
4. The administrator shall promptly obtain and keep copies of
the records of each fiduciary account and shall furnish any insurer
with copies of the records which pertain to him or her upon demand
of the insurer.
5. The administrator shall not pay any claim by withdrawing
money from his or her fiduciary account in which premiums or
charges are deposited.
6. Withdrawals must be made as provided in the agreement
between the insurer and the administrator for:
(a) Remittance to the insurer.
(b) Deposit in an account maintained in the name of the insurer.
(c) Transfer to and deposit in an account for the payment of
claims.
(d) Payment to a group policyholder for remittance to the insurer
entitled to the money.
(e) Payment to the administrator of the commission, fees or
charges of the administrator.
(f) Remittance of return premiums to persons entitled to them.
7. The administrator shall maintain copies of all records
relating to deposits or withdrawals and, upon the request of an
insurer, provide the insurer with copies of those records.
Sec. 62. NRS 683A.0892 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.0892 1. The Commissioner:
(a) Shall suspend or revoke the certificate of registration of an
administrator if the Commissioner has determined, after notice and a
hearing, that the administrator:
(1) Is in an unsound financial condition;
(2) Uses methods or practices in the conduct of business that
are hazardous or injurious to insured persons or members of the
general public; or
(3) Has failed to pay any judgment against the administrator
in this State within 60 days after the judgment became final.
(b) May suspend or revoke the certificate of registration of an
administrator if the Commissioner determines, after notice and a
hearing, that the administrator:
-
*AB74*

– 42 –
(1) Has knowingly violated or failed to comply with any
provision of this Code, any regulation adopted pursuant to this Code
or any order of the Commissioner;
(2) Has refused to be examined by the Commissioner or has
refused to produce accounts, records or files for examination upon
the request of the Commissioner;
(3) Has, without just cause, refused to pay claims or perform
services pursuant to the administrator’s contracts or has, without just
cause, caused persons to accept less than the amount of money owed
to them pursuant to the contracts, or has caused persons to employ
an attorney or bring a civil action against the administrator to
receive full payment or settlement of claims;
(4) Is affiliated with, managed by or owned by another
administrator or an insurer who transacts insurance in this State
without a certificate of authority or certificate of registration;
(5) Fails to comply with any of the requirements for a
certificate of registration;
(6) Has been convicted of, or has entered a plea of guilty,
guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to, a felony, whether or
not adjudication was withheld;
(7) Has had his or her authority to act as an administrator in
another state limited, suspended or revoked; or
(8) Has failed to file an annual report in accordance with
NRS 683A.08528.
(c) May suspend or revoke the certificate of registration of an
administrator if the Commissioner determines, after notice and a
hearing, that a responsible person:
(1) Has refused to provide any information relating to the
administrator’s affairs or refused to perform any other legal
obligation relating to an examination upon request by the
Commissioner; or
(2) Has been convicted of, or has entered a plea of guilty,
guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to, a felony committed on
or after October 1, 2003, whether or not adjudication was withheld.
(d) May, upon notice to the administrator, suspend the
certificate of registration of the administrator pending a hearing if:
(1) The administrator is impaired or insolvent;
(2) A proceeding for receivership, conservatorship or
rehabilitation has been commenced against the administrator in any
state; or
(3) The financial condition or the business practices of the
administrator represent an imminent threat to the public health,
safety or welfare of the residents of this State.
(e) May revoke the certificate of registration of an
administrator if:
-
*AB74*

– 43 –
(1) The Commissioner suspends the certificate of
registration of the administrator pursuant to paragraph (d); and
(2) The administrator or a responsible person has not
responded to the notice required by paragraph (d) within 10 days
after the date on which the Commissioner transmitted the notice.
(f) May, in addition to or in lieu of the suspension or revocation
of the certificate of registration of the administrator, impose a fine
of $2,000 for each act or violation.
2. As used in this section, “responsible person” means any
person who is responsible for or controls or is authorized to control
or advise the affairs of an administrator, including, without
limitation:
(a) A member of the board of directors, board of trustees,
executive committee or other governing board or committee of the
administrator;
(b) The president, vice president, chief executive officer, chief
operating officer or any other principal officer of an administrator, if
the administrator is a corporation;
(c) A partner or member of the administrator, if the
administrator is a partnership, association or limited-liability
company; and
(d) Any shareholder or member of the administrator who
directly or indirectly holds 10 percent or more of the voting stock,
voting securities or voting interest of the administrator.
Sec. 63. NRS 683A.179 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.179 1. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from providing
information to a covered person concerning:
(1) The amount of any copayment or coinsurance for a
prescription drug; or
(2) The availability of a less expensive alternative or generic
drug including, without limitation, information concerning clinical
efficacy of such a drug;
(b) Penalize a pharmacist or pharmacy for providing the
information described in paragraph (a) or selling a less expensive
alternative or generic drug to a covered person;
(c) Prohibit a pharmacy from offering or providing delivery
services directly to a covered person as an ancillary service of the
pharmacy; or
(d) If the pharmacy benefit manager manages a pharmacy
benefits plan that provides coverage through a network plan, charge
a copayment or coinsurance for a prescription drug in an amount
that is greater than the total amount paid to a pharmacy that is in the
network of providers under contract with the third party.
2. The provisions of this section:
-
*AB74*

– 44 –
(a) Must not be construed to authorize a pharmacist to dispense
a drug that has not been prescribed by a practitioner, as defined in
NRS 639.0125, except to the extent authorized by a specific
provision of law, including, without limitation, NRS 453C.120,
639.28078 and 639.28085.
(b) Do not apply to an institutional pharmacy, as defined in NRS
639.0085, or a pharmacist working in such a pharmacy as an
employee or independent contractor.
3. As used in this section, “network plan” [means a health
benefit plan offered by a health carrier under which] has the
[financing and delivery of medical care is provided, in whole or]
meaning ascribed to it in [part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the carrier. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.] NRS 687B.645.
Sec. 64. NRS 683A.461 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.461 1. If the Commissioner denies an application for,
or refuses to renew, a license, the Commissioner shall notify the
applicant or licensee and state in writing the reason for the denial or
refusal. The applicant or licensee may apply in writing, pursuant to
NRS 679B.310, for a hearing before the Commissioner to determine
the reasonableness of the denial or refusal. [The hearing must be
held within 30 days and conducted pursuant to NRS 679B.330. The
applicant or licensee may waive the requirement to hold the hearing
within 30 days, in writing, before a hearing is held.]
2. The Commissioner may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew
the license of a business organization if the Commissioner finds,
after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, that a violation by a
natural person was known or should have been known by one or
more of the partners, officers or managers acting on behalf of the
organization, the violation was not reported to the Commissioner
and no corrective action was taken.
3. In addition to or in lieu of a denial, suspension or revocation
of, or refusal to renew, a license, an administrative fine of not less
than $25 nor more than $500 may be imposed for each violation or
act. An order imposing a fine must specify the date, not less than 15
days nor more than 30 days after the date of the order, before which
the fine must be paid. If the fine is not paid when due, the
Commissioner shall immediately revoke the license of a licensee
and the fine must be recovered in a civil action brought on behalf of
the Commissioner by the Attorney General. The Commissioner
shall immediately deposit all such fines collected with the State
Treasurer for credit to the State General Fund.
4. The Commissioner retains the authority to enforce the
provisions of, and impose any penalty or pursue any remedy
authorized by, this title against any person who is under
-
*AB74*

– 45 –
investigation for or charged with a violation of a provision of this
title even if the license or registration of the person has been
surrendered or has lapsed by operation of law.
5. A licensee must pay all applicable fees, including renewal
fees, and maintain any required education during a period of
suspension of his or her license.
Sec. 65. NRS 683C.018 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683C.018 The provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS ,
sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act, and NRS 683A.301,
683A.341 and 683A.351 apply to an insurance consultant.
Sec. 66. NRS 684A.027 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.027 “Home state” means:
1. The District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States in which an independent [, company, staff] or public
adjuster maintains his, her or its principal place of residence or
principal place of business and is licensed to act as a resident
independent [, company, staff] or public adjuster; or
2. If neither the state in which the adjuster maintains his or her
principal place of residence nor the state in which the adjuster
maintains his, her or its principal place of business licenses
independent [, company, staff] or public adjusters for the line of
authority sought by the adjuster, a state:
(a) Which has an examination requirement;
(b) In which the adjuster is licensed; and
(c) Which the adjuster declares to be the home state.
Sec. 67. NRS 684A.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.030 1. “Independent adjuster” means [an] :
(a) An adjuster who is representing the interests of an insurer or
a self-insurer and who:
[(a)] (1) Contracts for compensation with the insurer or self-
insurer as an independent contractor or an employee of an
independent contractor;
[(b)] (2) Is treated for tax purposes by the insurer or self-insurer
in a manner consistent with an independent contractor rather than an
employee; and
[(c)] (3) Investigates, negotiates or settles property, casualty or
surety claims, including, without limitation, workers’ compensation
claims, for the insurer or self-insurer.
(b) A salaried employee of an insurer who:
(1) Investigates, negotiates or settles property, casualty or
surety claims, including, without limitation, workers’
compensation claims; and
(2) Obtains a license pursuant to this chapter.
(c) A person who investigates, negotiates or settles workers’
compensation claims under the authority of a third-party
-
*AB74*

– 46 –
administrator who holds a certificate of registration issued by the
Commissioner pursuant to NRS 683A.08524.
2. “Public adjuster” means an adjuster employed by and
representing solely the financial interests of the insured named in
the policy. The term does not include an adjuster who investigates,
negotiates or settles workers’ compensation claims.
[3. “Company adjuster” means a salaried employee of an
insurer who:
(a) Investigates, negotiates or settles property, casualty or surety
claims, including, without limitation, workers’ compensation
claims; and
(b) Obtains a license pursuant to this chapter.
4. “Staff adjuster” means a person who investigates, negotiates
or settles workers’ compensation claims under the authority of a
third-party administrator who holds a certificate of registration
issued by the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 683A.08524.]
Sec. 68. NRS 684A.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
684A.060, no person may act as, or hold himself or herself out to be,
an adjuster in this State unless then licensed as such under the
applicable adjuster’s license issued under the provisions of this
chapter.
2. Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 684A.060, a person
who acts as an adjuster in this State without a license is subject to an
administrative fine of not more than $1,000 for each violation.
4. A salaried employee of an insurer who investigates,
negotiates or settles workers’ compensation claims may, but is not
required to, obtain a license as [a company] an independent adjuster
pursuant to this chapter. The provisions of subsections 1, 2 and 3 do
not apply to a salaried employee of an insurer. A salaried employee
of an insurer is subject to the requirements of NRS 616B.0275.
Sec. 69. NRS 684A.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.050 [1.] The Commissioner may license an individual
as an independent adjuster [,] or a public [adjuster, a company
adjuster or a staff] adjuster. No individual shall be licensed
concurrently under the same license or separate licenses as more
than one such type of adjuster.
[2. A company adjuster and a staff adjuster shall pay the same
fees as provided for an independent adjuster in NRS 680B.010 and
680C.110.]
Sec. 70. NRS 684A.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.090 1. The applicant for a license as an adjuster shall
file a written application therefor with the Commissioner on forms
-
*AB74*

– 47 –
prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner. As part of, or in
connection with, the application, the applicant shall furnish
information as to his or her identity, personal history, experience,
financial responsibility, business record and other pertinent matters
as reasonably required by the Commissioner to determine the
applicant’s eligibility and qualifications for the license.
2. If the applicant is a natural person, the application must
include the social security number of the applicant and include a
completed copy of the Uniform Individual Application.
3. If the applicant is a business entity, the application must
identify the natural person designated pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 684A.080 and must include:
(a) A completed copy of the Uniform Business Entity
Application;
(b) The name of each member, officer and director of the
business entity, as applicable;
(c) The name of each executive officer and director who owns
more than 10 percent of the outstanding voting securities of the
applicant; and
(d) The name of any other individual who owns more than 10
percent of the outstanding voting securities of the applicant.
 Each such member, officer, director and individual shall furnish
information to the Commissioner as though applying for an
individual license.
4. If the applicant is a nonresident of this state, the application
must be accompanied by an appointment of the Commissioner as
process agent and agreement to appear pursuant to NRS 684A.200.
5. The application must be accompanied by the applicable
license fee as specified in NRS 680B.010 [and subsection 2 of NRS
684A.050] and, in addition to any other fee or charge, all applicable
fees required pursuant to NRS 680C.110 . [and subsection 2 of
NRS 684A.050.]
6. No applicant for such a license may willfully misrepresent
or withhold any fact or information called for in the application
form or in connection therewith. A violation of this subsection is a
gross misdemeanor.
7. If the Commissioner determines that the information
contained in a Uniform Individual Application or Uniform Business
Entity Application submitted with an application pursuant to this
section is not true, correct and complete to the best of the applicant’s
knowledge and belief, the Commissioner may refuse to issue a
license to the applicant or suspend or revoke the applicant’s license.
Sec. 71. NRS 684A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.100 Each person who intends to apply for a license as an
adjuster must, before applying for the license, personally take and
-
*AB74*

– 48 –
pass to the Commissioner’s satisfaction a written examination
testing the applicant’s qualifications and competence to act as an
adjuster and his or her knowledge of pertinent provisions of this
Code unless:
1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 of NRS 684A.115, the person:
(a) Is not a resident of this State;
(b) Has passed an examination to become licensed as an adjuster
in the person’s home state; and
(c) Is currently licensed and in good standing in the person’s
home state as an adjuster; or
2. The person was licensed in this State as the same type of
adjuster within the 24-month period immediately preceding the date
of the application, unless the previous license was revoked or
suspended or its continuation was refused by the Commissioner.
Sec. 72. NRS 684A.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.115 1. The Commissioner shall issue a nonresident
license as an adjuster to a nonresident person if:
(a) The person is currently licensed in good standing as an
adjuster in the resident or home state of the person;
(b) The person has submitted the proper request for licensure
and has paid the fees required pursuant to NRS 680B.010 and, in
addition to any other fee or charge, all applicable fees required
pursuant to NRS 680C.110;
(c) The person has submitted or transmitted to the
Commissioner the appropriate completed application for licensure;
and
(d) [The] Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the
home state of the person awards nonresident licenses as an adjuster
to persons of this State on the same basis. If the home state of the
person requires a nonresident applicant for a license as an
adjuster to take and pass an examination in that state which tests
the applicant’s qualifications and competence to act as an
adjuster, the person must also take and pass the examination
required by NRS 684A.100.
2. The Commissioner may verify the licensing status of the
nonresident person through any appropriate database, including,
without limitation, the Producer Database maintained by the
National Insurance Producer Registry, its affiliates or subsidiaries,
or may request that the nonresident person submit proof that the
nonresident person is licensed and in good standing in the person’s
home state as an adjuster.
3. As a condition to the continuation of a nonresident license as
an adjuster, the nonresident adjuster shall maintain a resident license
as an adjuster in the home state of the adjuster. A nonresident
-
*AB74*

– 49 –
license as an adjuster issued under this section shall be terminated
and must be surrendered immediately to the Commissioner if the
resident license as an adjuster in the home state is terminated for any
reason, unless:
(a) The termination is due to the nonresident adjuster being
issued a new resident license as an adjuster in a new home state; and
(b) The new resident license as an adjuster is from a state that
has reciprocity with this State.
4. The Commissioner shall give notice of the termination of a
resident license as an adjuster within 30 days after the date of the
termination to any states that issued a nonresident license as an
adjuster to the holder of the resident license. If the resident license
as an adjuster was terminated due to a change in the home state of
the adjuster, the notice must include both the previous and current
address of the adjuster.
5. The Commissioner shall terminate a nonresident license as
an adjuster issued pursuant to this section if the adjuster establishes
legal residency in this State and fails to apply for a resident license
as an adjuster within 90 days after establishing legal residency.
Sec. 73. NRS 684A.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.120 1. The Commissioner shall prescribe the form of
the adjuster license, which shall state:
(a) The licensee’s name, business address and a personal
identification number;
(b) The classification of the license, whether as an independent
adjuster [,] or a public [adjuster, a company adjuster or a staff]
adjuster;
(c) Date of issuance and general conditions as to expiration and
termination; and
(d) Such other conditions as the Commissioner deems proper.
2. The Commissioner may not issue a license in a trade name
unless the name has been registered as provided by law.
3. In order to assist in the performance of the Commissioner’s
duties, the Commissioner may contract with any nongovernmental
entity, including, without limitation, the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners or its affiliates or subsidiaries, to perform
any ministerial function, including, without limitation, the collection
of fees and data, relating to licensing, that the Commissioner deems
appropriate.
Sec. 74. NRS 684A.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.130 1. Each license issued or renewed under this
chapter continues in force for 3 years unless it is suspended, revoked
or otherwise terminated. A license may be renewed upon payment
of all applicable fees for renewal to the Commissioner, completion
of any other requirement for renewal of the license specified in this
-
*AB74*

– 50 –
chapter and submission of the statement required pursuant to NRS
684A.143 if the licensee is a natural person. The statement, if
required, must be submitted, all requirements must be completed
and all applicable fees must be paid on or before the renewal date
for the license.
2. Any license not so renewed expires on the renewal date. The
Commissioner may accept a request for renewal received by the
Commissioner within 30 days after the expiration of the license if
the request is accompanied by:
(a) A fee for renewal of 150 percent of all applicable fees
otherwise required, except for any fee required pursuant to NRS
680C.110 ; [and subsection 2 of NRS 684A.050;]
(b) If the person requesting renewal is a natural person, the
statement required pursuant to NRS 684A.143;
(c) Proof of successful completion of any requirement for an
examination unless exempt pursuant to NRS 684A.105; and
(d) If applicable, a request for a waiver of the time limit for
renewal and of any fine or sanction otherwise required or imposed
because of the failure of the licensee to renew his or her license
because of military service, extended medical disability or other
extenuating circumstance.
3. An adjuster who is unable to comply with the procedures
and requirements to renew a license due to military service, long-
term medical disability or some other extenuating circumstance may
request waiver of same and a waiver of any requirement relating to
an examination, fine or other sanction imposed for failure to comply
with such procedures or requirements.
4. An adjuster shall inform the Commissioner by any means
acceptable to the Commissioner of any change in the residence
address or business address for the home state or in the legal name
of the adjuster within 30 days of the change.
5. In order to assist in the performance of the duties of the
Commissioner, the Commissioner may contract with
nongovernmental entities, including, without limitation, the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners or its affiliates or
subsidiaries, to perform any ministerial function, including, without
limitation, the collection of fees and data, related to licensing that
the Commissioner may deem appropriate.
6. This section does not apply to temporary licenses issued
under NRS 684A.150.
7. As used in this section, “renewal date” means:
(a) For the first renewal of the license, the last day of the month
which is 3 years after the month in which the Commissioner
originally issued the license.
-
*AB74*

– 51 –
(b) For each renewal after the first renewal of the license, the
last day of the month which is 3 years after the month in which the
license was last due to be renewed.
Sec. 75. NRS 684A.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.150 1. In the event of death or inability to act as a
licensed independent adjuster [,] of the type described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 of NRS 684A.030, the Commissioner may issue
a temporary license as an independent adjuster of the type described
in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 684A.030 to another
individual qualified therefor except as to the taking and passing of
the required examination, to enable such individual to continue the
business of the deceased licensee or the licensee who has a
disability.
2. The temporary license shall be valid for 6 months, or until
the temporary licensee earlier qualifies for a regular license as an
independent adjuster [.] of the type described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 684A.030.
3. A temporary license issued pursuant to this section may be
renewed for one additional period of 180 days if:
(a) The temporary licensee, on or before a date specified by the
Commissioner as the last day on which the temporary license is
renewable, submits to the Commissioner a written request which
includes, without limitation, sufficient justification for the renewal;
and
(b) The Commissioner approves the request.
Sec. 76. NRS 684A.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
684A.180 1. Each adjuster shall keep at his or her business
address shown on the adjuster’s license a record of all transactions
under the license.
2. The record shall include:
(a) A copy of each contract between an independent adjuster of
the type described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS
684A.030 and an insurer or self-insurer.
(b) A copy of all investigations or adjustments undertaken.
(c) A statement of any fee, commission or other compensation
received or to be received by the adjuster on account of such
investigation or adjustment.
3. The adjuster shall make such records available for
examination by the Commissioner at all times, and shall retain the
records for at least 3 years after the closure of the claim to which the
records apply.
4. An independent adjuster of the type described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 of NRS 684A.030 shall comply with any record
retention policy agreed to in a contract between the independent
adjuster and an insurer or self-insurer to the extent that such a policy
-
*AB74*

– 52 –
imposes a requirement to retain records for a longer period than the
period required by this section.
Sec. 77. NRS 685A.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
685A.120 1. No person may act as, hold himself or herself
out as or be a surplus lines broker with respect to subjects of
insurance for which this State is the insured’s home state unless the
person is licensed as such by the Commissioner pursuant to this
chapter.
2. Any person who has been licensed by this State as a
producer of insurance for [general lines for at least 6 months,]
property and casualty insurance, or has been licensed in another
state as a surplus lines broker and continues to be licensed in that
state, and who is deemed by the Commissioner to be competent and
trustworthy with respect to the handling of surplus lines may be
licensed as a surplus lines broker upon:
(a) Application for a license and payment of all applicable fees
for a license;
(b) Submitting the statement required pursuant to NRS
685A.127; and
(c) Passing any examination prescribed by the Commissioner on
the subject of surplus lines.
3. An application for a license must be submitted to the
Commissioner on a form designated and furnished by the
Commissioner. The application must include the social security
number of the applicant.
4. A license issued or renewed pursuant to this chapter
continues in force for 3 years unless it is suspended, revoked or
otherwise terminated. The license may be renewed upon submission
of the statement required pursuant to NRS 685A.127 and payment
of all applicable fees for renewal to the Commissioner on or before
the renewal date for the license.
5. A license which is not renewed expires on the renewal date.
The Commissioner may accept a request for renewal received by the
Commissioner within 30 days after the expiration of the license if
the request is accompanied by:
(a) The statement required pursuant to NRS 685A.127;
(b) All applicable fees for renewal; and
(c) A penalty in an amount that is equal to 50 percent of all
applicable fees for renewal, except for any fee required pursuant to
NRS 680C.110.
6. As used in this section, “renewal date” means:
(a) For the first renewal of the license, the last day of the month
which is 3 years after the month in which the Commissioner
originally issued the license.
-
*AB74*

– 53 –
(b) For each renewal after the first renewal of the license, the
last day of the month which is 3 years after the month in which the
license was last due to be renewed.
Sec. 78. NRS 685B.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
685B.050 1. Any act of transacting an insurance business as
set forth in NRS 685B.030 by any unauthorized insurer is equivalent
to and constitutes an irrevocable appointment by such an insurer,
binding upon the insurer, the insurer’s executor or administrator, or
successor in interest if a corporation, of the Commissioner or the
successor in office of the Commissioner, to be the true and lawful
attorney of such an insurer upon whom may be served all lawful
process in any action, suit or proceeding in any court by the
Commissioner or by the State and upon whom may be served any
notice, order, pleading or process in any proceeding before the
Commissioner and which arises out of transacting an insurance
business in this state by such an insurer. Any act of transacting an
insurance business in this state by any unauthorized insurer is
signification of its agreement that any such lawful process in such a
court action, suit or proceeding and any such notice, order, pleading
or process in such an administrative proceeding before the
Commissioner so served is of the same legal force and validity as
personal service or process in this state upon such an insurer.
2. Service of process in such an action must be made by
delivering to and leaving with the Commissioner, or some person in
apparent charge of the office of the Commissioner, [two copies] one
copy thereof and by payment to the Commissioner of the fee
prescribed by law. Service upon the Commissioner as attorney is
service upon the principal.
3. The Commissioner shall forthwith forward [by certified mail
one of the copies of] such process or such notice, order, pleading or
process in proceedings before the Commissioner to the defendant in
such a court proceeding or to whom the notice, order, pleading or
process in such an administrative proceeding is addressed or
directed at its last known principal place of business . [and shall
keep a record of all process so served on him or her which must
show the day and hour of service.] Such service is sufficient if:
(a) Notice of such service and a copy of the court process or the
notice, order, pleading or process in such an administrative
proceeding are sent within 10 days thereafter by certified mail by
the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney in the court proceeding or by
the Commissioner in the administrative proceeding to the defendant
in the court proceeding or to whom the notice, order, pleading or
process in such an administrative proceeding is addressed or
directed at the last known principal place of business of the
defendant in the court or administrative proceeding.
-
*AB74*

– 54 –
(b) The defendant’s receipt or receipts issued by the post office
with which the letter is certified, showing the name of the sender of
the letter and the name and address of the person or insurer to whom
the letter is addressed, and an affidavit of the plaintiff or the
plaintiff’s attorney in a court proceeding or of the Commissioner in
an administrative proceeding, showing compliance therewith are
filed with the clerk of the court in which such an action, suit or
proceeding is pending or with the Commissioner in administrative
proceedings, on or before the date the defendant in the court or
administrative proceedings is required to appear or respond thereto,
or within such further time as the court or Commissioner may allow.
4. No plaintiff is entitled to a judgment or determination by
default in any court or administrative proceeding in which court
process or notice, order, pleading or process in proceedings before
the Commissioner is served under this section until 45 days after the
date of filing of the affidavit of compliance.
5. For the purposes of this section, “process” in an action in a
court includes only a summons or the initial documents served in
such an action. The Commissioner is not required to serve any
documents in such an action after the initial service of process.
6. Nothing in this section limits or affects the right to serve any
process, notice, order or demand upon any person or insurer in any
other manner permitted by law.
Sec. 79. Chapter 686A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 80. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or
3, an insurer shall not refuse to insure, refuse to continue to
insure or limit the amount of coverage available to a person on the
basis of race, religion, sex, marital status or national origin.
2. The provisions of this section do not prohibit an insurer
from taking marital status into account for the purpose of defining
persons eligible for dependent benefits.
3. The provisions of this section do not prohibit or limit the
operation of fraternal benefit societies authorized to do business in
this State pursuant to chapter 695A of NRS.
Sec. 81. 1. An insurer shall maintain its books, documents
and other business records, including, without limitation,
recordings:
(a) In such an order that data regarding complaints, claims,
rating, underwriting and marketing are accessible and retrievable
for examination by the Commissioner; and
(b) For a period of not less than 5 years after the date on
which the book, document or other business record was created.
-
*AB74*

– 55 –
2. An insurer shall maintain a complete record of all
complaints received since the date of the most recent examination
conducted pursuant to sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act, which
must include, without limitation:
(a) The total number of complaints;
(b) The classification of each complaint by line of insurance;
(c) The nature of each complaint;
(d) The disposition of each complaint; and
(e) The time it took for the insurer to process each complaint.
3. As used in this section, “complaint” means any
communication made in writing, by telephone or by electronic
mail which primarily expresses a grievance.
Sec. 82. A person shall not make false or fraudulent
statements or representations on or relating to an application for a
policy for the purpose of obtaining a fee, commission, money or
other benefit.
Sec. 83. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or
4, an insurer that issues policies of property and casualty
insurance shall provide to a primary insured, within 30 days after
the date on which the primary insured makes a written request for
such information, the following loss information for the 3 policy
years immediately preceding the date of the request:
(a) For all claims, the date and description of the claim and
the total amount of payments; and
(b) For any other occurrence not described in paragraph (a),
the date and description of the occurrence.
2. If a prospective insurer requests that a primary insured
provide detailed loss information which is beyond the scope of the
information described in subsection 1, the primary insured may
submit to the insurer, by mail, electronic mail or other means, a
written request for the additional information. A prospective
insurer shall not request more detailed loss information than is
reasonably required to underwrite the same line or class of
insurance.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, an insurer
that receives a written request from a primary insured pursuant to
subsection 2 shall provide the information to the insured as soon
as practicable, but in no event later than 20 days after the date on
which the insurer receives the written request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide loss reserve information. A prospective insurer shall not
refuse to insure an applicant solely because the prospective
insurer is unable to obtain loss reserve information.
Sec. 84. As used in sections 84 to 93, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
-
*AB74*

– 56 –
in sections 85 to 88, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 85. “Domestic violence” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 33.018.
Sec. 86. “Domestic violence related medical condition”
means a medical condition sustained by a subject of domestic
violence which arises in whole or in part from an act or pattern of
domestic violence.
Sec. 87. “Domestic violence status” means the fact or
perception that a person is, has been or may be a subject of
domestic violence, without regard to whether the person has
sustained a domestic violence related medical condition.
Sec. 88. “Insurance professional” means a producer of
insurance, adjuster or administrator licensed pursuant to the
provisions of this title.
Sec. 89. “Subject of domestic violence” means a person:
1. Against whom an act of domestic violence has been
directed;
2. Who has a past or current injury, illness or disorder that
resulted from domestic violence or other domestic violence related
medical condition; or
3. Who seeks, may have sought or had reason to seek:
(1) Medical or psychological treatment for domestic
violence; or
(2) Protection or shelter from domestic violence, including,
without limitation, a temporary or extended order for protection
issued by a court.
Sec. 90. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
person shall not:
(a) Deny, refuse to issue, refuse to renew or reissue, cancel or
otherwise terminate, restrict or exclude insurance coverage on or
add a premium differential to a policy of insurance for an
applicant or insured on the basis of the domestic violence status of
the applicant or insured; or
(b) Except as otherwise permitted or required by the laws of
this State relating to acts of domestic violence committed by an
insurance beneficiary, exclude, limit or deny benefits on a policy
of insurance on the basis of the domestic violence status of an
insured, including, without limitation, denying a claim solely
because the claim involves an act that constitutes domestic
violence.
2. The provisions of this section do not prohibit an insurer or
insurance professional from declining to issue a life insurance
policy if the applicant or prospective owner of the policy is or
would be designated as a beneficiary of the policy, and:
-
*AB74*

– 57 –
(a) The applicant or prospective owner of the policy lacks an
insurable interest in the insured;
(b) The applicant or prospective owner of the policy is known,
on the basis of medical, law enforcement or court records, to have
committed an act of domestic violence against the proposed
insured; or
(c) The insured or prospective insured:
(1) Is a subject of domestic violence; and
(2) Has objected to, or a person who has assumed the care
of the insured or prospective insured if a minor or incapacitated
person has objected to, the policy on the grounds that the policy
would be issued to or for the direct or indirect benefit of the
perpetrator of domestic violence.
Sec. 91. 1. A person shall not engage in any conduct that is
unfairly discriminatory pursuant to this section.
2. If an insurer or insurance professional has information in
its possession that clearly indicates that an insured or applicant is
a subject of domestic violence, it is unfairly discriminatory for a
person employed by or contracting with the insurer or insurance
professional to disclose or transfer confidential domestic violence
information for any purpose or to any person, except where the
disclosure or transfer is made:
(a) To the insured or applicant who is a subject of domestic
violence or a person who is designated in writing by the insured or
applicant. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a
subject of domestic violence from obtaining his or her insurance
records.
(b) To a provider of health care:
(1) For the direct provision of health care services; or
(2) Who is designated in writing by the insured or applicant
who is a subject of domestic violence.
(c) Pursuant to an order of the Commissioner or a court of
competent jurisdiction or otherwise required by law.
(d) When necessary for a valid business purpose to transfer
information that contains confidential domestic violence
information which cannot reasonably be segregated, without
undue hardship. Confidential domestic violence information may
be disclosed pursuant to this paragraph only:
(1) If the recipient of the information executes a written
agreement to be bound by the prohibitions of this section in all
respects and to be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this
State for enforcement of this section for the benefit of the
applicant or insured; and
(2) To the following persons:
-
*AB74*

– 58 –
(I) A reinsurer that indemnifies or seeks to indemnify all
or any part of a policy covering a subject of domestic violence and
that cannot underwrite or satisfy its obligations under the
reinsurance agreement without the disclosure of the information;
(II) A party to a proposed or consummated sale,
transfer, merger or consolidation of all or part of the business of
the insurer or insurance professional;
(III) Medical or claims personnel contracting with the
insurer or insurance professional, only if necessary to process an
application, to perform the duties of the insurer or insurance
professional under the policy or to protect the safety or privacy of
a subject of domestic violence; or
(IV) If the confidential domestic violence information is
an address or telephone number, to persons or entities with whom
the insurer or insurance professional transacts business only
where the business cannot be transacted without the address or
telephone number.
(e) To an attorney who needs the information to represent the
insurer or insurance professional effectively, if the insurer or
insurance professional:
(1) Notifies the attorney of obligations of the insurer or
insurance professional under this section; and
(2) Requests that the attorney exercise due diligence to
protect the confidential domestic violence information consistent
with the obligation of the attorney to represent the insurer or
insurance professional.
(f) To the owner of the policy or assignee, in the course of
delivering the policy, if the policy contains information about
domestic violence status.
(g) To any other person or entity deemed appropriate by the
Commissioner.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, it is unfairly
discriminatory to:
(a) Request information about acts of domestic violence or
domestic violence status or make use of that information, however
obtained, except where the request for or use of information is for
the purpose of complying with a legal obligation or to verify a
claim that a person is a subject of domestic violence.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, terminate
coverage under a policy of group health insurance for a subject of
domestic violence because coverage was originally issued in the
name of the perpetrator of domestic violence, and the perpetrator
has divorced, separated from or lost custody of the subject of
domestic violence or the coverage of the perpetrator has been
terminated voluntarily or involuntarily. The provisions of this
-
*AB74*

– 59 –
paragraph do not prohibit an insurer or insurance professional
from requiring the subject of domestic violence to pay the full
premium for coverage under the policy of group health insurance
or from requiring, as a condition of coverage, that the subject of
domestic violence reside or work within the geographic service
area of the insurer or insurance professional. If the insurer or
insurance professional offers conversion to an equivalent
individual plan, the insurer or insurance professional may
terminate the coverage under a policy of group health insurance
after the continuation coverage required by this paragraph has
been in force for 18 months. The continuation coverage required
by this paragraph:
(1) Shall be satisfied by coverage required under the
Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 which is
provided to a subject of domestic violence; and
(2) Is not intended to be in addition to coverage provided
under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of
1985.
4. For a policy of life insurance, to the extent otherwise
permitted by sections 84 to 93, inclusive, of this act and any other
applicable law, the provisions of subsection 3 do not prohibit an
insurer or insurance professional from asking about a medical
condition or from using medical information to underwrite a
policy or to carry out its duties under the policy, even if the
medical information is related to a medical condition that the
insurer or insurance professional knows or has reason to know is
related to domestic violence.
5. As used in this section “confidential domestic violence
information” means information concerning:
(a) An act of domestic violence;
(b) The domestic violence status of a subject of domestic
violence; or
(c) The status of an applicant or insured as a family member,
employer or associate of, or a person in a relationship with, a
subject of domestic violence.
Sec. 92. 1. A person shall not engage in any conduct that is
unfairly discriminatory pursuant to this section.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, for a policy
of property or casualty insurance it is unfairly discriminatory to:
(a) Exclude or limit payment for a covered loss or deny a
covered claim incurred as a result of domestic violence by a
person other than a co-insured;
(b) Fail to pay losses arising out of domestic violence to an
innocent insured who makes a first-party claim, to the extent of
the legal interest of the first-party claimant in the covered
-
*AB74*

– 60 –
property, if the loss is caused by the intentional act of an insured;
or
(c) Use exclusions or limitations on coverage which the
Commissioner has determined unreasonably restrict the ability of
a subject of domestic violence to be indemnified for losses.
3. The provisions of subsection 2:
(a) Do not require payment in excess of the loss or policy
limits; and
(b) Do not prohibit an insurer or insurance professional from
applying reasonable standards to proof of claims.
Sec. 93. An insurer or insurance professional that takes an
action that adversely affects an applicant or insured on the basis
of a medical condition that the insurer or insurance professional
knows or has reason to know is related to domestic violence:
1. Shall explain the reason for its action to the applicant or
insured in writing; and
2. At the request of the Commissioner, must be able to
demonstrate that the action and any applicable policy provisions:
(a) Do not have the purpose or effect of treating domestic
violence status as a medical condition or underwriting criteria;
(b) Are not based on any actual or perceived correlation
between a medical condition and domestic violence;
(c) Are otherwise permitted by law and applied in the same
manner and to the same extent to all applicants and insureds with
a similar medical condition, without regard to whether the
condition or claim is related to domestic violence; and
(d) Except for claims actions, are based on a determination,
made in conformance with sound actuarial principles and
otherwise supported by actual or reasonably anticipated
experience, that there is a correlation between the medical
condition and a material increase in insurance risk.
Sec. 94. NRS 686A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686A.010 The purpose of NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,]
686A.325, inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act is
to regulate trade practices in the business of insurance in accordance
with the intent of Congress as expressed in the Act of Congress
approved March 9, 1945, being c. 20, 59 Stat. 33, also designated as
15 U.S.C. §§ 1011 to 1015, inclusive, and Title V of Public Law
106-102, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6801 et seq.
Sec. 95. NRS 686A.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686A.015 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
Commissioner has exclusive jurisdiction in regulating the subject of
trade practices in the business of insurance in this state.
2. The Commissioner shall establish a program within the
Division to investigate any act or practice which constitutes an
-
*AB74*

– 61 –
unfair or deceptive trade practice in violation of the provisions of
NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive [.] , and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act.
3. The powers conferred upon the Commissioner by NRS
686A.010 to 686A.325, inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive,
of this act, are in addition to and supplemental to any other
powers conferred upon the Commissioner to enforce any
penalties, fines or forfeitures authorized by law with respect to any
unfair method of competition or any unfair or deceptive act or
practice in the business of insurance.
Sec. 96. NRS 686A.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686A.020 A person shall not engage in this state in any
practice which is defined in NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,]
686A.325, inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act as,
or determined pursuant to NRS 686A.170 to be, an unfair method of
competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business
of insurance.
Sec. 97. NRS 686A.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686A.030 A person shall not [make,] :
1. Make, issue, circulate or cause to be made, issued or
circulated, any estimate, illustration, circular, statement, sales
presentation or comparison which:
[1.] (a) Misrepresents the benefits, advantages, conditions or
terms of any insurance policy;
[2.] (b) Misrepresents the dividends or share of the surplus to be
received on any insurance policy;
[3.] (c) Makes any false or misleading statement as to the
dividends or share of surplus previously paid on any insurance
policy;
[4.] (d) Is misleading or is a misrepresentation as to the
financial condition of any person, or as to the legal reserve system
upon which any life insurer operates;
[5.] (e) Uses any name or title of any policy or class of
insurance policies misrepresenting the true nature thereof;
[6.] (f) Is a misrepresentation , including, without limitation,
any intentional or unintentional misrepresentation of a premium
rate, for the purpose of inducing or tending to induce the purchase,
lapse, forfeiture, exchange, conversion or surrender of any insurance
policy;
[7.] (g) Is a misrepresentation for the purpose of effecting a
pledge or assignment of or effecting a loan against any insurance
policy; [or
8.] (h) Misrepresents any insurance policy as being shares of
stock [.] ; or
-
*AB74*

– 62 –
(i) Offers or provides an insurance policy as an inducement to
the purchase of another policy or contract or otherwise uses the
terms “free,” “no cost” or other terms of similar meaning.
2. As an inducement to purchase an insurance policy, issue
or deliver or permit any producer, officer or employee to issue or
deliver:
(a) Agency company stock or other capital stock;
(b) Benefit certificates or shares in any common law
corporation;
(c) Securities of any special or advisory board contracts; or
(d) Any other contracts promising returns and profits.
Sec. 98. NRS 686A.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686A.040 No person shall make, publish, disseminate,
circulate or place before the public, or cause, directly or indirectly,
to be made, published, disseminated, circulated or placed before the
public, through electronic mail or other electronic means, on an
internet website, in a newspaper, magazine or other publication, or
in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter , [or] poster [,] or
in any electronic form, or over any radio or television station, or in
any other way, any advertisement, announcement or statement
containing any assertion, representation or statement with respect to
the business of insurance or with respect to any person in the
conduct of his or her insurance business, which is untrue, deceptive
or misleading.
Sec. 99. NRS 686A.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
686A.085 1. A person, bank or affiliate shall not [in any
manner extend] require as a condition precedent to the lending of
money or extension of credit, [lease] or [sell property of] any [kind,
or furnish any services, or fix or vary] renewal thereof, that the
[consideration for any of them, on the condition] person to whom
such money is lent or credit is extended, or [requirement that the
customer purchase insurance from] whose obligation a creditor is to
acquire or finance, negotiate any policy or renewal thereof
through a [parent, subsidiary] particular insurer or [affiliate]
producer of insurance or group of [the bank. For the purposes of]
producers.
2. A person, bank or affiliate shall not reject a policy of
insurance solely because the policy has been issued or
underwritten by a person who is not associated with the original
person, bank or affiliate when insurance is required in connection
with a loan or extension of credit.
3. A person, bank or affiliate that lends money or extends
credit shall not:
(a) As a condition for extending credit or offering any product
or service that is equivalent to an extension of credit, require that
-
*AB74*

– 63 –
a customer obtain insurance from a bank or an affiliate or a
particular insurer or producer of insurance. The provisions of this
paragraph do not prohibit a person, bank or affiliate from
informing a customer or prospective customer that:
(1) Insurance is required in order to obtain a loan or credit;
(2) Loan or credit approval is contingent upon the
procurement of acceptable insurance by the customer; or
(3) Insurance is available from the person, bank or
affiliate.
(b) Unreasonably reject a policy furnished by the customer or
borrower for the protection of the property securing the credit or
lien. A rejection shall not be deemed unreasonable if the rejection
is based on reasonable standards, uniformly applied, relating to
the extent of coverage required and the financial soundness of the
services of an insurer. The standards must not:
(1) Discriminate against any particular type of insurer; or
(2) Call for the rejection of a policy simply because the
policy contains coverage in addition to that required in the credit
transaction.
(c) Require that any customer, borrower, mortgagor,
purchaser, insurer or producer of insurance pay a separate charge
in connection with the handling of any policy required as security
for a loan on real estate or to substitute the policy of one insurer
for that of another. The provisions of this paragraph do not apply
to:
(1) The interest that may be charged on premium loans or
premium advancements in accordance with the terms of the loan
or credit document; or
(2) Charges that would be required when the person, bank
or affiliate is the licensed producer of insurance providing the
insurance.
(d) Require any procedure or condition of a duly licensed
producer of insurance or insurer which is not customarily
required of those producers or insurers affiliated or in any way
connected with the person who lends money or extends credit.
(e) Use an advertisement or other promotional material
relating to insurance that would cause a reasonable person to
mistakenly believe that the Federal Government or the State:
(1) Is responsible for the insurance sales activity of, or
stands behind the credit of, the person, bank or affiliate; or
(2) Guarantees any returns on insurance products or is a
source of payment on any insurance obligation of or sold by the
person, bank or affiliate.
(f) Act as a producer of insurance unless properly licensed in
accordance with chapter 683A of NRS.
-
*AB74*

– 64 –
(g) Pay or receive any commission, brokerage fee or other
compensation as a producer of insurance, unless the person holds
a valid license as a producer for the applicable class of insurance.
This paragraph does not prohibit a person who is not licensed as a
producer from making a referral to a licensed producer if the
person does not discuss any specific terms and conditions of a
policy of insurance. This paragraph does not prohibit a person
who is not licensed as a producer from being compensated for a
referral. In the case of a referral of a customer, the compensation
must be a fixed dollar amount for each referral that does not
depend on whether the customer purchases an insurance product
from the licensed producer. Any person who accepts deposits from
the public in an area where such transactions are routinely
conducted in the bank may not receive more than a one-time,
nominal fee of a fixed dollar amount for each referral of a
customer that does not depend on whether the referral results in a
transaction.
(h) Solicit or sell insurance unless:
(1) Other than credit insurance or flood insurance, the
solicitation or sale is completed through documents which are
separate from any transaction involving credit;
(2) The insurance sales activities are, to the extent
practicable, physically separated from the areas where retail
deposits are routinely accepted by banks; and
(3) The person, bank or affiliate maintains separate and
distinct books and records relating to the transactions involving
insurance, including, without limitation, all files relating to and
reflecting any complaint of a consumer.
(i) Include the expense of insurance premiums, other than
credit insurance premiums or flood insurance premiums, in the
primary transaction involving credit without the express written
consent of the customer.
4. A person, bank or affiliate that lends money or extends
credit and that solicits insurance primarily for personal, family or
household purposes shall disclose to the customer in writing that
the insurance related to an extension of credit may be purchased
from an insurer or producer of insurance that the customer
chooses, subject to the right of the lender to reject a given insurer
or agent as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection 3. The
disclosure must inform the customer that the insurer or producer
the customer chooses will not affect the decision to extend credit
or terms of credit in any way, except that the person, bank or
affiliate may impose reasonable requirements concerning the
creditworthiness of the insurer and the scope of coverage chosen
as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection 3.
-
*AB74*

– 65 –
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a bank or
any person who solicits, sells, advertises or offers insurance on the
premises of a bank or on behalf of a bank shall:
(a) Disclose to the customer in writing, where practicable and
in a clear and conspicuous manner, before a sale takes place, that
the insurance:
(1) Is not a deposit;
(2) Is not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or any other agency of the Federal Government;
(3) Is not guaranteed by the bank, any affiliate of the bank
or any person that is soliciting, selling, advertising or offering
insurance; and
(4) If applicable, involves investment risk, including,
without limitation, possible loss of value.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, obtain
written acknowledgment from the customer of receipt of the
disclosure described in paragraph (a), either at the time of receipt
or at the time of the initial purchase of the policy of insurance. If
the solicitation is conducted by telephone, the person or bank shall
obtain oral acknowledgment from the customer of receipt of the
disclosure, maintain sufficient documentation of the oral
acknowledgment and make reasonable efforts to obtain a written
acknowledgment from the customer. If a customer affirmatively
consents to receiving the disclosure by electronic means and the
disclosure is provided in a format that the customer may retain or
obtain later, the person or bank may provide the disclosure by
electronic means and obtain acknowledgment from the customer
of receipt of the disclosure by electronic means.
6. The provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 5 apply:
(a) Only:
(1) When a person purchases, applies to purchase or is
solicited to purchase insurance products or annuities primarily for
personal, family or household purposes; and
(2) To the extent that the disclosure is accurate.
(b) To an affiliate of a bank only to the extent that it sells,
solicits, advertises or offers insurance products or annuities at an
office of a bank or on behalf of a bank.
7. For the purposes of subsection 5, a person solicits, sells,
advertises or offers insurance on behalf of a bank, whether at an
office of the bank or another location, if:
(a) The person represents to the customer that the solicitation,
sale, advertisement or offer of the insurance is by or on behalf of
the bank;
(b) Documents evidencing the solicitation, sale, advertisement
or offer of the insurance identify or refer to the bank; or
-
*AB74*

– 66 –
(c) The bank:
(1) Refers a customer to the person who sells insurance;
and
(2) Has a contractual agreement to receive commissions or
fees derived from the sale of insurance resulting from the referral.
8. The Commissioner may examine and investigate the
insurance activities of any person, insurer, bank or affiliate that
the Commissioner believes may be in violation of this section. The
person, insurer, bank or affiliate shall make its books and records
available to the Commissioner for inspection upon reasonable
notice. A person who is affected by a violation or potential
violation of this section may submit a complaint or other material
pertinent to the enforcement of this section to the Commissioner.
Any examination undertaken pursuant to this subsection must be
conducted in accordance with sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this
act.
9. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prevents a person, bank or affiliate that lends money or
extends credit from placing insurance on real or personal property
in the event that a mortgagor, borrower or purchaser has failed to
provide required insurance in accordance with the terms of a loan
or credit document.
(b) Applies to credit related insurance.
10. As used in this section, the terms [“affiliate,” “parent”]
“affiliate” and [“subsidiary”] “bank” have the meanings ascribed to
them in NRS 683A.231.
Sec. 100. NRS 686A.095 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.095 1. An insurer shall not, without the written consent
of the [agent,] producer of insurance, cancel a written agreement
with [an agent] a producer or reduce or restrict the [agent’s]
authority of the producer to transact property or casualty insurance
based solely on the loss ratio experience on insurance transacted by
that [agent,] producer, if the [agent] producer was required to
submit the applications for that insurance for underwriting approval,
all material information on those applications was fully completed
and the [agent] producer did not omit or alter any information
provided by the applicants for that insurance.
2. As used in this section, “loss ratio experience” means the
amount of money received by the insurer in payment of premiums
divided by the amount of money expended by the insurer in
payment of claims for a specified period.
-
*AB74*

– 67 –
Sec. 101. NRS 686A.120 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.120 1. Nothing in NRS 686A.100, 686A.105 and
686A.110 shall be construed as including within the definition of
discrimination or rebates any of the following practices:
(a) In the case of any contract of life insurance or life annuity,
paying bonuses to policyholders or otherwise abating their
premiums in whole or in part out of surplus accumulated from
nonparticipating insurance, provided that any such bonuses or
abatement of premiums shall be fair and equitable to policyholders
and for the best interests of the insurer and its policyholders.
(b) In the case of life insurance policies issued on the debit plan,
making allowance to policyholders who have continuously for a
specified period made premium payments directly to an office of the
insurer in an amount which fairly represents the saving in collection
expense.
(c) Readjusting the rate of premium for a group insurance policy
based on the loss or expense experience thereunder, at the end of the
first or any subsequent policy year of insurance thereunder, which
may be made retroactive only for such policy year.
(d) Reducing the premium rate for policies of large amounts, but
not exceeding savings in issuance and administration expenses
reasonably attributable to such policies as compared with policies of
similar plan issued in smaller amounts.
(e) Reducing the premium rates for life or health insurance
policies or annuity contracts on salary savings, payroll deduction,
preauthorized check, bank draft or similar plans in amounts
reasonably commensurate with the savings made by the use of such
plans.
(f) Extending credit for the payment of any premium, and for
which credit a reasonable rate of interest is charged and collected.
(g) The offering or provision by an insurer or producer of
insurance, or by or through an employee, affiliate or third-party
representative, of a value-added product or service at no or
reduced cost when the product or service is not specified in the
policy of insurance if:
(1) The product or service relates to the insurance
coverage;
(2) The product or service is primarily designed to:
(I) Provide loss mitigation or control;
(II) Reduce the cost to administer claims or settle
claims;
(III) Provide education about risk of liability or risk of
loss to persons or property;
-
*AB74*

– 68 –
(IV) Monitor or assess risk, identify sources of risk or
develop strategies to eliminate or reduce risk;
(V) Enhance health;
(VI) Enhance financial wellness, including, without
limitation, through education or financial planning services;
(VII) Provide services after a loss;
(VIII) Incentivize changes in behavior to improve the
health or reduce the risk of death or disability of a policyholder,
potential policyholder, certificate holder, potential certificate
holder, insured, potential insured or applicant; or
(IX) Assist in the administration of employee or retiree
benefit insurance coverage;
(3) The cost to the insurer or producer of insurance
offering the product or service to a customer is reasonable in
comparison to the customer’s premiums or insurance coverage for
the policy class;
(4) If the insurer or producer of insurance is providing the
product or service offered, the insurer or producer ensures that
the customer is provided with contact information to assist the
customer with any question relating to the product or service; and
(5) The availability of the product or service is:
(I) Based on documented objective criteria which must
be maintained by the insurer or producer of insurance and made
available upon request of the Commissioner; and
(II) Offered in a manner that is not unfairly
discriminatory.
2. If an insurer or producer of insurance does not have
sufficient evidence but has a good faith belief that a product or
service described in paragraph (g) of subsection 1 meets the
criteria set forth in subparagraph (2) of paragraph (g) of
subsection 1, the insurer or producer may provide the product or
service as part of a pilot or testing program for not more than 1
year if:
(a) Not less than 21 days before beginning the pilot or testing
program, the insurer or producer notifies the Commissioner of the
intent to begin the program;
(b) The Commissioner does not object to the proposed pilot or
testing program within 21 days after the date on which notice was
given pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(c) The insurer or producer provides the product or service in
the pilot or testing program in a manner that is not unfairly
discriminatory.
3. Nothing in NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325,
inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act shall be
construed as including within the definition of securities as
-
*AB74*

– 69 –
inducements to purchase insurance the selling or offering for sale,
contemporaneously with life insurance, of mutual fund shares or
face amount certificates of regulated investment companies under
offerings registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission
where such shares or such face amount certificates or such insurance
may be purchased independently of and not contingent upon
purchase of the other, at the same price and upon similar terms and
conditions as where purchased independently.
Sec. 102. NRS 686A.130 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.130 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
no property, casualty, surety or title insurer or underwritten title
company or any employee or representative thereof, and no [broker,
agent or solicitor] producer of insurance may pay, allow or give, or
offer to pay, allow or give, directly or indirectly, as an inducement
to insurance, or after insurance has been effected, any rebate,
discount, abatement, credit or reduction of the premium named in a
policy of insurance, or any special favor or advantage in the
dividends or other benefits to accrue thereon, or any valuable
consideration or inducement whatever, not specified or provided for
in the policy, except to the extent provided for in an applicable filing
with the Commissioner.
2. The provisions of subsections 1 and 4 do not prohibit any
property, casualty or surety insurer or any employee or
representative thereof, or any [broker, agent or solicitor] producer
of insurance from providing to an insured or prospective insured
prizes and gifts, goods, wares, merchandise, gift certificates,
donations made to charitable organizations, raffle entries, meals,
event tickets and other items not to exceed $100 in aggregate value
per insured or prospective insured in any 1 calendar year.
3. No title insurer or underwritten title company may:
(a) Pay, directly or indirectly, to the insured or any person acting
as agent, representative, attorney or employee of the owner, lessee,
mortgagee, existing or prospective, of the real property or interest
therein which is the subject matter of title insurance or as to which a
service is to be performed, any commission, rebate or part of its fee
or charges or other consideration as inducement or compensation for
the placing of any order for a title insurance policy or for
performance of any escrow or other service by the insurer or
underwritten title company with respect thereto; or
(b) Issue any policy or perform any service in connection with
which it or any [agent] producer of insurance or other person has
paid or contemplates paying any commission, rebate or inducement
in violation of this section.
-
*AB74*

– 70 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no insured
named in a policy or any employee of that insured may knowingly
receive or accept, directly or indirectly, any such rebate, discount,
abatement, credit or reduction of premium, or any such special favor
or advantage or valuable consideration or inducement.
5. No such insurer may make or permit any unfair
discrimination between insured or property having like insuring or
risk characteristics [, in] :
(a) In the premium or rates charged for insurance, or in the
dividends or other benefits payable thereon, or in any other of the
terms and conditions of insurance.
(b) By refusing to insure, refusing to renew, cancelling or
limiting the amount of insurance coverage on a property or
casualty risk solely because of the geographic location of the risk,
unless such action is the result of the application of sound
underwriting and actuarial principles related to actual or
reasonably anticipated loss experience.
(c) By refusing to insure, refusing to renew, cancelling or
limiting the amount of insurance coverage on the residential
property risk, or the personal property contained therein, solely
because of the age of the residential property.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by
terminating, modifying coverage, refusing to issue or refusing to
renew any property or casualty policy solely because the applicant
or insured or any employee of either is mentally or physically
impaired. The provisions of this paragraph do not apply to a policy
of accident or health insurance which is sold by a casualty insurer
if the termination, modification, refusal to issue or refusal to
renew a policy is otherwise permitted by this title.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, by refusing
to insure a person solely because another insurer has refused to
write a policy, cancelled an existing policy or refused to renew an
existing policy in which that person was the named insured. The
provisions of this paragraph do not prohibit an insurer from
terminating an excess policy of insurance due to the failure of the
insured to maintain any required underlying insurance.
6. No casualty insurer may make or permit any unfair
discrimination between persons legally qualified to provide a
particular service, in the amount of the fee or charge for that service
payable as a benefit under any policy or contract of casualty
insurance.
7. The provisions of this section do not prohibit:
(a) The payment of commissions or other compensation to
licensed [agents, brokers or solicitors.] producers of insurance.
-
*AB74*

– 71 –
(b) The extension of credit to an insured for the payment of any
premium and for which credit a reasonable rate of interest is charged
and collected.
(c) Any insurer from allowing or returning to its participating
policyholders, members or subscribers, dividends, savings or
unabsorbed premium deposits.
(d) With respect to title insurance, bulk rates or special rates for
customers of prescribed classes if the bulk or special rates are
provided for in the effective schedule of fees and charges of the title
insurer or underwritten title company.
8. The provisions of this section do not apply to wet marine
and transportation insurance.
Sec. 103. NRS 686A.150 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.150 Except as provided in subsection [2] 3 of NRS
686A.120 (contemporaneous sales of life insurance and mutual fund
shares), no person shall sell, agree or offer to sell, or give or offer to
give, directly or indirectly in any manner whatsoever, as an
inducement to insurance or in connection therewith, any stock,
shares, bonds or other securities of any kind, or any advisory board
contract or other contract or agreement of any kind offering or
promising returns and profits.
Sec. 104. NRS 686A.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.160 If the Commissioner has cause to believe that any
person has been engaged or is engaging, in this state, in any unfair
method of competition or any unfair or deceptive act or practice
prohibited by NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive,
and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act, and that a proceeding
by the Commissioner in respect thereto would be in the interest of
the public, the Commissioner may issue and serve upon such person
a statement of the charges and a notice of the hearing to be held
thereon. The statement of charges and notice of hearing shall
comply with the requirements of NRS 679B.320 and shall be served
upon such person directly or by certified or registered mail, return
receipt requested.
Sec. 105. NRS 686A.170 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.170 1. If the Commissioner believes that any person
engaged in the insurance business is in the conduct of such business
engaging in this state in any method of competition or in any act or
practice not defined in NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325,
inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act which is
unfair or deceptive and that a proceeding by the Commissioner in
respect thereto would be in the public interest, the Commissioner
-
*AB74*

– 72 –
shall, after a hearing of which notice and of the charges against such
person are given to the person, make a written report of the findings
of fact relative to such charges and serve a copy thereof upon such
person and any intervener at the hearing.
2. If such report charges a violation of NRS 686A.010 to
[686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive,
of this act, and if such method of competition, act or practice has
not been discontinued, the Commissioner may, through the Attorney
General, at any time after 20 days after the service of such report
cause an action to be instituted in the district court of the county
wherein the person resides or has his or her principal place of
business to enjoin and restrain such person from engaging in such
method, act or practice. The court shall have jurisdiction of the
proceeding and shall have power to make and enter appropriate
orders in connection therewith and to issue such writs or orders as
are ancillary to its jurisdiction or necessary in its judgment to
prevent injury to the public pendente lite; but the State of Nevada
shall not be required to give security before the issuance of any such
order or injunction under this section. If a stenographic record of the
proceedings in the hearing before the Commissioner was made, a
certified transcript thereof including all evidence taken and the
report and findings shall be received in evidence in such action.
3. If the court finds that:
(a) The method of competition complained of is unfair or
deceptive;
(b) The proceedings by the Commissioner with respect thereto
are to the interest of the public; and
(c) The findings of the Commissioner are supported by the
weight of the evidence,
 it shall issue its order enjoining and restraining the continuance
of such method of competition, act or practice.
4. Either party may appeal from such final judgment or order
or decree of court in a like manner as provided for appeals in civil
cases.
5. If the Commissioner’s report made under subsection 1 or
order on hearing made under NRS 679B.360 does not charge a
violation of NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive,
and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act, then any intervener in
the proceedings may appeal therefrom within the time and in the
manner provided in this Code for appeals from the Commissioner
generally.
6. Upon violation of any injunction issued under this section,
the Commissioner, after a hearing thereon, may impose the
appropriate penalties provided for in NRS 686A.187.
-
*AB74*

– 73 –
Sec. 106. NRS 686A.180 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.180 1. Service of all process, statements of charges and
notices under NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive,
and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act upon unauthorized
insurers shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the
Commissioner or some person in apparent charge of the office of the
Commissioner [two copies] one copy thereof, or in the manner
provided for by subsection 2 of NRS 685B.050 (service of process).
2. The Commissioner shall forward all such process,
statements of charges and notices to the insurer in the manner
provided in subsection 3 of NRS 685B.050.
3. No default shall be taken against any such unauthorized
insurer until expiration of 30 days after the date of forwarding by
the Commissioner under subsection 2, or date of service of process
if under subsection 2 of NRS 685B.050.
4. NRS 685B.050 applies to all process, statements of charges
and notices under this section.
Sec. 107. NRS 686A.183 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.183 1. After the hearing provided for in NRS
686A.160, the Commissioner shall issue an order on hearing
pursuant to NRS 679B.360. If the Commissioner determines that the
person charged has engaged in an unfair method of competition or
an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of NRS 686A.010
to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and sections 80 to 93,
inclusive, of this act, the Commissioner shall order the person to
cease and desist from engaging in that method of competition, act or
practice, and may order one or both of the following:
(a) If the person knew or reasonably should have known that he
or she was in violation of NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325,
inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act, payment of
an administrative fine of not more than $5,000 for each act or
violation, except that as to licensed agents, brokers, solicitors and
adjusters, the administrative fine must not exceed $500 for each act
or violation.
(b) Suspension or revocation of the person’s license if the
person knew or reasonably should have known that he or she was in
violation of NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive [.] ,
and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act.
2. Until the expiration of the time allowed for taking an appeal,
pursuant to NRS 679B.370, if no petition for review has been filed
within that time, or, if a petition for review has been filed within that
time, until the official record in the proceeding has been filed with
the court, the Commissioner may, at any time, upon such notice and
-
*AB74*

– 74 –
in such manner as the Commissioner deems proper, modify or set
aside, in whole or in part, any order issued by him or her under this
section.
3. After the expiration of the time allowed for taking an appeal,
if no petition for review has been filed, the Commissioner may at
any time, after notice and opportunity for hearing, reopen and alter,
modify or set aside, in whole or in part, any order issued by him or
her under this section whenever in the opinion of the Commissioner
conditions of fact or of law have so changed as to require such
action or if the public interest so requires.
Sec. 108. NRS 686A.270 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.270 No insurer shall be held guilty of having committed
any of the acts prohibited by NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,]
686A.325, inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act by
reason of the act of any agent, solicitor or employee not an officer,
director or department head thereof, unless an officer, director or
department head of the insurer has knowingly permitted such act or
has had prior knowledge thereof.
Sec. 109. NRS 686A.310 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.310 1. Engaging in any of the following activities is
considered to be an unfair practice:
(a) Misrepresenting to insureds or claimants pertinent facts or
insurance policy provisions relating to any coverage at issue.
(b) Failing to acknowledge and act reasonably promptly upon
communications with respect to claims arising under insurance
policies.
(c) Failing to adopt and implement reasonable standards for the
prompt investigation and processing of claims arising under
insurance policies.
(d) Failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims within a
reasonable time after proof of loss requirements have been
completed and submitted by the insured.
(e) Failing to effectuate prompt, fair and equitable settlements of
claims in which liability of the insurer has become reasonably clear.
(f) Compelling insureds to institute litigation to recover amounts
due under an insurance policy by offering substantially less than the
amounts ultimately recovered in actions brought by such insureds,
when the insureds have made claims for amounts reasonably similar
to the amounts ultimately recovered.
(g) Attempting to settle a claim by an insured for less than the
amount to which a reasonable person would have believed he or she
was entitled by reference to written or printed advertising material
accompanying or made part of an application.
-
*AB74*

– 75 –
(h) Attempting to settle claims on the basis of an application
which was altered without notice to, or knowledge or consent of, the
insured, or the representative, agent or broker of the insured.
(i) Failing, upon payment of a claim, to inform insureds or
beneficiaries of the coverage under which payment is made.
(j) Making known to insureds or claimants a practice of the
insurer of appealing from arbitration awards in favor of insureds or
claimants for the purpose of compelling them to accept settlements
or compromises less than the amount awarded in arbitration.
(k) Delaying the investigation or payment of claims by requiring
an insured or a claimant, or the physician of either, to submit a
preliminary claim report, and then requiring the subsequent
submission of formal proof of loss forms, both of which
submissions contain substantially the same information.
(l) Failing to settle claims promptly, where liability has become
reasonably clear, under one portion of the insurance policy coverage
in order to influence settlements under other portions of the
insurance policy coverage.
(m) Failing to comply with the provisions of NRS 687B.310 to
687B.390, inclusive, or 687B.410.
(n) Failing to provide promptly to an insured a reasonable
explanation of the basis in the insurance policy, with respect to the
facts of the insured’s claim and the applicable law, for the denial of
the claim or for an offer to settle or compromise the claim.
(o) Advising an insured or claimant not to seek legal counsel.
(p) Misleading an insured or claimant concerning any applicable
statute of limitations.
(q) Refusing to pay a claim without conducting a reasonable
investigation.
(r) Failing to provide forms necessary to present a claim and a
reasonable explanation concerning the use of the forms within 15
days after the date on which a request for the forms is made.
2. In addition to any rights or remedies available to the
Commissioner, an insurer is liable to its insured for any damages
sustained by the insured as a result of the commission of any act set
forth in subsection 1 as an unfair practice.
Sec. 110. NRS 686A.400 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.400 1. A company shall maintain records of each
transaction for 3 years after making the final entry with respect to
the transaction. The records may be preserved in photographic form,
electronic form, on microfilm or microfiche or in a form approved
by the Commissioner.
2. A person who generates leads or other information relating
to potential customers of health insurance products and services
-
*AB74*

– 76 –
for any insurer or producer of insurance shall maintain any
books, documents and other business records:
(a) In such an order that data regarding complaints and
marketing are accessible and retrievable for examination by the
Commissioner; and
(b) For 3 years after the date on which the book, document or
other record was created.
3. The records , books, documents and other business records
maintained pursuant to this section must be open to the
Commissioner at all times. The Commissioner may require a
company to furnish to the Commissioner in any form the
Commissioner requires any information maintained in the
company’s records.
Sec. 111. NRS 686A.410 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.410 The Commissioner may conduct an examination of a
company at any time in accordance with [NRS 679B.250 to
679B.287,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive [.] , of this act. The expense
of the examination must be borne by the company in accordance
with [NRS 679B.290] section 19 of this act as if the company were
an insurer.
Sec. 112. NRS 686A.520 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.520 1. The provisions of NRS 683A.341, 683A.451,
683A.461 and 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act apply to companies.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, unless the context requires
that a section apply only to insurers, any reference in those sections
to “insurer” must be replaced by a reference to “company.”
Sec. 113. NRS 686B.125 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686B.125 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no
insurer, organization or person licensed pursuant to this title may
sell or offer to sell any contract providing coverage for dental care at
a rate which is excessive for the benefits offered to the insured or
member. For the purpose of this section, a ratio of losses to
premiums collected which is less than 75 percent is presumed to
show an excessive rate.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a contract
providing coverage for dental care that is sold to a small employer
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 689C of NRS. As used in this
subsection, “small employer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 689C.095.
3. Each year, every insurer, organization or person licensed
pursuant to this title who provides coverage for dental care in this
-
*AB74*

– 77 –
State shall, in accordance with requirements established by
regulation of the Commissioner, file with the Commissioner a report
of the losses and premiums collected for that insurer, organization or
person, as applicable, for the calendar year.
4. For the purposes of subsection 3, the values of losses and
premiums collected must be determined at the end of each calendar
year for the entire calendar year.
5. The Commissioner may, pursuant to [NRS 679B.240,]
section 16 of this act, examine the accounts, records, documents and
transactions of any insurer, organization or person licensed pursuant
to this title who sells or offers to sell any contract providing
coverage for dental care in this State to ascertain compliance with
the provisions of this section.
Sec. 114. NRS 686B.1784 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686B.1784 1. The Commissioner may examine any insurer,
advisory organization or plan for apportioned risks whenever the
Commissioner determines that such an examination is necessary.
2. The reasonable cost of an examination must be paid by the
insurer or other person examined upon presentation by the
Commissioner of an accounting of those costs pursuant to [NRS
679B.290.] section 19 of this act.
3. In lieu of an examination, the Commissioner may accept the
report of an examination made by the agency of another state that
regulates insurance.
Sec. 115. Chapter 687B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In any settlement for the payment of a claim pertaining to
a policy or coverage of property insurance, if the contract of
insurance provides for a settlement on the basis of actual cash
value or another term which is similarly defined, only the cost of
the physical goods being repaired or replaced may be subject to a
deduction for depreciation.
2. The following types of payments, if separately itemized by
the provider of repairs or replacement or by any governmental
entity, must be paid or reimbursed by the insurer in full and may
not be subject to a deduction for depreciation:
(a) The cost of services provided, including, without limitation,
labor;
(b) Any expenses incurred by the provider of repairs or
replacement, including, without limitation, overhead expenses
which do not pertain to the repair or replacement of physical
goods;
(c) Any profits earned by the provider of repairs or
replacement;
-
*AB74*

– 78 –
(d) Any taxes paid by the governmental entity in connection
with the repair or replacement;
(e) Any fees or charges, by any name called, required to be
paid by the governmental entity which are not part of the price of
the physical goods being repaired or replaced.
3. Any cost not separately itemized shall be deemed to be part
of the cost of physical goods being repaired or replaced, unless
otherwise stated by the provider of repairs or replacement or the
governmental entity.
4. As used in this section, “actual cash value” means
replacement cost minus a deduction for depreciation.
Sec. 116. NRS 687B.120 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.120 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) No life or health insurance policy or contract, annuity
contract form, policy form, health care plan or plan for dental care,
whether individual, group or blanket, including those to be issued by
a health maintenance organization, organization for dental care or
prepaid limited health service organization, or application form
where a written application is required and is to be made a part of
the policy or contract, or printed rider or endorsement form or form
of renewal certificate, or form of individual certificate or statement
of coverage to be issued under group or blanket contracts, or by a
health maintenance organization, organization for dental care or
prepaid limited health service organization, may be delivered or
issued for delivery in this state, unless the form has been filed with
and approved by the Commissioner.
(b) As to individual policies pursuant to paragraph [(d)] (e) of
subsection 2 of NRS 679B.220 or group insurance policies
effectuated and delivered outside this state but covering persons
resident in this state, the certificates to be delivered or issued for
delivery in this state must be filed, for informational purposes only,
with the Commissioner at the request of the Commissioner.
2. As to group insurance policies to be issued to a group
approved pursuant to NRS 688B.030 or 689B.026, no policies of
group insurance may be marketed to a resident or employer of this
State unless the policy and any form or certificate to be issued
pursuant to the policy has been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner.
3. Every filing made pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1
or 2 must be made not less than 45 days in advance of any delivery
pursuant to subsection 1 or marketing pursuant to subsection 2. At
the expiration of 45 days the form so filed shall be deemed approved
unless prior thereto it has been affirmatively approved or
disapproved by order of the Commissioner. Approval of any such
-
*AB74*

– 79 –
form by the Commissioner constitutes a waiver of any unexpired
portion of such waiting period. The Commissioner may extend by
not more than an additional 30 days the period within which the
Commissioner may so affirmatively approve or disapprove any such
form, by giving notice to the insurer of the extension before
expiration of the initial 45-day period. At the expiration of any such
period as so extended, and in the absence of prior affirmative
approval or disapproval, any such form shall be deemed approved.
The Commissioner may at any time, after notice and for cause
shown, withdraw any such approval.
4. Any order of the Commissioner disapproving any such form
or withdrawing a previous approval must state the grounds therefor
and the particulars thereof in such detail as reasonably to inform the
insurer thereof. Any such withdrawal of a previously approved form
is effective at the expiration of such a period, not less than 30 days
after the giving of notice of withdrawal, as the Commissioner in
such notice prescribes.
5. The Commissioner may, by order, exempt from the
requirements of this section for so long as the Commissioner deems
proper any insurance document or form or type thereof specified in
the order, to which, in the opinion of the Commissioner, this section
may not practicably be applied, or the filing and approval of which
are, in the opinion of the Commissioner, not desirable or necessary
for the protection of the public.
6. Appeals from orders of the Commissioner disapproving any
such form or withdrawing a previous approval may be taken as
provided in NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive.
Sec. 117. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, any contract for group, blanket or
individual health insurance or any contract by a nonprofit hospital,
medical or dental service corporation or organization for dental care
which provides for payment of a certain part of medical or dental
care may require the insured or member to obtain prior authorization
-
*AB74*

– 80 –
for that care from the insurer or organization. The insurer or
organization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining approval of care pursuant to
this section for approval by the Commissioner; and
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
[respond to any] approve a request for [approval by] prior
authorization or respond to the insured , [or] member or provider
of health care [pursuant to this section] with a request for
additional information:
(1) If the request for prior authorization involves urgent
health care services, within [20] 2 business days after [it receives]
the date on which the request [.] for prior authorization was
submitted; or
(2) If the request for prior authorization does not involve
urgent health care services, within 5 business days after the date
on which the request for prior authorization was submitted.
2. The procedure for prior authorization may not discriminate
among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
Sec. 118. NRS 687B.385 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.385 1. An insurer shall not refuse to issue, cancel,
refuse to renew or increase the premium for renewal of a policy of
motor vehicle insurance covering private passenger cars or
commercial vehicles as a result of any [:
1. Claims] claims made under any policy of insurance with
respect to which the insured was not at fault . [;]
2. An insurer shall not refuse to issue, set a higher premium
when issuing, cancel, refuse to renew or increase the premium for
renewal of a policy of property or casualty insurance as a result of
any:
(a) Claims made under any policy of insurance for which the
insurer has not made any payment or for which the insurer
recovered the entirety of the insurer’s payment on the claim by
means of salvage, subrogation or another mechanism; or
[3.] (b) Inquiries made regarding an actual or potential claim
under any policy of insurance regarding:
[(a)] (1) The existence of insurance coverage for any matter; or
[(b)] (2) Any hypothetical or informational matter pertaining to
insurance.
Sec. 119. NRS 687B.404 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.404 1. An insurer or other organization providing
health coverage pursuant to chapter 689A, 689B, 689C, 695A,
-
*AB74*

– 81 –
695B, 695C, 695F or 695G of NRS, including, without limitation, a
health maintenance organization or managed care organization that
provides health care services through managed care to recipients of
Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid, shall adhere to the
applicable provisions of the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici
Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, Public Law
110-343, Division C, Title V, Subtitle B, and any federal regulations
issued pursuant thereto.
2. On or before [July] April 1 of each year, the Commissioner
shall prescribe and provide to each insurer or other organization
providing health coverage subject to the provisions of subsection 1 a
data request that solicits information necessary to evaluate the
compliance of an insurer or other organization with the Paul
Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction
Equity Act of 2008, Public Law 110-343, Division C, Title V,
Subtitle B, including, without limitation, the comparative analyses
specified in 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-26(a)(8).
3. On or before [October] June 1 of each year, each insurer or
other organization providing health coverage subject to the
provisions of subsection 1 shall:
(a) Complete and submit to the Commissioner the data request
prescribed pursuant to subsection 2; or
(b) Submit to the Commissioner a copy of a report submitted by
the insurer or other organization to the Federal Government
demonstrating compliance with the Paul Wellstone and Pete
Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008,
Public Law 110-343, Division C, Title V, Subtitle B, including,
without limitation, the comparative analyses specified in 42 U.S.C.
§ 300gg-26(a)(8). The Commissioner may request from an insurer
or other organization who submits a copy of such a report any
supplemental information necessary to determine whether the
insurer or other organization is in compliance with that federal law.
4. Any information provided by an insurer or other
organization to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 3 is
confidential.
5. On or before December 31 of each year, the Commissioner
shall compile a report summarizing the information submitted to the
Commissioner pursuant to this section and submit the report to:
(a) The Patient Protection Commission created by
NRS 439.908;
(b) The Governor; and
(c) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(1) In even-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
-
*AB74*

– 82 –
(2) In odd-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services.
6. The Commissioner may adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 120. NRS 687B.409 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.409 1. Every payment made pursuant to a policy of
health insurance to pay for treatment relating solely to mental health
or an alcohol or substance use disorder must be made directly to the
provider of health care that provides the treatment if the provider:
(a) Is an out-of-network provider; and
(b) Has obtained and delivered to the insurer or an authorized
representative of the insurer, including, without limitation, a third-
party administrator, a written assignment of benefits pursuant to
which the insured has assigned to the provider the insured’s benefits
under the policy of health insurance with regard to the treatment.
2. An out-of-network provider that receives payment pursuant
to subsection 1:
(a) Shall, if a person paid the provider directly for the treatment
described in subsection 1, refund to the person the amount that the
person paid directly to the provider for the treatment, less any
applicable deductible, copayment or coinsurance, not later than 45
days after the provider receives payment pursuant to subsection 1;
and
(b) Must indemnify and hold harmless the insurer against any
claim made against the insurer by the person who receives the
treatment described in subsection 1 for any amount paid by the
insurer to the provider in compliance with this section.
3. An assignment of benefits described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 is irrevocable for the period:
(a) Beginning on the date the insured gives to the out-of-
network provider the assignment of benefits; and
(b) Ending on the later of:
(1) The date on which the out-of-network provider receives
from the insurer the final payment for the treatment; or
(2) The date of the final resolution, including, without
limitation, by settlement or trial, of all claims relating to all
payments which relate to the treatment.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an
insurer to make a payment to an out-of-network provider:
(a) Who is not authorized by law to provide the treatment;
(b) Who provides the treatment in violation of any law; or
(c) In an amount which exceeds the amount required by the
policy of health insurance to be paid for out-of-network treatment.
5. As used in this section:
-
*AB74*

– 83 –
(a) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, care or relief of a health condition, illness,
injury or disease.
(b) “Insured” means a person who receives benefits pursuant to
a policy of health insurance.
(c) “Insurer” means a person, including, without limitation, a
governmental entity, who issues or otherwise provides a policy of
health insurance.
(d) “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
[689B.570.] 687B.645.
(e) “Out-of-network provider” means a provider of health care
who:
(1) Provides health care services;
(2) Is paid, pursuant to a policy of health insurance, for
providing the health care services; and
(3) Is not under contract to provide the health care services as
part of any network plan associated with the policy of health
insurance.
(f) “Policy of health insurance” includes, without limitation, a
policy, contract, certificate, plan or agreement, as applicable, issued
pursuant to or otherwise governed by NRS 287.0402 to 287.049,
inclusive, or chapter 608, 689A, 689B, 689C, 695A, 695B, 695C,
695F or 695G of NRS for the provision of, delivery of, arrangement
for, payment for or reimbursement for any of the costs of health care
services.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS [695G.070.] 629.031.
Sec. 121. NRS 687B.490 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.490 1. A carrier that offers coverage in the small
employer group or individual market must, before making any
network plan available for sale in this State, demonstrate the
capacity to deliver services adequately by applying to the
Commissioner for the issuance of a network plan and submitting a
description of the procedures and programs to be implemented to
meet the requirements described in subsection 2.
2. The Commissioner shall determine, within 90 days after
receipt of the application required pursuant to subsection 1, if the
carrier, with respect to the network plan:
(a) Has demonstrated the willingness and ability to ensure that
health care services will be provided in a manner to ensure both
availability and accessibility of adequate personnel and facilities in a
manner that enhances availability, accessibility and continuity of
service;
-
*AB74*

– 84 –
(b) Has organizational arrangements established in accordance
with regulations promulgated by the Commissioner; and
(c) Has a procedure established in accordance with regulations
promulgated by the Commissioner to develop, compile, evaluate
and report statistics relating to the cost of its operations, the pattern
of utilization of its services, the availability and accessibility of its
services and such other matters as may be reasonably required by
the Commissioner.
3. The Commissioner may certify that the carrier and the
network plan meet the requirements of subsection 2, or may
determine that the carrier and the network plan do not meet such
requirements. Upon a determination that the carrier and the network
plan do not meet the requirements of subsection 2, the
Commissioner shall specify in what respects the carrier and the
network plan are deficient.
4. A carrier approved to issue a network plan pursuant to this
section must file annually with the Commissioner a summary of
information compiled pursuant to subsection 2 in a manner
determined by the Commissioner.
5. The Commissioner shall, not less than once each year, or
more often if deemed necessary by the Commissioner for the
protection of the interests of the people of this State, make a
determination concerning the availability and accessibility of the
health care services of any network plan approved pursuant to this
section.
6. The expense of any determination made by the
Commissioner pursuant to this section must be assessed against the
carrier and remitted to the Commissioner.
7. When making any determination concerning the availability
and accessibility of the services of any network plan or proposed
network plan pursuant to this section, the Commissioner shall
consider services that may be provided through telehealth, as
defined in NRS 629.515, pursuant to the network plan or proposed
network plan to be available services.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
[689B.570.] 687B.645.
(b) “Small employer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 689C.095.
Sec. 122. NRS 687B.615 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.615 “Health benefit plan” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS [695G.019.] 687B.470.
-
*AB74*

– 85 –
Sec. 123. NRS 687B.660 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.660 “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS [695G.070.] 629.031.
Sec. 124. NRS 688C.175 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
688C.175 1. Persons engaged in the business of viatical
settlements are subject to the provisions of this chapter and to the
following provisions, to the extent reasonably applicable:
(a) [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] Sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of
this act concerning examinations of insurers.
(b) NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive, concerning hearings
regarding insurers and employees of insurers.
(c) Chapter 680A of NRS.
(d) Chapter 683A of NRS.
(e) NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act concerning trade practices
and frauds.
2. Nothing in this chapter or elsewhere in this title preempts or
otherwise limits the provisions of chapter 90 of NRS, or of any
rules, regulations or orders issued by or through the Administrator
of the Securities Division of the Office of the Secretary of State or
the Administrator’s designee acting pursuant to the authority
granted by chapter 90 of NRS.
3. Compliance with the provisions of this chapter does not
constitute compliance with any applicable provisions of chapter 90
of NRS or with any rule, regulation or order adopted or issued
thereunder.
Sec. 125. NRS 688C.180 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
688C.180 The Commissioner may examine or investigate a
licensee under this chapter as often as the Commissioner considers
appropriate. An examination will be conducted in the manner
provided in [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2 to 41,
inclusive [.] , of this act. The Commissioner may also examine or
investigate any other person or business insofar as the
Commissioner considers necessary or material to the examination or
investigation of the licensee. Instead of an examination or
investigation under this chapter of a foreign or alien person licensed
under this chapter, the Commissioner may accept a report on
examination or investigation of the licensee by the equivalent
authority of the licensee’s state of domicile or port of entry.
-
*AB74*

– 86 –
Sec. 126. NRS 689.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689.160 1. The provisions of NRS 683A.341, 683A.451,
683A.461 and 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act apply to agents and sellers.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, unless the context requires
that a section apply only to insurers, any reference in those sections
to “insurer” must be replaced by a reference to “agent” and “seller.”
3. The provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2
to 41, inclusive, of this act apply to sellers. Unless the context
requires that a provision apply only to insurers, any reference in
those sections to “insurer” must be replaced by a reference to
“seller.”
4. The provisions of NRS 683A.301 apply to applicants for and
holders of a seller’s certificate of authority. Unless the context
requires that a provision apply only to an applicant for or holder of a
license as a producer of insurance, any reference in that section to:
(a) An “applicant for a license as a producer of insurance” must
be replaced by a reference to an “applicant for a seller’s certificate
of authority”; and
(b) A “licensee” must be replaced by a reference to a “holder of
a seller’s certificate of authority.”
Sec. 127. NRS 689.595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689.595 1. The provisions of NRS 683A.341, 683A.451,
683A.461 and 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act apply to agents and sellers.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, unless the context requires
that a section apply only to insurers, any reference in those sections
to “insurer” must be replaced by a reference to “agent” and “seller.”
3. The provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2
to 41, inclusive, of this act apply to sellers. Unless the context
requires that a provision apply only to insurers, any reference in
those sections to “insurer” must be replaced by a reference to
“seller.”
4. The provisions of NRS 683A.301 apply to applicants for and
holders of a seller’s permit. Unless the context requires that a
provision apply only to an applicant for or a holder of a license as a
producer of insurance, any reference in that section to:
(a) An “applicant for a license as a producer of insurance” must
be replaced by a reference to an “applicant for a seller’s permit”;
and
(b) A “licensee” must be replaced by a reference to a “holder of
a seller’s permit.”
-
*AB74*

– 87 –
Sec. 128. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 129 to 134, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 129. As used in this chapter, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in sections 130 to
134, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 130. “Medical management technique” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 299 of this act.
Sec. 131. “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.645.
Sec. 132. “Provider network contract” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 687B.658.
Sec. 133. “Provider of health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 134. “Therapeutic equivalent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 302 of this act.
Sec. 135. NRS 689A.020 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.020 Nothing in this chapter applies to or affects:
1. Any policy of liability or workers’ compensation insurance
with or without supplementary expense coverage therein.
2. Any group or blanket policy.
3. Life insurance, endowment or annuity contracts, or contracts
supplemental thereto which contain only such provisions relating to
health insurance as to:
(a) Provide additional benefits in case of death or
dismemberment or loss of sight by accident or accidental means; or
(b) Operate to safeguard such contracts against lapse, or to give
a special surrender value or special benefit or an annuity if the
insured or annuitant becomes totally and permanently disabled, as
defined by the contract or supplemental contract.
4. Reinsurance . [, except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.470 to 689A.740, inclusive, and 689C.610 to 689C.940,
inclusive, relating to the program of reinsurance.]
5. Any policy of insurance offered on the Silver State Health
Insurance Exchange in accordance with NRS 695I.505.
Sec. 136. NRS 689A.04048 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.04048 1. A policy of health insurance which provides
coverage for prescription drugs must not require an insured to
submit to a step therapy protocol before covering a drug approved
by the Food and Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a
psychiatric condition of the insured, if:
-
*AB74*

– 88 –
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in the network plan of the insurer is located 60
miles or more from the residence of the insured; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the insured, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of a policy of health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this
section is void.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) [“Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care is provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not include
an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c)] “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
insured to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the insured before his or her policy of health
insurance provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 137. NRS 689A.04049 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.04049 1. An insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance shall provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling
and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women
under circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or
testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
-
*AB74*

– 89 –
2. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2022, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 138. NRS 689A.0405 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0405 1. A policy of health insurance must provide
coverage for benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) A mammogram to screen for breast cancer annually for
insureds who are 40 years of age or older.
(b) An imaging test to screen for breast cancer on an interval
and at the age deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary,
as recommended by the insured’s provider of health care based on
personal or family medical history or additional factors that may
increase the risk of breast cancer for the insured.
(c) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age deemed
most appropriate, when medically necessary, as recommended by
the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate an abnormality
which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from a mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or an imaging test described in paragraph (b); or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other
form of cost-sharing or require a longer waiting period or other
condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of health
insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
-
*AB74*

– 90 –
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter which is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified policy of health
insurance with respect to the deductible of such a policy of health
insurance after the insured has satisfied the minimum deductible
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, except with respect to items or services
that constitute preventive care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C),
in which case the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall
apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible under 26
U.S.C. § 223 has been satisfied.
7. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
-
*AB74*

– 91 –
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified] , “qualified policy of health insurance” means a
policy of health insurance that has a high deductible and is in
compliance with 26 U.S.C. § 223 for the purposes of establishing a
health savings account.
Sec. 139. NRS 689A.0412 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0412 1. An insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance shall provide coverage for the examination of a person
who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the insurer; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
July 1, 2021, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that conflicts with
the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical] , “medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 652.060.
[(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 140. NRS 689A.0415 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0415 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance which provides coverage for prescription drugs or
devices shall include in the policy coverage for any type of hormone
replacement therapy which is lawfully prescribed or ordered and
which has been approved by the Food and Drug Administration.
-
*AB74*

– 92 –
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for a prescription for hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use in the future hormone
replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after October 1,
1999, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage for fertility drugs.
[5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 141. NRS 689A.0417 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0417 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance which provides coverage for outpatient care shall
include in the policy coverage for any health care service related to
hormone replacement therapy.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
that provides coverage for outpatient care shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for outpatient care related to hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use in the future hormone
replacement therapy;
-
*AB74*

– 93 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after October 1,
1999, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
[4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 142. NRS 689A.0418 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0418 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8,
an insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall
include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Listed in subsection 11; and
(4) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Listed in subsection 11;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion of a device for contraception or removal of such a
device if the device was inserted while the insured was covered by
the same policy of health insurance;
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraception and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(g) Voluntary sterilization for women.
2. An insurer shall provide coverage for any services listed in
subsection 1 which are within the authorized scope of practice of a
pharmacist when such services are provided by a pharmacist who is
employed by or serves as an independent contractor of an
-
*AB74*

– 94 –
in-network pharmacy and in accordance with the applicable
provider network contract. Such coverage must be provided to the
same extent as if the services were provided by another provider of
health care, as applicable to the services being provided. The terms
of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services listed in subsection 1 and provided by
such a pharmacist to a number of occasions less than the coverage
for such services when provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services listed in subsection 1 and
provided by such a pharmacist to an amount less than the amount
reimbursed for similar services provided by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
3. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
4. If a covered therapeutic equivalent listed in subsection 1 is
not available or a provider of health care deems a covered
therapeutic equivalent to be medically inappropriate, an alternate
therapeutic equivalent prescribed by a provider of health care must
be covered by the insurer.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 9, 10 and 12, an
insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage to obtain any benefit included in the
policy pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured any such benefit.
6. Coverage pursuant to this section for the covered dependent
of an insured must be the same as for the insured.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a policy
subject to the provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for
delivery or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, has the legal effect
-
*AB74*

– 95 –
of including the coverage required by this section, and any provision
of the policy or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is
void.
8. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
and which is affiliated with a religious organization is not required
to provide the coverage required by subsection 1 if the insurer
objects on religious grounds. Such an insurer shall, before the
issuance of a policy of health insurance and before the renewal of
such a policy, provide to the prospective insured written notice of
the coverage that the insurer refuses to provide pursuant to this
subsection.
9. An insurer may require an insured to pay a higher
deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception if
the insured refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent of the drug.
10. For each of the 18 methods of contraception listed in
subsection 11 that have been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration, a policy of health insurance must include at least
one drug or device for contraception within each method for which
no deductible, copayment or coinsurance may be charged to the
insured, but the insurer may charge a deductible, copayment or
coinsurance for any other drug or device that provides the same
method of contraception. If the insurer charges a copayment or
coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the insurer may only
require an insured to pay the copayment or coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
11. The following 18 methods of contraception must be
covered pursuant to this section:
(a) Voluntary sterilization for women;
(b) Surgical sterilization implants for women;
(c) Implantable rods;
(d) Copper-based intrauterine devices;
(e) Progesterone-based intrauterine devices;
(f) Injections;
(g) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs;
(h) Progestin-based drugs;
(i) Extended- or continuous-regimen drugs;
(j) Estrogen- and progestin-based patches;
(k) Vaginal contraceptive rings;
(l) Diaphragms with spermicide;
(m) Sponges with spermicide;
(n) Cervical caps with spermicide;
(o) Female condoms;
(p) Spermicide;
-
*AB74*

– 96 –
(q) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs for
emergency contraception or progestin-based drugs for emergency
contraception; and
(r) Ulipristal acetate for emergency contraception.
12. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
13. An insurer shall not:
(a) Use medical management techniques to require an insured to
use a method of contraception other than the method prescribed or
ordered by a provider of health care;
(b) Require an insured to obtain prior authorization for the
benefits described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1; or
(c) Refuse to cover a contraceptive injection or the insertion of a
device described in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of subsection 11 at a
hospital immediately after an insured gives birth.
14. An insurer must provide an accessible, transparent and
expedited process which is not unduly burdensome by which an
insured, or the authorized representative of the insured, may request
an exception relating to any medical management technique used by
the insurer to obtain any benefit required by this section without a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance.
15. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that has entered
into a contract with an insurer to provide services to insureds
through a network plan offered or issued by the insurer.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d)] “Provider network contract” [means] includes a contract
between an insurer and a [provider of health care or] pharmacy
specifying the rights and responsibilities of the insurer and the
[provider of health care or] pharmacy [, as applicable,] for delivery
of health care services pursuant to a network plan.
-
*AB74*

– 97 –
[(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(f) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.]
Sec. 143. NRS 689A.0419 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0419 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with intervention services
consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm, supportive
services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression;
(h) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
(i) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(j) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
-
*AB74*

– 98 –
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(k) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of health
insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
[6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
-
*AB74*

– 99 –
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 144. NRS 689A.0428 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0428 1. An insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Necessary case management services for an insured
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Medically necessary care for an insured who has been
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants.
2. An insurer that issues a policy of health insurance which
provides coverage for prescription drugs shall include in the policy
coverage for medically necessary prescription drugs to treat sickle
cell disease and its variants.
3. An insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to use
for such treatment.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other health
care management services to assist patients and providers of health
care, including, without limitation, identifying and facilitating
additional resources and treatments, providing information about
treatment options and facilitating communication between providers
of services to a patient.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services. The
term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy, prior
authorization or categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type
or method of administration.
(c)] “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.055.
[(d)] (c) “Sickle cell disease and its variants” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.4927.
Sec. 145. NRS 689A.0432 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0432 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
an insurer that issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
-
*AB74*

– 100 –
policy coverage for the medically necessary treatment of conditions
relating to gender dysphoria and gender incongruence. Such
coverage must include coverage of medically necessary
psychosocial and surgical intervention and any other medically
necessary treatment for such disorders provided by:
(a) Endocrinologists;
(b) Pediatric endocrinologists;
(c) Social workers;
(d) Psychiatrists;
(e) Psychologists;
(f) Gynecologists;
(g) Speech-language pathologists;
(h) Primary care physicians;
(i) Advanced practice registered nurses;
(j) Physician assistants; and
(k) Any other providers of medically necessary services for the
treatment of gender dysphoria or gender incongruence.
2. This section does not require a policy of health insurance to
include coverage for cosmetic surgery performed by a plastic
surgeon or reconstructive surgeon that is not medically necessary.
3. An insurer that issues a policy of health insurance shall not
categorically refuse to cover medically necessary gender-affirming
treatments or procedures or revisions to prior treatments if the
policy provides coverage for any such services, procedures or
revisions for purposes other than gender transition or affirmation.
4. An insurer that issues a policy of health insurance may
prescribe requirements that must be satisfied before the insurer
covers surgical treatment of conditions relating to gender dysphoria
or gender incongruence for an insured who is less than 18 years of
age. Such requirements may include, without limitation,
requirements that:
(a) The treatment must be recommended by a psychologist,
psychiatrist or other mental health professional;
(b) The treatment must be recommended by a physician;
(c) The insured must provide a written expression of the desire
of the insured to undergo the treatment;
(d) A written plan for treatment that covers at least 1 year must
be developed and approved by at least two providers of health care;
and
(e) Parental consent is provided for the insured unless the
insured is expressly authorized by law to consent on his or her own
behalf.
5. When determining whether treatment is medically necessary
for the purposes of this section, an insurer must consider the most
-
*AB74*

– 101 –
recent Standards of Care published by the World Professional
Association for Transgender Health, or its successor organization.
6. An insurer shall make a reasonable effort to ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the insurer. If, after a reasonable effort, the insurer is unable
to make such benefits available through such a provider of health
care, the insurer may treat the treatment that the insurer is unable to
make available through such a provider of health care in the same
manner as other services provided by a provider of health care who
does not participate in the network plan of the insurer.
7. If an insured appeals the denial of a claim or coverage under
this section on the grounds that the treatment requested by the
insured is not medically necessary, the insurer must consult with a
provider of health care who has experience in prescribing or
delivering gender-affirming treatment concerning the medical
necessity of the treatment requested by the insured when
considering the appeal.
8. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
July 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal
which is in conflict with this section is void.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cosmetic surgery”:
(1) Means a surgical procedure that:
(I) Does not meaningfully promote the proper function of
the body;
(II) Does not prevent or treat illness or disease; and
(III) Is primarily directed at improving the appearance of
a person.
(2) Includes, without limitation, cosmetic surgery directed at
preserving beauty.
(b) “Gender dysphoria” means distress or impairment in social,
occupational or other areas of functioning caused by a marked
difference between the gender identity or expression of a person and
the sex assigned to the person at birth which lasts at least 6 months
and is shown by at least two of the following:
(1) A marked difference between gender identity or
expression and primary or secondary sex characteristics or
anticipated secondary sex characteristics in young adolescents.
(2) A strong desire to be rid of primary or secondary sex
characteristics because of a marked difference between such sex
characteristics and gender identity or expression or a desire to
-
*AB74*

– 102 –
prevent the development of anticipated secondary sex characteristics
in young adolescents.
(3) A strong desire for the primary or secondary sex
characteristics of the gender opposite from the sex assigned at birth.
(4) A strong desire to be of the opposite gender or a gender
different from the sex assigned at birth.
(5) A strong desire to be treated as the opposite gender or a
gender different from the sex assigned at birth.
(6) A strong conviction of experiencing typical feelings and
reactions of the opposite gender or a gender different from the sex
assigned at birth.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient; and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending or
approving a health care service or product does not, by itself, make
that health care service or product medically necessary.
[(d) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 146. NRS 689A.0437 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0437 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
-
*AB74*

– 103 –
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the insurer;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
insurer for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal
to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the insurer for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. An insurer shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
-
*AB74*

– 104 –
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 147. NRS 689A.044 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.044 1. A policy of health insurance must provide
coverage for benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid testing for high-risk strains of human
papillomavirus every 3 years for women 30 years of age or older;
and
(b) Administering the human papillomavirus vaccine as
recommended for vaccination by a competent authority, including,
without limitation, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
Food and Drug Administration or the manufacturer of the vaccine.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of health
insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 105 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter which is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Human] , “human papillomavirus vaccine” means the
Quadrivalent Human Papillomavirus Recombinant Vaccine or its
successor which is approved by the Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human papillomavirus infection and cervical
cancer.
[(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 148. NRS 689A.0446 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0446 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, an insurer that issues a policy of health insurance shall
include in the policy coverage for medically necessary biomarker
testing for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management and
ongoing monitoring of cancer when such biomarker testing is
-
*AB74*

– 106 –
supported by medical and scientific evidence. Such evidence
includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. An insurer shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens.
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of cancer; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the insurer.
3. If an insurer requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the insurer shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience;
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the insurer; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the policy or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
-
*AB74*

– 107 –
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
-
*AB74*

– 108 –
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 149. NRS 689A.0459 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0459 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder, including, without limitation, lofexidine.
(b) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder, including, without limitation, buprenorphine,
methadone and naltrexone.
(c) The services described in NRS 639.28079 when provided by
a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the
insurer. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the
provision of reimbursement for such services.
(d) Any service for the treatment of substance use disorder
provided by a provider of primary care if the service is covered
when provided by a specialist and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
shall reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the
network plan of the insurer for the services described in NRS
639.28079 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
3. An insurer shall provide the coverage required by
paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1 regardless of whether the
drug is included in the formulary of the insurer.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an insurer
shall not subject the benefits required by paragraphs (a), (b) and (c)
of subsection 1 to medical management techniques, other than step
-
*AB74*

– 109 –
therapy. An insurer may subject the benefits required by paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 to other reasonable medical management
techniques when the benefits are provided by a pharmacist in
accordance with NRS 639.28079.
5. An insurer shall not:
(a) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 1; or
(b) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service.
6. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
7. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 150. NRS 689A.080 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.080 1. [There] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 4, there shall be a provision as follows:

Reinstatement: If any renewal premium be not paid within
the time granted the insured for payment, a subsequent
acceptance of premium by the insurer or by any agent duly
authorized by the insurer to accept such premium, without
requiring in connection therewith an application for
-
*AB74*

– 110 –
reinstatement, shall reinstate the policy; provided, however,
that if the insurer or such agent requires an application for
reinstatement and issues a conditional receipt for the premium
tendered, the policy will be reinstated upon approval of such
application by the insurer or, lacking such approval, upon the
45th day following the date of such conditional receipt unless
the insurer has previously notified the insured in writing of its
disapproval of such application. The reinstated policy shall
cover only loss resulting from such accidental injury as may
be sustained after the date of reinstatement and loss due to
such sickness as may begin more than 10 days after such date.
In all other respects the insured and insurer shall have the
same rights thereunder as they had under the policy
immediately before the due date of the defaulted premium,
subject to any provisions endorsed herein or attached hereto
in connection with the reinstatement. Any premium accepted
in connection with a reinstatement shall be applied to a period
for which premium has not been previously paid, but not to
any period more than 60 days prior to the date of
reinstatement.

2. The last sentence of subsection 1 may be omitted from any
policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to
its terms by the timely payment of premiums:
(a) Until at least age 50; or
(b) In the case of a policy issued after age 44, for at least 5 years
from its date of issue.
3. Pursuant to the last sentence in subsection 1, the insurer
shall apply the premium accepted in such manner as to place the
policy currently in force, exclusive of any applicable grace period,
but not in any event to any period more than 60 days prior to the
date of reinstatement.
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to a health
benefit plan, as defined in NRS 689A.540.
Sec. 151. NRS 689A.135 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.135 1. A person insured under a policy of health
insurance may assign his or her right to benefits to the provider of
health care who provided the services covered by the policy. The
insurer shall pay all or the part of the benefits assigned by the
insured to the person designated by the insured. A payment made
pursuant to this subsection discharges the insurer’s obligation to pay
those benefits.
2. If the insured makes an assignment under this section, but
the insurer after receiving a copy of the assignment pays the benefits
-
*AB74*

– 111 –
to the insured, the insurer shall also pay those benefits to the
provider of health care who received the assignment as soon as the
insurer receives notice of the incorrect payment.
[3. For the purpose of this section, “provider of health care”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 152. NRS 689A.635 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.635 [1.] An individual carrier that offers coverage
through a network plan is not required pursuant to NRS 689A.630 to
offer coverage to or accept an application from a person if the
person does not reside or work in the geographic service area or in a
geographic rating area, provided that the coverage is refused or
terminated uniformly without regard to any health status-related
factor of any eligible person.
[2. As used in this section, “network plan” means a health
benefit plan offered by a health carrier under which the financing
and delivery of medical care is provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers under contract with the carrier.
The term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.]
Sec. 153. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 154 to 159, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 154. As used in this chapter, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in sections 155 to
159, inclusive, of this act, have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 155. “Medical management technique” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 299 of this act.
Sec. 156. “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.645.
Sec. 157. “Provider network contract” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 687B.658.
Sec. 158. “Provider of health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 159. “Therapeutic equivalent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 302 of this act.
Sec. 160. NRS 689B.0312 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0312 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
-
*AB74*

– 112 –
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the insurer;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
insurer for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal
to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the insurer for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. An insurer shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
5. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
-
*AB74*

– 113 –
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 161. NRS 689B.0313 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0313 1. A policy of group health insurance must
provide coverage for benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid testing for high-risk strains of human
papillomavirus every 3 years for women 30 years of age or older;
and
(b) Administering the human papillomavirus vaccine as
recommended for vaccination by a competent authority, including,
without limitation, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
Food and Drug Administration or the manufacturer of the vaccine.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of group health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of group
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 114 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter which is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Human] “human papillomavirus vaccine” means the
Quadrivalent Human Papillomavirus Recombinant Vaccine or its
successor which is approved by the Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human papillomavirus infection and cervical
cancer.
[(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 162. NRS 689B.0314 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0314 1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling
and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women
under circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or
testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
-
*AB74*

– 115 –
2. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2022, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 163. NRS 689B.0315 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0315 1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall provide coverage for the examination of a person
who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the insurer; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
July 1, 2021, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that conflicts with
the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical] , “medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 652.060.
[(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
-
*AB74*

– 116 –
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 164. NRS 689B.0319 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0319 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder, including, without limitation, lofexidine.
(b) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder, including, without limitation, buprenorphine,
methadone and naltrexone.
(c) The services described in NRS 639.28079 when provided by
a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the
insurer. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the
provision of reimbursement for such services.
(d) Any service for the treatment of substance use disorder
provided by a provider of primary care if the service is covered
when provided by a specialist and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates
in the network plan of the insurer for the services described in NRS
639.28079 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
3. An insurer shall provide the coverage required by
paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1 regardless of whether the
drug is included in the formulary of the insurer.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an insurer
shall not subject the benefits required by paragraphs (a), (b) and (c)
of subsection 1 to medical management techniques, other than step
therapy. An insurer may subject the benefits required by paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 to other reasonable medical management
techniques when the benefits are provided by a pharmacist in
accordance with NRS 639.28079.
5. An insurer shall not:
(a) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 1; or
-
*AB74*

– 117 –
(b) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service.
6. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
7. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 165. NRS 689B.0334 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0334 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
an insurer that issues a policy of group health insurance shall
include in the policy coverage for the medically necessary treatment
of conditions relating to gender dysphoria and gender incongruence.
Such coverage must include coverage of medically necessary
psychosocial and surgical intervention and any other medically
necessary treatment for such disorders provided by:
(a) Endocrinologists;
(b) Pediatric endocrinologists;
(c) Social workers;
(d) Psychiatrists;
(e) Psychologists;
(f) Gynecologists;
(g) Speech-language pathologists;
(h) Primary care physicians;
-
*AB74*

– 118 –
(i) Advanced practice registered nurses;
(j) Physician assistants; and
(k) Any other providers of medically necessary services for the
treatment of gender dysphoria or gender incongruence.
2. This section does not require a policy of group health
insurance to include coverage for cosmetic surgery performed by a
plastic surgeon or reconstructive surgeon that is not medically
necessary.
3. An insurer that issues a policy of group health insurance
shall not categorically refuse to cover medically necessary gender-
affirming treatments or procedures or revisions to prior treatments if
the policy provides coverage for any such services, procedures or
revisions for purposes other than gender transition or affirmation.
4. An insurer that issues a policy of group health insurance
may prescribe requirements that must be satisfied before the insurer
covers surgical treatment of conditions relating to gender dysphoria
or gender incongruence for an insured who is less than 18 years of
age. Such requirements may include, without limitation,
requirements that:
(a) The treatment must be recommended by a psychologist,
psychiatrist or other mental health professional;
(b) The treatment must be recommended by a physician;
(c) The insured must provide a written expression of the desire
of the insured to undergo the treatment;
(d) A written plan for treatment that covers at least 1 year must
be developed and approved by at least two providers of health care;
and
(e) Parental consent is provided for the insured unless the
insured is expressly authorized by law to consent on his or her own
behalf.
5. When determining whether treatment is medically necessary
for the purposes of this section, an insurer must consider the most
recent Standards of Care published by the World Professional
Association for Transgender Health, or its successor organization.
6. An insurer shall make a reasonable effort to ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the insurer. If, after a reasonable effort, the insurer is unable
to make such benefits available through such a provider of health
care, the insurer may treat the treatment that the insurer is unable to
make available through such a provider of health care in the same
manner as other services provided by a provider of health care who
does not participate in the network plan of the insurer.
7. If an insured appeals the denial of a claim or coverage under
this section on the grounds that the treatment requested by the
-
*AB74*

– 119 –
insured is not medically necessary, the insurer must consult with a
provider of health care who has experience in prescribing or
delivering gender-affirming treatment concerning the medical
necessity of the treatment requested by the insured when
considering the appeal.
8. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after July 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cosmetic surgery”:
(1) Means a surgical procedure that:
(I) Does not meaningfully promote the proper function of
the body;
(II) Does not prevent or treat illness or disease; and
(III) Is primarily directed at improving the appearance of
a person.
(2) Includes, without limitation, cosmetic surgery directed at
preserving beauty.
(b) “Gender dysphoria” means distress or impairment in social,
occupational or other areas of functioning caused by a marked
difference between the gender identity or expression of a person and
the sex assigned to the person at birth which lasts at least 6 months
and is shown by at least two of the following:
(1) A marked difference between gender identity or
expression and primary or secondary sex characteristics or
anticipated secondary sex characteristics in young adolescents.
(2) A strong desire to be rid of primary or secondary sex
characteristics because of a marked difference between such sex
characteristics and gender identity or expression or a desire to
prevent the development of anticipated secondary sex characteristics
in young adolescents.
(3) A strong desire for the primary or secondary sex
characteristics of the gender opposite from the sex assigned at birth.
(4) A strong desire to be of the opposite gender or a gender
different from the sex assigned at birth.
(5) A strong desire to be treated as the opposite gender or a
gender different from the sex assigned at birth.
(6) A strong conviction of experiencing typical feelings and
reactions of the opposite gender or a gender different from the sex
assigned at birth.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
-
*AB74*

– 120 –
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient; and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending or
approving a health care service or product does not, by itself, make
that health care service or product medically necessary.
[(d) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 166. NRS 689B.0358 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0358 1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Necessary case management services for an insured who has
been diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Medically necessary care for an insured who has been
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants.
2. An insurer that issues a policy of group health insurance
which provides coverage for prescription drugs shall include in the
policy coverage for medically necessary prescription drugs to treat
sickle cell disease and its variants.
3. An insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to use
for such treatment.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other health
care management services to assist patients and providers of health
care, including, without limitation, identifying and facilitating
additional resources and treatments, providing information about
-
*AB74*

– 121 –
treatment options and facilitating communication between providers
of services to a patient.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services. The
term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy, prior
authorization or categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type
or method of administration.
(c)] “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.055.
[(d)] (c) “Sickle cell disease and its variants” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.4927.
Sec. 167. NRS 689B.0361 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0361 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, an insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for medically
necessary biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate
management and ongoing monitoring of cancer when such
biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific evidence.
Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. An insurer shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens.
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of cancer; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the insurer.
3. If an insurer requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the insurer shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
-
*AB74*

– 122 –
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience;
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the insurer; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.
5. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the policy or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
-
*AB74*

– 123 –
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 168. NRS 689B.0374 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0374 1. A policy of group health insurance must
provide coverage for benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) A mammogram to screen for breast cancer annually for
insureds who are 40 years of age or older.
(b) An imaging test to screen for breast cancer on an interval
and at the age deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary,
as recommended by the insured’s provider of health care based on
personal or family medical history or additional factors that may
increase the risk of breast cancer for the insured.
(c) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age deemed
most appropriate, when medically necessary, as recommended by
the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate an abnormality
which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from a mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or an imaging test described in paragraph (b); or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
-
*AB74*

– 124 –
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of group health insurance shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other
form of cost-sharing or require a longer waiting period or other
condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of group
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter which is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified policy of group health
insurance with respect to the deductible of such a policy of group
health insurance after the insured has satisfied the minimum
deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, except with respect to items
or services that constitute preventive care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. §
223(c)(2)(C), in which case the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
-
*AB74*

– 125 –
subsection 3 shall apply regardless of whether the minimum
deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 223 has been satisfied.
7. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified] , “qualified policy of group health insurance”
means a policy of group health insurance that has a high deductible
and is in compliance with 26 U.S.C. § 223 for the purposes of
establishing a health savings account.
Sec. 169. NRS 689B.0376 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0376 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance which provides coverage for prescription
drugs or devices shall include in the policy coverage for any type of
hormone replacement therapy which is lawfully prescribed or
ordered and which has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for a prescription for hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use in the future hormone
replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
-
*AB74*

– 126 –
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after October 1,
1999, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage for fertility drugs.
[5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 170. NRS 689B.03765 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.03765 1. A policy of group health insurance which
provides coverage for prescription drugs must not require an insured
to submit to a step therapy protocol before covering a drug approved
by the Food and Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a
psychiatric condition of the insured, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in the network plan of the insurer is located 60
miles or more from the residence of the insured; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the insured, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of a policy of group health insurance subject
to the provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery
or renewed on or after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this
section is void.
3. As used in this section:
-
*AB74*

– 127 –
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) [“Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care is provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set
of providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c)] “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
insured to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the insured before his or her policy of group
health insurance provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 171. NRS 689B.0377 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0377 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance which provides coverage for outpatient care
shall include in the policy coverage for any health care service
related to hormone replacement therapy.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance that provides coverage for outpatient care shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for outpatient care related to hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use in the future hormone
replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after October 1,
1999, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
[4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 128 –
Sec. 172. NRS 689B.0378 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0378 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8,
an insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health insurance
shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Listed in subsection 12; and
(4) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Listed in subsection 12;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion of a device for contraception or removal of such a
device if the device was inserted while the insured was covered by
the same policy of group health insurance;
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraception and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(g) Voluntary sterilization for women.
2. An insurer shall provide coverage for any services listed in
subsection 1 which are within the authorized scope of practice of a
pharmacist when such services are provided by a pharmacist who is
employed by or serves as an independent contractor of an in-
network pharmacy and in accordance with the applicable network
contract. Such coverage must be provided to the same extent as if
the services were provided by another provider of health care, as
applicable to the services being provided. The terms of the policy
must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services listed in subsection 1 and provided by
such a pharmacist to a number of occasions less than the coverage
for such services when provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services listed in subsection 1 and
provided by such a pharmacist to an amount less than the amount
reimbursed for similar services provided by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
3. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
-
*AB74*

– 129 –
4. If a covered therapeutic equivalent listed in subsection 1 is
not available or a provider of health care deems a covered
therapeutic equivalent to be medically inappropriate, an alternate
therapeutic equivalent prescribed by a provider of health care must
be covered by the insurer.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 10, 11 and 13,
an insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health insurance
shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit included in the policy pursuant
to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement to the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
6. Coverage pursuant to this section for the covered dependent
of an insured must be the same as for the insured.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a policy
subject to the provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for
delivery or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, has the legal effect
of including the coverage required by this section, and any provision
of the policy or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is
void.
8. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance and which is affiliated with a religious organization is not
required to provide the coverage required by subsection 1 if the
insurer objects on religious grounds. Such an insurer shall, before
the issuance of a policy of group health insurance and before the
renewal of such a policy, provide to the group policyholder or
prospective insured, as applicable, written notice of the coverage
that the insurer refuses to provide pursuant to this subsection.
9. If an insurer refuses, pursuant to subsection 8, to provide the
coverage required by subsection 1, an employer may otherwise
provide for the coverage for the employees of the employer.
-
*AB74*

– 130 –
10. An insurer may require an insured to pay a higher
deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception if
the insured refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent of the drug.
11. For each of the 18 methods of contraception listed in
subsection 12 that have been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration, a policy of group health insurance must include at
least one drug or device for contraception within each method for
which no deductible, copayment or coinsurance may be charged to
the insured, but the insurer may charge a deductible, copayment or
coinsurance for any other drug or device that provides the same
method of contraception. If the insurer charges a copayment or
coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the insurer may only
require an insured to pay the copayment or coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
12. The following 18 methods of contraception must be
covered pursuant to this section:
(a) Voluntary sterilization for women;
(b) Surgical sterilization implants for women;
(c) Implantable rods;
(d) Copper-based intrauterine devices;
(e) Progesterone-based intrauterine devices;
(f) Injections;
(g) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs;
(h) Progestin-based drugs;
(i) Extended- or continuous-regimen drugs;
(j) Estrogen- and progestin-based patches;
(k) Vaginal contraceptive rings;
(l) Diaphragms with spermicide;
(m) Sponges with spermicide;
(n) Cervical caps with spermicide;
(o) Female condoms;
(p) Spermicide;
(q) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs for
emergency contraception or progestin-based drugs for emergency
contraception; and
(r) Ulipristal acetate for emergency contraception.
13. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
14. An insurer shall not:
-
*AB74*

– 131 –
(a) Use medical management techniques to require an insured to
use a method of contraception other than the method prescribed or
ordered by a provider of health care;
(b) Require an insured to obtain prior authorization for the
benefits described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1; or
(c) Refuse to cover a contraceptive injection or the insertion of a
device described in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of subsection 12 at a
hospital immediately after an insured gives birth.
15. An insurer must provide an accessible, transparent and
expedited process which is not unduly burdensome by which an
insured, or the authorized representative of the insured, may request
an exception relating to any medical management technique used by
the insurer to obtain any benefit required by this section without a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance.
16. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that has entered
into a contract with an insurer to provide services to insureds
through a network plan offered or issued by the insurer.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d)] “Provider network contract” [means] includes a contract
between an insurer and a [provider of health care or] pharmacy
specifying the rights and responsibilities of the insurer and the
[provider of health care or] pharmacy [, as applicable,] for delivery
of health care services pursuant to a network plan.
[(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(f) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.]
-
*AB74*

– 132 –
Sec. 173. NRS 689B.03785 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.03785 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression;
(h) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
(i) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(j) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(k) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of group health insurance shall not:
-
*AB74*

– 133 –
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of group
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
[6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 134 –
Sec. 174. NRS 689B.570 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.570 [1.] A carrier that offers coverage through a
network plan is not required to offer coverage to or accept an
application from an employer that does not employ or no longer
employs any enrollees who reside or work in the geographic service
area of the carrier, provided that such coverage is refused or
terminated uniformly without regard to any health status-related
factor for any employee of the employer.
[2. As used in this section, “network plan” means a health
benefit plan offered by a health carrier under which the financing
and delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for
as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers under contract with the carrier. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.]
Sec. 175. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 176 to 179, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 176. “Medical management technique” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 299 of this act.
Sec. 177. “Provider network contract” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 687B.658.
Sec. 178. “Provider of health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 179. “Therapeutic equivalent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 302 of this act.
Sec. 180. NRS 689C.015 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.015 Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, as used
in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the words and
terms defined in NRS 689C.017 to 689C.106, inclusive, and
sections 176 to 179, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 181. NRS 689C.077 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.077 “Network plan” [means a health benefit plan offered
by a health carrier under which] has the [financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the carrier. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.] meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 687B.645.
-
*AB74*

– 135 –
Sec. 182. NRS 689C.1565 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1565 1. A carrier is not required to provide coverage to
small employers pursuant to NRS 689C.156:
(a) During any period in which the Commissioner determines
that requiring the carrier to provide such coverage would place the
carrier in a financially impaired condition.
(b) If the carrier elects not to offer any new coverage to any
small employers in this State. A carrier that elects not to offer new
coverage in accordance with this paragraph may maintain its
existing policies issued to small employers in this State, subject to
the requirements of NRS 689B.560 and 689C.310 . [and 689C.320.]
2. A carrier that elects not to offer new coverage pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall notify the Commissioner
forthwith of that election and shall not thereafter write any new
business to small employers in this State for 5 years after the date of
the notification.
Sec. 183. NRS 689C.1652 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1652 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall include in the health
benefit plan coverage for the medically necessary treatment of
conditions relating to gender dysphoria and gender incongruence.
Such coverage must include coverage of medically necessary
psychosocial and surgical intervention and any other medically
necessary treatment for such disorders provided by:
(a) Endocrinologists;
(b) Pediatric endocrinologists;
(c) Social workers;
(d) Psychiatrists;
(e) Psychologists;
(f) Gynecologists;
(g) Speech-language pathologists;
(h) Primary care physicians;
(i) Advanced practice registered nurses;
(j) Physician assistants; and
(k) Any other providers of medically necessary services for the
treatment of gender dysphoria or gender incongruence.
2. This section does not require a health benefit plan to include
coverage for cosmetic surgery performed by a plastic surgeon or
reconstructive surgeon that is not medically necessary.
3. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall not
categorically refuse to cover medically necessary gender-affirming
treatments or procedures or revisions to prior treatments if the plan
-
*AB74*

– 136 –
provides coverage for any such services, procedures or revisions for
purposes other than gender transition or affirmation.
4. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan may prescribe
requirements that must be satisfied before the carrier covers surgical
treatment of conditions relating to gender dysphoria or gender
incongruence for an insured who is less than 18 years of age. Such
requirements may include, without limitation, requirements that:
(a) The treatment must be recommended by a psychologist,
psychiatrist or other mental health professional;
(b) The treatment must be recommended by a physician;
(c) The insured must provide a written expression of the desire
of the insured to undergo the treatment;
(d) A written plan for treatment that covers at least 1 year must
be developed and approved by at least two providers of health care;
and
(e) Parental consent is provided for the insured unless the
insured is expressly authorized by law to consent on his or her own
behalf.
5. When determining whether treatment is medically necessary
for the purposes of this section, a carrier must consider the most
recent Standards of Care published by the World Professional
Association for Transgender Health, or its successor organization.
6. A carrier shall make a reasonable effort to ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the carrier. If, after a reasonable effort, the carrier is unable
to make such benefits available through such a provider of health
care, the carrier may treat the treatment that the carrier is unable to
make available through such a provider of health care in the same
manner as other services provided by a provider of health care who
does not participate in the network plan of the carrier.
7. If an insured appeals the denial of a claim or coverage under
this section on the grounds that the treatment requested by the
insured is not medically necessary, the carrier must consult with a
provider of health care who has experience in prescribing or
delivering gender-affirming treatment concerning the medical
necessity of the treatment requested by the insured when
considering the appeal.
8. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after July 1,
2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or renewal which is in
conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cosmetic surgery”:
-
*AB74*

– 137 –
(1) Means a surgical procedure that:
(I) Does not meaningfully promote the proper function of
the body;
(II) Does not prevent or treat illness or disease; and
(III) Is primarily directed at improving the appearance of
a person.
(2) Includes, without limitation, cosmetic surgery directed at
preserving beauty.
(b) “Gender dysphoria” means distress or impairment in social,
occupational or other areas of functioning caused by a marked
difference between the gender identity or expression of a person and
the sex assigned to the person at birth which lasts at least 6 months
and is shown by at least two of the following:
(1) A marked difference between gender identity or
expression and primary or secondary sex characteristics or
anticipated secondary sex characteristics in young adolescents.
(2) A strong desire to be rid of primary or secondary sex
characteristics because of a marked difference between such sex
characteristics and gender identity or expression or a desire to
prevent the development of anticipated secondary sex characteristics
in young adolescents.
(3) A strong desire for the primary or secondary sex
characteristics of the gender opposite from the sex assigned at birth.
(4) A strong desire to be of the opposite gender or a gender
different from the sex assigned at birth.
(5) A strong desire to be treated as the opposite gender or a
gender different from the sex assigned at birth.
(6) A strong conviction of experiencing typical feelings and
reactions of the opposite gender or a gender different from the sex
assigned at birth.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient; and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
-
*AB74*

– 138 –
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending or
approving a health care service or product does not, by itself, make
that health care service or product medically necessary.
[(d) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 184. NRS 689C.1665 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1665 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder, including, without limitation, lofexidine.
(b) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder, including, without limitation, buprenorphine,
methadone and naltrexone.
(c) The services described in NRS 639.28079 when provided by
a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the
carrier. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the
provision of reimbursement for such services.
(d) Any service for the treatment of substance use disorder
provided by a provider of primary care if the service is covered
when provided by a specialist and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network
plan of the carrier for the services described in NRS 639.28079 at a
rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar
services.
3. A carrier shall provide the coverage required by paragraphs
(a) and (b) of subsection 1 regardless of whether the drug is
included in the formulary of the carrier.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a carrier
shall not subject the benefits required by paragraphs (a), (b) and (c)
-
*AB74*

– 139 –
of subsection 1 to medical management techniques, other than step
therapy. A carrier may subject the benefits required by paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 to other reasonable medical management
techniques when the benefits are provided by a pharmacist in
accordance with NRS 639.28079.
5. A carrier shall not:
(a) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 1; or
(b) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service.
6. A carrier shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
7. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 185. NRS 689C.1671 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1671 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
-
*AB74*

– 140 –
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the carrier;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the health benefit plan of the
carrier.
2. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the health benefit plan of
the carrier for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate
equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar
services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the carrier for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. A carrier shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A carrier shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
5. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*AB74*

– 141 –
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 186. NRS 689C.1672 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1672 1. A health benefit plan must provide coverage
for benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid testing for high-risk strains of human
papillomavirus every 3 years for women 30 years of age or older;
and
(b) Administering the human papillomavirus vaccine as
recommended for vaccination by a competent authority, including,
without limitation, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
Food and Drug Administration or the manufacturer of the vaccine.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 142 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A plan subject to the provisions of this chapter which is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a carrier may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Human] , “human papillomavirus vaccine” means the
Quadrivalent Human Papillomavirus Recombinant Vaccine or its
successor which is approved by the Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human papillomavirus infection and cervical
cancer.
[(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 187. NRS 689C.1673 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1673 1. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall
provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling and testing for
-
*AB74*

– 143 –
harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women under
circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or testing,
as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. A carrier shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2022, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
[4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 188. NRS 689C.1674 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1674 1. A health benefit plan must provide coverage
for benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) A mammogram to screen for breast cancer annually for
insureds who are 40 years of age or older.
(b) An imaging test to screen for breast cancer on an interval
and at the age deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary,
as recommended by the insured’s provider of health care based on
personal or family medical history or additional factors that may
increase the risk of breast cancer for the insured.
(c) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age deemed
most appropriate, when medically necessary, as recommended by
the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate an abnormality
which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from a mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or an imaging test described in paragraph (b); or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other
form of cost-sharing or require a longer waiting period or other
condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 144 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A plan subject to the provisions of this chapter which is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a carrier may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified health benefit plan with
respect to the deductible of such a health benefit plan after the
insured has satisfied the minimum deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
§ 223, except with respect to items or services that constitute
preventive care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), in which case
the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall apply
regardless of whether the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. §
223 has been satisfied.
7. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
-
*AB74*

– 145 –
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified] , “qualified health benefit plan” means a health
benefit plan that has a high deductible and is in compliance with 26
U.S.C. § 223 for the purposes of establishing a health savings
account.
Sec. 189. NRS 689C.1675 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1675 1. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall
provide coverage for the examination of a person who is pregnant
for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the carrier; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after July 1,
2021, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts with the
provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical] , “medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 652.060.
[(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 190. NRS 689C.1676 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1676 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a
carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall include in the
plan coverage for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Listed in subsection 11; and
(4) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Listed in subsection 11;
-
*AB74*

– 146 –
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion of a device for contraception or removal of such a
device if the device was inserted while the insured was covered by
the same health benefit plan;
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraception and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(g) Voluntary sterilization for women.
2. A carrier shall provide coverage for any services listed in
subsection 1 which are within the authorized scope of practice of a
pharmacist when such services are provided by a pharmacist who is
employed by or serves as an independent contractor of an in-
network pharmacy and in accordance with the applicable provider
network contract. Such coverage must be provided to the same
extent as if the services were provided by another provider of health
care, as applicable to the services being provided. The terms of the
policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services listed in subsection 1 and provided by
such a pharmacist to a number of occasions less than the coverage
for such services when provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services listed in subsection 1 and
provided by such a pharmacist to an amount less than the amount
reimbursed for similar services provided by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
3. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
4. If a covered therapeutic equivalent listed in subsection 1 is
not available or a provider of health care deems a covered
therapeutic equivalent to be medically inappropriate, an alternate
therapeutic equivalent prescribed by a provider of health care must
be covered by the carrier.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 9, 10 and 12, a
carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit included in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 147 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement to the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
6. Coverage pursuant to this section for the covered dependent
of an insured must be the same as for the insured.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a health
benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by this
section, and any provision of the plan or the renewal which is in
conflict with this section is void.
8. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan and which
is affiliated with a religious organization is not required to provide
the coverage required by subsection 1 if the carrier objects on
religious grounds. Such a carrier shall, before the issuance of a
health benefit plan and before the renewal of such a plan, provide to
the prospective insured written notice of the coverage that the
carrier refuses to provide pursuant to this subsection.
9. A carrier may require an insured to pay a higher deductible,
copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception if the insured
refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent of the drug.
10. For each of the 18 methods of contraception listed in
subsection 11 that have been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration, a health benefit plan must include at least one drug
or device for contraception within each method for which no
deductible, copayment or coinsurance may be charged to the
insured, but the carrier may charge a deductible, copayment or
coinsurance for any other drug or device that provides the same
method of contraception. If the carrier charges a copayment or
coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the carrier may only
require an insured to pay the copayment or coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
11. The following 18 methods of contraception must be
covered pursuant to this section:
(a) Voluntary sterilization for women;
-
*AB74*

– 148 –
(b) Surgical sterilization implants for women;
(c) Implantable rods;
(d) Copper-based intrauterine devices;
(e) Progesterone-based intrauterine devices;
(f) Injections;
(g) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs;
(h) Progestin-based drugs;
(i) Extended- or continuous-regimen drugs;
(j) Estrogen- and progestin-based patches;
(k) Vaginal contraceptive rings;
(l) Diaphragms with spermicide;
(m) Sponges with spermicide;
(n) Cervical caps with spermicide;
(o) Female condoms;
(p) Spermicide;
(q) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs for
emergency contraception or progestin-based drugs for emergency
contraception; and
(r) Ulipristal acetate for emergency contraception.
12. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a carrier may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
13. A carrier shall not:
(a) Use medical management techniques to require an insured to
use a method of contraception other than the method prescribed or
ordered by a provider of health care;
(b) Require an insured to obtain prior authorization for the
benefits described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1; or
(c) Refuse to cover a contraceptive injection or the insertion of a
device described in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of subsection 11 at a
hospital immediately after an insured gives birth.
14. A carrier must provide an accessible, transparent and
expedited process which is not unduly burdensome by which an
insured, or the authorized representative of the insured, may request
an exception relating to any medical management technique used by
the carrier to obtain any benefit required by this section without a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance.
15. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that has entered
into a contract with a carrier to provide services to insureds through
a network plan offered or issued by the carrier.
-
*AB74*

– 149 –
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(d)] “Provider network contract” [means] includes a contract
between a carrier and a [provider of health care or] pharmacy
specifying the rights and responsibilities of the carrier and the
[provider of health care or] pharmacy [, as applicable,] for delivery
of health care services pursuant to a network plan.
[(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(f) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.]
Sec. 191. NRS 689C.1678 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1678 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually, with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy;
-
*AB74*

– 150 –
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
(j) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
-
*AB74*

– 151 –
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A plan subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a carrier may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
[6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 192. NRS 689C.1682 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1682 1. A health benefit plan which provides coverage
for prescription drugs must not require an insured to submit to a step
therapy protocol before covering a drug approved by the Food and
Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric
condition of the insured, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
-
*AB74*

– 152 –
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in the network plan of the health carrier is
located 60 miles or more from the residence of the insured; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the insured, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of a health benefit plan subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this
section is void.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) [“Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
health carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical
care is provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the health carrier. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c)] “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
insured to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the insured before his or her health benefit
plan provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 193. NRS 689C.1687 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1687 1. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall
include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Necessary case management services for an insured who has
been diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Medically necessary care for an insured who has been
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants.
2. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan which provides
coverage for prescription drugs shall include in the plan coverage
for medically necessary prescription drugs to treat sickle cell disease
and its variants.
3. A carrier may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to use
for such treatment.
4. As used in this section:
-
*AB74*

– 153 –
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other health
care management services to assist patients and providers of health
care, including, without limitation, identifying and facilitating
additional resources and treatments, providing information about
treatment options and facilitating communication between providers
of services to a patient.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services. The
term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy, prior
authorization or categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type
or method of administration.
(c)] “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.055.
[(d)] (c) “Sickle cell disease and its variants” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.4927.
Sec. 194. NRS 689C.1688 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1688 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall include
in the plan coverage for medically necessary biomarker testing for
the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management and ongoing
monitoring of cancer when such biomarker testing is supported by
medical and scientific evidence. Such evidence includes, without
limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A carrier shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens.
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of cancer; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
-
*AB74*

– 154 –
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the carrier.
3. If a carrier requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the carrier shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a carrier to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience;
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that is
not in the applicable network plan of the carrier; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.
5. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
-
*AB74*

– 155 –
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 195. NRS 689C.325 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.325 A carrier that offers coverage through a network
plan is not required to offer coverage to or accept any applications
for coverage from the eligible employees of a small employer
pursuant to NRS 689B.560 and 689C.310 [and 689C.320] if:
1. The eligible employees do not reside or work in the
geographic service area of the network plan.
2. For a small employer whose eligible employees reside or
work in the geographic service area of the network plan, the carrier
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that the carrier
does not have the capacity to deliver adequate service to additional
small employers and eligible employees because of the existing
obligations of the carrier. If a carrier is authorized by the
Commissioner not to offer coverage pursuant to this subsection, the
carrier shall not thereafter offer coverage to additional small
employers and eligible employees within that geographic service
area until the carrier demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
-
*AB74*

– 156 –
Commissioner that it has regained the capacity to deliver adequate
service to additional small employers and eligible employees within
that service area.
Sec. 196. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and sections 176 to 179, inclusive, of this act
to the extent applicable and not in conflict with the express
provisions of NRS 687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 197. NRS 690A.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690A.260 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
an authorized insurer issuing consumer credit insurance may not
enter into any agreement whereby the authorized insurer transfers,
by reinsurance or otherwise, to an unauthorized insurer, as they
relate to consumer credit insurance written or issued in this State:
(a) A substantial portion of the risk of loss under the consumer
credit insurance written by the authorized insurer in this State;
(b) All of one or more kinds, lines, types or classes of consumer
credit insurance;
(c) All of the consumer credit insurance produced through one
or more agents, agencies or creditors;
(d) All of the consumer credit insurance written or issued in a
designated geographical area; or
(e) All of the consumer credit insurance under a policy of group
insurance.
2. An authorized insurer may make the transfers listed in
subsection 1 to an unauthorized insurer if the unauthorized insurer:
(a) Maintains security on deposit with the Commissioner in an
amount which when added to the actual capital and surplus of the
insurer is equal to the capital and surplus required of an authorized
stock insurer pursuant to NRS 680A.120. The security may consist
only of the following:
(1) Cash.
(2) General obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the
Federal Government, this State or any of its political subdivisions.
These obligations must be valued at the lower of market value or par
value.
(3) Any other type of security that would be acceptable if
posted by a domestic or foreign insurer.
(b) Files an annual statement with the Commissioner pursuant to
NRS 680A.270.
-
*AB74*

– 157 –
(c) Maintains reserves on its consumer credit insurance business
pursuant to NRS 681B.050.
(d) Values its assets and liabilities pursuant to NRS 681B.010 to
681B.040, inclusive.
(e) Agrees to examinations conducted by the Commissioner
pursuant to [NRS 679B.230.] section 15 of this act.
(f) Complies with the standards adopted by the Commissioner
pursuant to NRS 679A.150.
(g) Does not hold, issue or have an arrangement for holding or
issuing any of its stock for which dividends are paid based on:
(1) The experience of a specific risk of all of one or more
kinds, lines, types or classes of insurance;
(2) All of the business produced through one or more agents,
agencies or creditors;
(3) All of the business written in a designated geographical
area; or
(4) All of the business written for one or more forms of
insurance.
Sec. 198. Chapter 690C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 199 and 200 of this act.
Sec. 199. 1. A person who wishes to act as an administrator
for a provider must obtain a certificate of registration issued by
the Commissioner pursuant to NRS 683A.08524.
2. A person who acts as an administrator pursuant to this
chapter shall:
(a) Administer from one or more offices located in this State
all of the claims arising under each service contract that the
person administers;
(b) Maintain in the offices described in paragraph (a) all of
the records concerning the claims described in paragraph (a);
(c) Administer each service contract directly without
subcontracting with another administrator or person;
(d) If the contract between the administrator and the provider
is terminated, transfer all of the records in possession of the
administrator concerning any claim arising under a service
contract to any other administrator that is chosen by the provider;
and
(e) Comply with the requirements of chapter 683A of NRS and
all other relevant provisions of this title for administrators.
Sec. 200. The Commissioner may order any person to cease
and desist any conduct that violates any provision of this chapter.
-
*AB74*

– 158 –
Sec. 201. NRS 690C.020 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.020 “Administrator” means a person who [is responsible
for administering] administers a service contract that is issued, sold
or offered for sale by a provider.
Sec. 202. NRS 690C.070 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.070 “Provider” means a person who [is obligated to a
holder pursuant] :
1. Issues, sells or offers for sale service contracts; or
2. Pursuant to the terms of a service contract [to repair,
replace] , repairs, replaces or [perform] performs maintenance on,
or [to indemnify] indemnifies the holder for the costs of repairing,
replacing or performing maintenance on, goods.
Sec. 203. NRS 690C.120 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.120 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the
marketing, issuance, sale, offering for sale, making, proposing to
make and administration of service contracts are not subject to the
provisions of this title, except, when applicable, the provisions of:
(a) NRS 679B.020 to 679B.152, inclusive;
(b) NRS 679B.159 to [679B.300,] 679B.228, inclusive;
(c) NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive;
(d) NRS 679B.600 to 679B.690, inclusive;
(e) Sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act;
(f) NRS 685B.090 to 685B.190, inclusive;
[(f)] (g) NRS 686A.010 to 686A.095, inclusive;
[(g)] (h) NRS 686A.160 to 686A.187, inclusive; and
[(h)] (i) NRS 686A.260, 686A.270, 686A.280, 686A.300 and
686A.310.
2. A provider, person who sells service contracts, administrator
or any other person is not required to obtain a certificate of authority
from the Commissioner pursuant to chapter 680A of NRS to issue,
sell, offer for sale or administer service contracts.
Sec. 204. NRS 690C.150 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.150 1. A [provider] person shall not [issue, sell or offer
for sale service contracts in this state] act or offer to act in the
capacity of a provider, perform any of the functions, duties or
powers prescribed for a provider or hold himself or herself out to
the public as a provider unless the [provider] person is qualified
and has been issued a certificate of registration as a provider
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
2. A person shall not act or offer to act in the capacity of an
administrator, perform any of the functions, duties or powers
-
*AB74*

– 159 –
prescribed for an administrator or hold himself or herself out to
the public as an administrator unless the person is qualified and
has obtained a certificate of registration issued by the
Commissioner pursuant to NRS 683A.08524.
3. The Commissioner may impose an administrative fine of
not more than $5,000 for each act or violation of the provisions of
subsection 1 or 2.
4. For the protection of the people of this State, the
Commissioner shall not issue or renew, or permit to exist, any
certificate or registration:
(a) For a provider or administrator except in compliance with
the provisions of this chapter and chapter 683A of NRS, as
applicable.
(b) For any person found to be untrustworthy or incompetent,
or who has not established to the satisfaction of the Commissioner
that the person is qualified for a certificate or registration in
accordance with this chapter and chapter 683A of NRS, as
applicable.
Sec. 205. NRS 690C.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.160 1. A [provider] person who wishes to issue, sell or
offer for sale service contracts in this state must submit to the
Commissioner:
(a) A registration application on a form prescribed by the
Commissioner;
(b) Proof that the [provider] person has complied with the
requirements for financial security set forth in NRS 690C.170;
(c) A copy of each type of service contract the [provider] person
proposes to issue, sell or offer for sale;
(d) The name, address and telephone number of each
administrator with whom the [provider] person intends to contract;
(e) A fee of [$2,000] $1,000 and all applicable fees required
pursuant to NRS 680C.110 to be paid at the time of application; and
(f) The following information for each controlling person:
(1) Whether the person, in the last 10 years, has been:
(I) Convicted of a felony or misdemeanor of which an
essential element is fraud;
(II) Insolvent or adjudged bankrupt;
(III) Refused a license or registration as a service contract
provider or had an existing license or registration as a service
contract provider suspended or revoked by any state or
governmental agency or authority; or
(IV) Fined by any state or governmental agency or
authority in any matter regarding service contracts; and
-
*AB74*

– 160 –
(2) Whether there are any pending criminal actions against
the person other than moving traffic violations.
2. In addition to the fee required by subsection 1, a [provider]
person must pay a fee of $25 for each type of service contract the
[provider] person files with the Commissioner.
3. Each year, not later than the anniversary date of his or her
certificate of registration, a provider must pay the annual fee
required pursuant to NRS 680C.110 in addition to any other fee
required pursuant to this section.
4. A certificate of registration is valid for [2 years] 1 year after
the date the Commissioner issues the certificate to the provider. A
provider may renew his or her certificate of registration if, not later
than 60 days before the certificate expires, the provider submits to
the Commissioner:
(a) An application on a form prescribed by the Commissioner;
(b) A fee of [$2,000] $1,000 and, in addition to any other fee or
charge, all applicable fees required pursuant to subsection 3; and
(c) The information required by paragraph (f) of subsection 1:
(1) If an existing controlling person has had a change in any
of the information previously submitted to the Commissioner; or
(2) For a controlling person who has not previously
submitted the information required by paragraph (f) of subsection 1
to the Commissioner.
5. All fees paid pursuant to this section are nonrefundable.
6. Each application submitted pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, an application for renewal, must:
(a) Be signed by an executive officer, if any, of the [provider]
applicant or, if the [provider] applicant does not have an executive
officer, by a controlling person of the [provider;] applicant; and
(b) Have attached to it an affidavit signed by the person
described in paragraph (a) which meets the requirements of
subsection 7.
7. Before signing the application described in subsection 6, the
person who signs the application shall verify that the information
provided is accurate to the best of his or her knowledge.
Sec. 206. NRS 690C.170 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.170 1. To be issued a certificate of registration, a
provider must comply with one of the following to provide for
financial security:
(a) Purchase a contractual liability insurance policy which
insures the obligations of each service contract the provider issues,
sells or offers for sale. The contractual liability insurance policy
must:
-
*AB74*

– 161 –
(1) Be issued by an insurer which is licensed, registered or
otherwise authorized to transact insurance in this state or pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 685A of NRS.
(2) Contain a provision prohibiting the insurer from
terminating the policy until a notice of termination has been mailed
or delivered to the Commissioner at least 60 days prior to the
termination of the policy. Any such termination shall not reduce
the responsibility of the insurer for service contracts issued by the
provider prior to the effective date of termination.
(b) [Maintain a reserve account in this State and deposit with the
Commissioner security as provided in this subsection. The reserve
account must contain at all times an amount of money equal to at
least 40 percent of the unearned gross consideration received by the
provider for any unexpired service contracts. The reserve account
must be kept separate from the operating accounts of the provider
and must be clearly identified as the “ (Provider’s Name) Nevada
Service Contracts Funded Reserve Account.” The Commissioner
may examine the reserve account at any time. The provider shall
also deposit with the Commissioner security in an amount that is
equal to $25,000 or 10 percent of the unearned gross consideration
received by the provider for any unexpired service contracts,
whichever is greater. The security must be:
(1) A surety bond issued by a surety company authorized to
do business in this State;
(2) Securities of the type eligible for deposit pursuant to
NRS 682B.030;
(3) Cash;
(4) An irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial
institution approved by the Commissioner; or
(5) In any other form prescribed by the Commissioner.
(c)] Maintain, or be a subsidiary of a parent company that
maintains, a net worth or stockholders’ equity of at least
$100,000,000. Upon request, a provider shall provide to the
Commissioner a copy of the most recent Form 10-K report or Form
20-F report filed by the provider or parent company of the provider
with the Securities and Exchange Commission within the previous
year. If the provider or parent company is not required to file those
reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the provider
shall provide to the Commissioner a copy of the most recently
audited financial statements of the provider or parent company. If
the net worth or stockholders’ equity of the parent company of the
provider is used to comply with the requirements of this subsection,
the parent company must guarantee to carry out the duties of the
provider under any service contract issued or sold by the provider.
-
*AB74*

– 162 –
2. [A provider shall not use any money in a reserve account
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 for any purpose other
than to pay an obligation of the provider under an unexpired service
contract.
3.] A provider shall maintain the financial security required by
subsection 1 until:
(a) The provider ceases doing business in this State; and
(b) The provider has performed or otherwise satisfied all
liabilities and obligations under all unexpired service contracts
issued by the provider.
[4.] 3. If the certificate of registration of a provider has not
expired and the provider fails to maintain the financial security
required by subsection 1, including, without limitation, if the
financial security is cancelled or lapses, the provider shall not issue
or sell a service contract on or after the effective date of such failure
until the provider submits to the Commissioner proof satisfactory
to the Commissioner that the provider is in compliance with
subsection 1.
Sec. 207. NRS 690C.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
provider shall not include in the name of the business of the
provider:
(a) The words “insurance,” “casualty,” “surety,” “mutual” or
any other word or term that implies that the provider is [engaged in
the business of transacting] an insurance or [is a] surety company;
or
(b) A name that is deceptively similar to the name or description
of an insurer or surety company or the name of another provider.
2. A provider may include the word “guaranty” or a similar
word in the name of the business of the provider.
3. This section does not apply to a provider who, before
January 1, 2000, includes in the name of the business of the provider
a name that does not comply with the provisions of subsection 1.
Such a provider shall include in each service contract the provider
issues, sells or offers for sale a statement that the service contract is
not a contract of insurance.
Sec. 208. NRS 690C.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.260 1. A service contract must:
(a) Be written in language that is understandable and printed in a
typeface that is easy to read.
(b) Indicate that it is insured by a contractual liability insurance
policy if it is so insured, and include the name and address of the
issuer of the policy or that it is backed by the full faith and credit of
-
*AB74*

– 163 –
the provider if the service contract is not insured by a contractual
liability insurance policy.
(c) Include the amount of any deductible that the holder is
required to pay.
(d) Include the name and address of the provider and : [, if
applicable:]
(1) The name and address of the administrator [;] , if
applicable; and
(2) The name of the holder . [, if provided by the holder.]
 The names and addresses of such persons are not required to be
preprinted on the service contract and may be added to the service
contract at the time of the sale.
(e) Include the purchase price of the service contract. The
purchase price must be determined pursuant to a schedule of fees
established by the provider. The purchase price is not required to be
preprinted on the service contract and may be negotiated with the
holder and added to the service contract at the time of sale.
(f) Include a description of the goods covered by the service
contract.
(g) Specify the duties of the provider and any limitations,
exceptions or exclusions.
(h) If the service contract covers a motor vehicle, indicate
whether replacement parts that are not made for or by the original
manufacturer of the motor vehicle may be used to comply with the
terms of the service contract.
(i) Include any restrictions on transferring or renewing the
service contract.
(j) Include the terms, restrictions or conditions for cancelling the
service contract before it expires and the procedure for cancelling
the service contract. The conditions for cancelling the service
contract must include, without limitation, the provisions of
NRS 690C.270.
(k) Include the duties of the holder under the contract, including,
without limitation, the duty to protect against damage to the goods
covered by the service contract or to comply with any instructions
included in the owner’s manual for the goods.
(l) Indicate whether the service contract authorizes the holder to
recover consequential damages.
(m) Indicate whether any defect in the goods covered by the
service contract existing on the date the contract is purchased is not
covered under the service contract.
2. A provider shall not allow, make or cause to be made a false
or misleading statement in any of the service contracts of the
provider or intentionally omit a material statement that causes a
service contract to be misleading. The Commissioner may require
-
*AB74*

– 164 –
the provider to amend any service contract that the Commissioner
determines is false or misleading.
Sec. 209. NRS 690C.310 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.310 1. A provider shall maintain records of the
transactions governed by this chapter. The records of a provider
must include:
(a) A copy of each type of service contract that the provider
issues, sells or offers for sale;
(b) The name and address of each holder who possesses a
service contract under which the provider has a duty to perform ; [,
to the extent that the provider knows the name and address of each
holder;]
(c) A list that includes each location where the provider issues,
sells or offers for sale service contracts; and
(d) The date and a description of each claim made by a holder
under a service contract.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a provider
shall retain all records relating to a service contract for at least [1
year] 3 years after the contract has expired. A provider who intends
to discontinue doing business in this state shall provide the
Commissioner with satisfactory proof that the provider has
discharged his or her duties to the holders in this state and shall not
destroy his or her records without the prior approval of the
Commissioner.
3. The records required to be maintained pursuant to this
section may be stored on a computer disc or other storage device for
a computer from which the records can be readily printed.
Sec. 210. NRS 690C.320 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.320 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the Commissioner may conduct examinations to enforce the
provisions of this chapter pursuant to the provisions of [NRS
679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act at
such times as the Commissioner deems necessary. The
Commissioner is not required to comply with the requirement in
[NRS 679B.230] section 15 of this act that insurers be examined not
less frequently than every 5 years in the enforcement of this chapter.
2. A provider shall, upon the request of the Commissioner,
make available to the Commissioner for inspection any accounts,
books and records concerning any service contract issued, sold or
offered for sale by the provider which are reasonably necessary to
enable the Commissioner to determine whether the provider is in
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
-
*AB74*

– 165 –
Sec. 211. NRS 690C.325 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.325 1. The Commissioner may refuse to renew or may
suspend, limit or revoke a provider’s certificate of registration if the
Commissioner finds after a hearing thereon, or upon waiver of
hearing by the provider, that the provider has:
(a) Violated or failed to comply with any lawful order of the
Commissioner;
(b) Conducted business in an unsuitable manner;
(c) Willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with any
lawful regulation of the Commissioner; or
(d) Violated any provision of this chapter.
 In lieu of such a suspension or revocation, the Commissioner
may levy upon the provider, and the provider shall pay forthwith, an
administrative fine of not more than $1,000 for each act or violation.
2. The Commissioner shall suspend or revoke a provider’s
certificate of registration on any of the following grounds if the
Commissioner finds after a hearing thereon that the provider:
(a) Is in unsound condition, is being fraudulently conducted, or
is in such a condition or is using such methods and practices in the
conduct of its business as to render its further transaction of service
contracts in this State currently or prospectively injurious to service
contract holders or to the public.
(b) Refuses to be examined, or its directors, officers, employees
or representatives refuse to submit to examination relative to its
affairs, or to produce its books, papers, records, contracts,
correspondence or other documents for examination by the
Commissioner when required, or refuse to perform any legal
obligation relative to the examination.
(c) Has failed to pay any final judgment rendered against it in
this State upon any policy, bond, recognizance or undertaking as
issued or guaranteed by it, within 30 days after the judgment
became final or within 30 days after dismissal of an appeal before
final determination, whichever date is the later.
3. The Commissioner may, without advance notice or a hearing
thereon, immediately suspend the certificate of registration of any
provider that has [filed] :
(a) Violated a cease and desist order of the Commissioner; or
(b) Filed for bankruptcy or otherwise been deemed insolvent.
Sec. 212. NRS 690C.330 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.330 [A] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
690C.150, a person who violates any provision of this chapter or an
order or regulation of the Commissioner issued or adopted pursuant
thereto may be assessed a civil penalty by the Commissioner of not
-
*AB74*

– 166 –
more than [$500] $1,000 for each act or violation . [, not to exceed
an aggregate amount of $10,000 for violations of a similar nature.
For the purposes of this section, violations shall be deemed to be of
a similar nature if the violations consist of the same or similar
conduct, regardless of the number of times the conduct occurred.]
Sec. 213. NRS 691C.380 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
691C.380 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
authorized insurer issuing credit personal property insurance may
not enter into any agreement whereby the authorized insurer
transfers, by reinsurance or otherwise, to an unauthorized insurer, as
they relate to credit personal property insurance written or issued in
this State:
(a) A substantial portion of the risk of loss under the credit
personal property insurance written by the authorized insurer in this
State;
(b) All of one or more kinds, lines, types or classes of credit
personal property insurance;
(c) All of the credit personal property insurance produced
through one or more agents, agencies or creditors;
(d) All of the credit personal property insurance written or
issued in a designated geographical area; or
(e) All of the credit personal property insurance under a policy
of group insurance.
2. An authorized insurer may make the transfers listed in
subsection 1 to an unauthorized insurer if the unauthorized insurer:
(a) Maintains security on deposit with the Commissioner in an
amount which when added to the actual capital and surplus of the
insurer is equal to the capital and surplus required of an authorized
stock insurer pursuant to NRS 680A.120. The security may consist
only of the following:
(1) Cash.
(2) General obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the
Federal Government, this State or any of its political subdivisions.
These obligations must be valued at the lower of market value or par
value.
(3) Any other type of security that would be acceptable if
posted by a domestic or foreign insurer.
(b) Files an annual statement with the Commissioner pursuant to
NRS 680A.270.
(c) Maintains reserves on its credit personal property insurance
business pursuant to NRS 681B.050.
(d) Values its assets and liabilities pursuant to NRS 681B.010 to
681B.040, inclusive.
-
*AB74*

– 167 –
(e) Agrees to examinations conducted by the Commissioner
pursuant to [NRS 679B.230.] section 15 of this act.
(f) Complies with the standards adopted by the Commissioner
pursuant to NRS 679A.150.
(g) Does not hold, issue or have an arrangement for holding or
issuing any of its stock for which dividends are paid based on:
(1) The experience of a specific risk of all of one or more
kinds, lines, types or classes of insurance;
(2) All of the business produced through one or more agents,
agencies or creditors;
(3) All of the business written in a designated geographical
area; or
(4) All of the business written for one or more forms of
insurance.
Sec. 214. NRS 692A.100 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
692A.100 1. The Commissioner shall provide by regulation
for the licensing of title agents, their branch offices, direct writing
title insurers and escrow officers.
2. Each title agent shall maintain his or her books of account
and record and his or her vouchers pertaining to title insurance
business in a manner which permits the Commissioner or a
representative of the Commissioner to ascertain readily whether the
agent has complied with the provisions of this chapter.
3. A title agent or escrow officer may engage in the business of
handling escrows, settlements and closings if the title agent or
escrow officer maintains a separate record of all receipts and
disbursements of money held in escrow and does not commingle
that money with his or her own.
4. For the purpose of determining its financial condition,
fulfillment of its contractual obligations and compliance with law,
the Commissioner or a representative of the Commissioner or the
Commissioner of [Financial Institutions] Mortgage Lending of the
Department of Business and Industry or a representative of
the Commissioner of [Financial Institutions] Mortgage Lending of
the Department of Business and Industry when requested by the
Commissioner of Insurance shall each year examine or cause to be
examined the affairs, transactions, agreements, assets, records and
accounts, including the escrow accounts, of a title agent, title insurer
or escrow officer.
5. A title agent or insurer may engage a certified public
accountant to perform such an examination in lieu of the
Commissioner. In such a case, the examination must be equivalent
to the type of examination made by the Commissioner and the
expense must be borne by the title agent or insurer being examined.
-
*AB74*

– 168 –
6. The Commissioner shall determine whether an examination
performed by an accountant pursuant to subsection 5 is equivalent to
an examination conducted by the Commissioner. The Commissioner
may examine any area of the operation of a title agent or insurer if
the Commissioner determines that the examination of that area is
not equivalent to an examination conducted by the Commissioner.
7. A person shall not become licensed to circumvent the
provisions of this chapter or any other law of this state.
Sec. 215. NRS 692A.1045 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
692A.1045 1. The Commissioner shall establish by
regulation the fees to be paid by title agents and title insurers for
their supervision and examination by the Commissioner or a
representative of the Commissioner.
2. In establishing the fees pursuant to subsection 1, the
Commissioner shall consider:
(a) The complexity of the various examinations to which the
fees apply;
(b) The skill required to conduct such examinations;
(c) The expenses associated with conducting such examinations
and preparing reports; and
(d) Any other factors the Commissioner deems relevant.
3. The Commissioner shall, with the approval of the
Commissioner of [Financial Institutions,] Mortgage Lending of the
Department of Business and Industry, adopt regulations
prescribing the standards for determining whether a title insurer or
title agent has maintained adequate supervision of a title agent or
escrow officer pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 216. NRS 692C.290 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
692C.290 1. Each registered insurer shall keep current the
information required to be disclosed in its registration statement by
reporting all material changes or additions on forms provided by the
Commissioner within 15 days after the end of the month in which it
learns of each such change or addition, and not less often than
annually, except that, subject to the provisions of NRS 692C.390,
each registered insurer shall report all dividends and other
distributions to shareholders within 5 business days following the
declaration and 10 days before payment.
2. The principal of a registered insurer shall file an annual
report of enterprise risk pursuant to this subsection. If the principal
of a registered insurer does not file a report of enterprise risk with
the commissioner of the lead state of the insurance company system,
as determined by the most recent edition of the Financial Analysis
Handbook, published by the NAIC, in a calendar year, the principal
-
*AB74*

– 169 –
shall file a report of enterprise risk with the Commissioner. The
principal shall include in the report the material risks within the
insurance holding company system that, to the best of his or her
knowledge and belief, may pose enterprise risk to the registered
insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the ultimate
controlling person of every insurer subject to registration shall
concurrently file with the registration an annual group capital
calculation as directed by the lead state commissioner. The report
shall be completed in accordance with the Group Capital
Calculation Instructions, which may permit the lead state
commissioner to allow a controlling person that is not the ultimate
controlling person to file the group capital calculation. The report
shall be filed with the lead state commissioner of the insurance
holding company system as determined by the Commissioner in
accordance with the procedures within the Financial Analysis
Handbook adopted by the NAIC. An insurance holding company
system is exempt from filing the group capital calculation if it is:
(a) An insurance holding company system that has only one
insurer within its holding company structure, that only writes
business and is only licensed in its domestic state and that assumes
no business from any other insurer.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, an insurance
holding company system that is required to perform a group capital
calculation specified by the United States Federal Reserve Board.
The lead state commissioner shall request the calculation from the
Federal Reserve Board under the terms of information sharing
agreements currently in effect. If the Federal Reserve Board cannot
share the calculation with the lead state commissioner, the insurance
holding company system is not exempt from the group capital
calculation filing.
(c) An insurance holding company system whose non-United
States group-wide supervisor is located within a reciprocal
jurisdiction as defined in NRS 681A.062 that recognizes the United
States’s state regulatory approach to group supervision and group
capital.
(d) An insurance holding company system:
(1) That provides information to the lead state that meets the
requirements for accreditation under the NAIC financial standards
and accreditation program, either directly or indirectly through the
group-wide supervisor, who has determined such information is
satisfactory to allow the lead state to comply with the NAIC group
supervision approach, as detailed in the NAIC Financial Analysis
Handbook; and
-
*AB74*

– 170 –
(2) Whose non-United States group-wide supervisor that is
not in a reciprocal jurisdiction as defined in NRS 681A.062
recognizes and accepts, as specified by the Commissioner in
regulation, the group capital calculation as the world-wide group
capital assessment for United States insurance groups who operate
in that jurisdiction.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (c) and (d) of
subsection 3, a lead state commissioner shall require the group
capital calculation for United States operations of any non-United
States based insurance holding company system where, after any
necessary consultation with other supervisors or officials, it is
deemed appropriate by the lead state commissioner for prudential
oversight and solvency monitoring purposes or for ensuring the
competitiveness of the insurance marketplace.
5. Notwithstanding the exemptions from filing the group
capital calculation stated in paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, of
subsection 3, the lead state commissioner has the discretion to
exempt the ultimate controlling person from filing the annual group
capital calculation or to accept a limited group capital filing or
report in accordance with criteria as specified by the Commissioner
in regulation.
6. If the lead state commissioner determines that an insurance
holding company system no longer meets one or more of the
requirements for an exemption from filing the group capital
calculation under subsection 3, the insurance holding company
system shall file the group capital calculation at the next annual
filing date unless given an extension by the lead state commissioner
based on reasonable grounds shown.
7. The ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject to
registration and also scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test
Framework shall file the results of a specific year’s liquidity stress
test. The filing shall be made to the lead state insurance
commissioner of the insurance holding company system as
determined by the procedures within the Financial Analysis
Handbook adopted by the NAIC.
8. For the purposes of subsection 7:
(a) The NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework and the included
scope criteria applicable to a specific data year, which are reviewed
at least annually by the NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its
successor, and any change to the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test
Framework or to the data year for which the scope criteria are to be
measured, are effective on January 1 of the year following the
calendar year when such changes are adopted by the NAIC.
(b) An insurer which meets at least one threshold of the scope
criteria is considered scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test
-
*AB74*

– 171 –
Framework for the specified data year unless the lead state
insurance commissioner, in consultation with the NAIC Financial
Stability Task Force or its successor, determines the insurer should
not be scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework for
that data year.
(c) An insurer that does not trigger at least one threshold of the
scope criteria is not considered scoped into the NAIC Liquidity
Stress Test Framework for the specified data year unless the lead
state insurance commissioner, in consultation with the NAIC
Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, determines the
insurer should be scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test
Framework for that data year.
9. The lead state commissioner, in consultation with the NAIC
Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, will assess whether
an insurer is scoped in or not scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress
Test Framework as part of the lead state commissioner’s
determinations pursuant to this section for an insurer.
10. The performance of, and filing of the results from, a
specific year’s liquidity stress test shall comply with the NAIC
Liquidity Stress Test Framework’s instructions and reporting
templates for that year and any lead state insurance commissioner’s
determination, in conjunction with the Financial Stability Task
Force or its successor, as provided within the NAIC Liquidity Stress
Test Framework.
11. Whenever it appears to the Commissioner that any person
has committed a violation of subsection 2 which prevents the full
understanding of the enterprise risk to the insurer by affiliates or by
the insurance holding company system, the violation may serve as
an independent basis for disapproving dividends or distributions and
for conducting an examination of the insurer pursuant to [NRS
679B.230 to 679B.287,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive [.] , of this act.
Sec. 217. NRS 692C.3503 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
692C.3503 1. The requirements of NRS 692C.3501 to
692C.3509, inclusive, apply to all insurers domiciled in this State,
including, without limitation:
(a) Insurers, as identified in chapter 680A of NRS;
(b) Hospital, medical or dental service corporations, as
identified in chapter 695B of NRS;
(c) Health maintenance organizations, as identified in chapter
695C of NRS;
(d) Plans for dental care, as identified in chapter 695D of NRS;
(e) Prepaid limited health service organizations, as identified in
chapter 695F of NRS; and
-
*AB74*

– 172 –
(f) Risk retention groups and state-chartered risk retention
groups, as identified in 15 U.S.C. § 3902, 42 U.S.C. § 9673 and
chapters 694C and 695E of NRS.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, nothing in
NRS 692C.3501 to 692C.3509, inclusive, shall be construed to limit
the Commissioner’s authority, or the rights or obligations of third
parties, under [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2 to 41,
inclusive [.] , of this act.
3. Nothing in NRS 692C.3501 to 692C.3509, inclusive, shall
be construed to prescribe or impose corporate governance standards
and internal procedures beyond those which are required by the
appropriate provisions of title 7 of NRS.
Sec. 218. NRS 692C.410 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
692C.410 1. Subject to the limitation contained in this
section and in addition to the powers which the Commissioner has
under [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.287,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of
this act relating to the examination of insurers, the Commissioner
may examine any insurer registered under NRS 692C.260 to
692C.350, inclusive, and any affiliate of the insurer to ascertain the
financial condition of the insurer, including, without limitation,
the enterprise risk posed to the insurer by a person controlling the
insurer, any entity or combination of entities within the insurance
holding company system or by the insurance holding company
system. The Commissioner may order any insurer registered under
NRS 692C.260 to 692C.350, inclusive, to produce any information
not in the possession of the insurer if the insurer is able to obtain the
information pursuant to any contractual or statutory requirement or
any other method. If the insurer is unable to obtain any information
requested by the Commissioner pursuant to this section, the insurer
shall provide to the Commissioner a statement setting forth the
reasons the insurer is unable to obtain the information and the
identity of the holder of the information, if known to the insurer.
Whenever it appears to the Commissioner that the detailed
explanation is without merit, the Commissioner may require, after
notice and hearing, the insurer to pay a penalty of $100 for each day
the requested information is not produced or may suspend or revoke
the license of the insurer. In the event such insurer fails to comply
with such order, the Commissioner may examine such affiliates to
obtain such information.
2. The Commissioner shall exercise his or her power under
subsections 1 and 5 only if the examination of the insurer under
[NRS 679B.230 to 679B.287,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act
is inadequate or the interests of the policyholders of such insurer
may be adversely affected.
-
*AB74*

– 173 –
3. The Commissioner may retain at the registered insurer’s
expense such attorneys, actuaries, accountants and other experts not
otherwise a part of the Commissioner’s staff as may be reasonably
necessary to assist in the conduct of the examination under
subsections 1 and 5. Any persons so retained shall be under the
direction and control of the Commissioner and shall act in a purely
advisory capacity.
4. Each insurer producing for examination any information
pursuant to subsection 1 or any records, books and papers pursuant
to subsection 5 shall be liable for and shall pay the expense of such
examination in accordance with [NRS 679B.290.] section 19 of this
act.
5. To carry out the provisions of this section and except as
otherwise provided in subsection 2, the Commissioner may
subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, administer oaths,
examine any person under oath concerning the subject of the
examination and require the production of any books, papers,
records, correspondence or any other documents which the
Commissioner deems relevant to the examination. If any person
fails to obey a subpoena or refuses to testify as to any matter relating
to the subject of the examination, the Commissioner may file a
written report describing the refusal and proof of service of the
subpoena in any court of competent jurisdiction in the county in
which the examination is being conducted, for such action as the
court may determine. Failure by the person to obey an order of the
court pursuant to this section is punishable as contempt of court.
6. A person subpoenaed under subsection 5 is entitled to
witness fees and mileage as allowed for testimony in a court of
record. The insurer or affiliate being examined must pay the witness
fees and mileage, as well as any other expense incurred in securing
the attendance of witnesses for the examination in accordance with
[NRS 679B.290.] section 19 of this act.
Sec. 219. NRS 693A.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
693A.260 1. If at any time [the amount of assets of] a
domestic stock or mutual insurer [are less than the sum of its
liabilities plus its paid-in capital stock and minimum surplus
required to be maintained (in the case of a stock insurer), or the
minimum surplus required to be maintained (in the case of a mutual
insurer), under this Code for authority to transact the kinds of
insurance being transacted,] is impaired, as defined in NRS
696B.100, the Commissioner shall at once determine the amount of
the deficiency and give written notice to the insurer of the amount of
impairment and require that the impairment be cured and proof
thereof filed with the Commissioner within such period, not less
-
*AB74*

– 174 –
than 30 days nor more than 90 days from date of the notice, as the
Commissioner may designate.
2. If the impairment of assets is 10 percent or less of the
combined required paid-in capital stock and surplus (as to a stock
insurer) or surplus (as to a mutual insurer), and the Commissioner
believes that the impairment might be made good by an extension of
time, the Commissioner may extend the time within which the
impairment may be cured by not to exceed an additional 90 days.
3. The Commissioner shall require such restriction of, or
arrangements as to, operations of the insurer while the impairment
exists as the Commissioner deems advisable for the protection of
policyholders, the insurer or the public.
Sec. 220. Chapter 694C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, all of the
following documents and information and any copies thereof
which are produced by, obtained by or disclosed to the
Commissioner and which are related to an examination conducted
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter are confidential, are not
subject to subpoena, and may not be made public by the
Commissioner, unless the Commissioner obtains the prior written
consent of the captive insurance company to which the document
or information pertains:
(a) License applications that are designated as confidential by
or on behalf of an applicant captive insurance company, if the
designation is reasonable;
(b) Examination reports, other than an examination report of
any state-chartered risk retention group;
(c) Preliminary examination reports;
(d) Examination working papers; and
(e) Any other recorded information or other documents.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) A subpoena issued in connection with an administrative,
civil or criminal investigation by a governmental agency.
(b) Any document or information disclosed by a captive
insurer which is used by the Division in the course of any
regulatory proceeding, disciplinary action or hearing. The
Commissioner shall disclose to a captive insurance company a
copy of any document or information which the Commissioner
believes is related to a violation of this title or which justifies any
regulatory proceeding, disciplinary action or hearing involving the
captive insurance company. A disclosure made pursuant to this
subsection shall not be construed as a waiver of any applicable
privilege or claim of confidentiality.
-
*AB74*

– 175 –
Sec. 221. NRS 694C.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.160 1. The terms and conditions set forth in chapter
696B of NRS pertaining to insurance reorganization, receiverships
and injunctions apply to captive insurers incorporated pursuant to
this chapter.
2. The provisions of NRS [679B.285] 679B.122 pertaining to
the confidentiality and disclosure of certain records and information
relating to an insurer apply to such records and information relating
to a captive insurer incorporated pursuant to this chapter.
3. An agency captive insurer, a rental captive insurer and an
association captive insurer are subject to those provisions of chapter
686A of NRS which are applicable to insurers.
4. A state-chartered risk retention group is subject to the
following:
(a) The provisions of NRS 681A.250 to 681A.580, inclusive,
regarding intermediaries;
(b) The provisions of NRS 681B.550 regarding risk-based
capital;
(c) The provisions of chapter 683A of NRS regarding managing
general agents;
(d) The provisions of chapter 686A of NRS which are applicable
to insurers; and
(e) The provisions of NRS 693A.110 and any regulations
adopted pursuant thereto regarding management and agency
contracts of insurers.
Sec. 222. NRS 694C.180 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.180 1. Unless otherwise approved by the
Commissioner, a pure captive insurer, an agency captive insurer, a
rental captive insurer or a sponsored captive insurer must be
incorporated as a stock insurer.
2. An association captive insurer or a state-chartered risk
retention group must be formed as a:
(a) Stock insurer;
(b) Mutual insurer; or
(c) Reciprocal insurer, except that its attorney-in-fact must be a
corporation incorporated in this State.
3. A captive insurer shall have not less than three incorporators
or organizers, at least one of whom must be a resident of this State.
4. Before the articles of incorporation of a captive insurer may
be filed with the Secretary of State, the Commissioner must approve
the articles of incorporation. In determining whether to grant that
approval, the Commissioner shall consider:
-
*AB74*

– 176 –
(a) The character, reputation, financial standing and purposes of
the incorporators or organizers;
(b) The character, reputation, financial responsibility, experience
relating to insurance and business qualifications of the officers and
directors of the captive insurer;
(c) The competence of any person who, pursuant to a contract
with the captive insurer, will manage the affairs of the captive
insurer;
(d) The competence, reputation and experience of the legal
counsel of the captive insurer relating to the regulation of insurance;
(e) If the captive insurer is a rental captive insurer, the
competence, reputation and experience of the underwriter of the
captive insurer;
(f) The business plan of the captive insurer; and
(g) Such other aspects of the captive insurer as the
Commissioner deems advisable.
5. The capital stock of a captive insurer incorporated as a stock
insurer must be issued at not less than par value.
6. At least one member of the board of directors of a captive
insurer formed as a corporation, or one member of the subscribers
advisory committee or the attorney-in-fact of a captive insurer
formed as a reciprocal insurer, must be a resident of this State.
7. A captive insurer formed pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter has the privileges of, and is subject to, the provisions of
general corporation law set forth in chapter 78 of NRS and, if
formed as a nonprofit corporation, the provisions set forth in chapter
82 of NRS, as well as the applicable provisions contained in this
chapter. If the provisions of this chapter conflict with the general
provisions in chapter 78 or 82 of NRS governing corporations, the
provisions of this chapter control. [The] Except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, the provisions of chapter 693A of NRS
relating to mergers, consolidations, conversions, mutualizations and
transfers of domicile to this State apply to determine the procedures
to be followed by captive insurers in carrying out any of those
transactions in accordance with this chapter. The Commissioner
may approve an exemption from the provisions of chapter 693A
for a pure captive insurer if the Commissioner determines the
exemption is appropriate.
8. The articles of association, articles of incorporation, charter
or bylaws of a captive insurer formed as a corporation must require
that a quorum of the board of directors consists of not less than one-
third of the number of directors prescribed by the articles of
association, articles of incorporation, charter or bylaws.
9. The agreement of the subscribers or other organizing
document of a captive insurer formed as a reciprocal insurer must
-
*AB74*

– 177 –
require that a quorum of its subscribers advisory committee consists
of not less than one-third of the number of its members.
Sec. 223. NRS 694C.220 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.220 An application by a captive insurer for licensure
must include a nonrefundable application fee of $500. The
Commissioner may retain legal, financial and examination services
from outside the Division to review and make recommendations
regarding the qualifying examination of the applicant. The cost of
those services must be paid by the applicant. The provisions of
[NRS 679B.230 to 679B.287,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act
apply to examinations, investigations and processing conducted
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 224. NRS 694C.259 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.259 1. A captive insurer which is not transacting the
business of insurance, including, without limitation, the issuance of
insurance policies and the assumption of reinsurance, may apply to
the Commissioner for a certificate of dormancy.
2. Upon application by a captive insurer pursuant to subsection
1, the Commissioner may issue a certificate of dormancy to the
captive insurer. The Commissioner may issue a certificate of
dormancy to a captive insurer even if the captive insurer retains
liabilities that are associated with policies that were written or
assumed by the captive insurer provided that the captive insurer
otherwise is not transacting the business of insurance.
3. A dormant captive insurer shall:
(a) Possess and thereafter maintain unimpaired paid-in capital
and surplus [of] in an amount the Commissioner determines is
sufficient to cover liabilities retained pursuant to subsection 2 but
not less than $25,000.
(b) Pursuant to NRS 694C.230, pay an annual fee and, in
addition to any other fee or charge, all applicable fees required
pursuant to NRS 680C.110 for the renewal of a license.
(c) Be subject to examination for any year for which the
dormant captive insurer is not in compliance with the provisions of
this section.
4. A dormant captive insurer may:
(a) At the discretion of the Commissioner, be subject to
examination for any year for which the dormant captive insurer is in
compliance with the provisions of this section.
(b) Continue to adjudicate and settle insurance claims under any
contract of insurance or reinsurance that the captive insurer issued
during any period in which the captive insurer was not a dormant
captive insurer. The effective date of such a contract of insurance or
-
*AB74*

– 178 –
reinsurance must be before the date on which the Commissioner
issued a certificate of dormancy to the captive insurer.
5. [After] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, after
being issued a certificate of dormancy, and until the certificate of
dormancy expires or is revoked, a dormant captive insurer is not:
(a) Subject to or liable for the payment of any tax pursuant to
NRS 694C.450.
(b) Required to:
(1) Prepare audited financial statements;
(2) Obtain actuarial certifications or opinions; or
(3) File annual reports with the Commissioner pursuant to
NRS 694C.400.
6. The provisions of subsection 5 do not absolve a captive
insurer from complying with any applicable responsibilities or
requirements of this title which accrued before the date on which
the certificate of dormancy was issued to the captive insurer, but
are due on or after the date on which the certificate of dormancy
was issued, including, without limitation, an annual report or
audit based on the preceding calendar or fiscal year.
7. A certificate of dormancy is subject to renewal after 5 years.
If not timely renewed, the certificate of dormancy expires.
Immediately upon the expiration of the certificate of dormancy, the
captive insurer must be in compliance with all provisions of this
chapter applicable to a captive insurer which holds an active license
to transact the business of insurance issued pursuant to this chapter.
[7.] 8. Except as otherwise provided [by] in this section, before
issuing any insurance policy or otherwise transacting the business of
insurance, a dormant captive insurer must apply to the
Commissioner for approval to surrender its certificate of dormancy
and resume transacting the business of insurance.
[8.] 9. The Commissioner shall revoke the certificate of
dormancy of a dormant captive insurer that is not in compliance
with the provisions of this section.
[9.] 10. The Commissioner may adopt regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 225. NRS 694C.310 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.310 1. The board of directors of a captive insurer shall
meet at least once each year in this State. The captive insurer shall:
(a) Maintain its principal place of business in this State; and
(b) Appoint a resident of this State as a registered agent to
accept service of process and otherwise act on behalf of the captive
insurer in this State. If the registered agent cannot be located with
reasonable diligence for the purpose of serving a notice or demand
on the captive insurer, the notice or demand may be served on the
-
*AB74*

– 179 –
Secretary of State who shall be deemed to be the agent for the
captive insurer.
2. A captive insurer shall not transact insurance in this State
unless:
(a) The captive insurer has made adequate arrangements with:
(1) A state-chartered bank, a state-chartered credit union or a
thrift company licensed pursuant to chapter 677 of NRS that is
located in this State; or
(2) A federally chartered bank or federally chartered credit
union that has a branch which is located in this State,
 that is authorized pursuant to state or federal law to transfer
money.
(b) If the captive insurer employs or has entered into a contract
with a natural person or business organization to manage the affairs
of the captive insurer, the natural person or business organization
meets the standards described in paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of
NRS 694C.210 to the satisfaction of the Commissioner.
(c) The captive insurer employs or has entered into a contract
with a qualified and experienced certified public accountant who is
approved by the Commissioner or a firm of certified public
accountants that is nationally recognized.
(d) The captive insurer employs or has entered into a contract
with qualified, experienced actuaries who are approved by the
Commissioner to perform reviews and evaluations of the operations
of the captive insurer.
(e) The captive insurer employs or has entered into a contract
with an attorney who is licensed to practice law in this State . [and
who meets the standards of competence and experience in matters
concerning the regulation of insurance in this State established by
the Commissioner by regulation.]
3. The Commissioner may periodically review the
qualifications of a natural person or business organization described
in paragraph (b) of subsection 2 and, if appropriate:
(a) Disqualify the manager pursuant to the authority of the
Commissioner under NRS 679B.125; or
(b) Suspend or revoke the license of the captive insurer pursuant
to NRS 694C.270.
Sec. 226. NRS 694C.330 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.330 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
captive insurer shall pay dividends out of, or make any other
distributions from, its capital or surplus, or both, in accordance with
the provisions set forth in NRS 692C.370, 693A.140, 693A.150 and
693A.160.
-
*AB74*

– 180 –
2. A captive insurer other than a state-chartered risk retention
group shall not pay extraordinary dividends out of, or make any
other extraordinary distribution with respect to, its capital or surplus,
or both, in violation of this section unless the captive insurer has
obtained the prior approval of the Commissioner to make such a
payment or distribution. As used in this subsection, “extraordinary
dividend” and “extraordinary distribution” mean any dividend or
distribution of cash or other property, the fair market value of
which, together with that of other dividends or distributions within
the preceding 12 months, exceeds the greater of:
(a) Ten percent of the surplus of the captive insurer as of
December 31 or the last day of the fiscal year of the captive
insurer next preceding the date of the dividend or distribution; or
(b) The net income of the captive insurer for the 12-month
period ending December 31 or the last day of the fiscal year of the
captive insurer next preceding the date of the dividend or
distribution.
3. A state-chartered risk retention group shall not pay any
dividend or distribution without prior approval of the
Commissioner.
Sec. 227. NRS 694C.388 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.388 Before June 30 of each year or, if approved by the
Commissioner, not more than [60] 180 days after the expiration of
the fiscal year of the branch captive insurer, the branch captive
insurer shall file with the Commissioner a copy of all reports and
statements required to be filed under the laws of the jurisdiction in
which the alien captive insurer is domiciled. The reports and
statements must be verified by oath of two of the executive officers
of the alien captive insurer. If the Commissioner is satisfied that the
annual report filed by the alien captive insurer in the jurisdiction in
which it is domiciled provides adequate information concerning the
financial condition of the alien captive insurer, the Commissioner
may waive the requirement for completion of the captive annual
statement for business written in the alien jurisdiction.
Sec. 228. NRS 694C.400 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.400 1. On or before June 30 of each year, a captive
insurer, other than a state-chartered risk retention group, shall
submit to the Commissioner a report of its financial condition. A
captive insurer shall use generally accepted accounting principles
and include any useful or necessary modifications or adaptations
thereof that have been approved or accepted by the Commissioner
for the type of insurance and kinds of insurers to be reported upon,
and as supplemented by additional information required by the
-
*AB74*

– 181 –
Commissioner. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each
association captive insurer, agency captive insurer, rental captive
insurer or sponsored captive insurer shall file its report in the time
and form required by the Commissioner. Each state-chartered risk
retention group shall file its report in the time and form required by
NRS 680A.270. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations
designating the form in which pure captive insurers must report.
2. Each captive insurer, other than a state-chartered risk
retention group, shall submit to the Commissioner, on or before
June 30 of each year, an annual audit as of December 31 of the
preceding calendar year that is certified by a certified public
accountant who is not an employee of the insurer. An annual audit
submitted pursuant to this subsection must comply with the
requirements set forth in regulations adopted by the Commissioner
which govern such an annual audit, including, without limitation,
criteria for extensions and exemptions.
3. Each state-chartered risk retention group shall file a financial
statement pursuant to NRS 680A.265.
4. A pure captive insurer may apply, in writing, for
authorization to file its annual report based on a fiscal year that is
consistent with the fiscal year of the parent company of the pure
captive insurer. If an alternative date is granted, the annual report is
due not later than [60] 180 days after the end of each such fiscal
year.
5. A pure captive insurer shall file on or before March 1 of
each year such forms as required by the Commissioner by regulation
to provide sufficient detail to support its premium tax return filed
pursuant to NRS 694C.450.
6. Any captive insurer failing, without just cause beyond the
reasonable control of the captive insurer, to file its annual report of
financial condition as required by subsection 1, its annual audit as
required by subsection 2 or its financial statement as required by
subsection 3 shall pay a penalty of $100 for each day the captive
insurer fails to file the report of financial condition, the annual audit
or the financial statement, but not to exceed an aggregate amount of
$3,000, to be recovered in the name of the State of Nevada by the
Attorney General.
7. Any director, officer, agent or employee of a captive insurer
who subscribes to, makes or concurs in making or publishing, any
annual or other statement required by law, knowing the same to
contain any material statement which is false, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
-
*AB74*

– 182 –
Sec. 229. NRS 694C.410 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.410 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, at
least once every 3 years, and at such other times as the
Commissioner determines necessary, the Commissioner, or a
designee of the Commissioner, shall visit each captive insurer and
thoroughly inspect and examine the affairs of the captive insurer to
ascertain:
(a) The financial condition of the captive insurer;
(b) The ability of the captive insurer to fulfill its obligations; and
(c) Whether the captive insurer has complied with the provisions
of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. Upon the application of a captive insurer, the Commissioner
may conduct the visits required pursuant to subsection 1 every 5
years if the captive insurer conducts comprehensive annual audits:
(a) The scope of which is satisfactory to the Commissioner; and
(b) Which are conducted by an independent auditor appointed
by the Commissioner.
3. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 do not apply to a pure
captive insurer. The Commissioner may conduct an examination of
a pure captive insurer at any reasonable time to ascertain:
(a) The financial condition of the pure captive insurer;
(b) The ability of the pure captive insurer to fulfill its
obligations; and
(c) Whether the pure captive insurer has complied with the
provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
4. The Commissioner may contract to obtain legal, financial
and examination services from outside the Division to conduct the
examination and make recommendations to the Commissioner. The
cost of the examination must be paid to the Commissioner by the
captive insurer.
5. The provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.287,] sections 2
to 41, inclusive, of this act apply to examinations conducted
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 230. NRS 694C.450 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.450 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
captive insurer shall pay to the Division, not later than March 1 of
each year, a tax at the rate of:
(a) Two-fifths of 1 percent on the first $20,000,000 of its net
direct premiums;
(b) One-fifth of 1 percent on the next $20,000,000 of its net
direct premiums; and
-
*AB74*

– 183 –
(c) Seventy-five thousandths of 1 percent on each additional
dollar of its net direct premiums.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a captive
insurer shall pay to the Division, not later than March 1 of each
year, a tax at a rate of:
(a) Two hundred twenty-five thousandths of 1 percent on the
first $20,000,000 of revenue from assumed reinsurance premiums;
(b) One hundred fifty thousandths of 1 percent on the next
$20,000,000 of revenue from assumed reinsurance premiums; and
(c) Twenty-five thousandths of 1 percent on each additional
dollar of revenue from assumed reinsurance premiums.
 The tax on reinsurance premiums pursuant to this subsection
must not be levied on premiums for risks or portions of risks which
are subject to taxation on a direct basis pursuant to subsection 1. A
captive insurer is not required to pay any reinsurance premium tax
pursuant to this subsection on revenue related to the receipt of assets
by the captive insurer in exchange for the assumption of loss
reserves and other liabilities of another insurer that is under
common ownership and control with the captive insurer, if the
transaction is part of a plan to discontinue the operation of the other
insurer and the intent of the parties to the transaction is to renew or
maintain such business with the captive insurer.
3. If the sum of the taxes to be paid by a captive insurer
calculated pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 is less than $5,000 in any
given year, including, without limitation, a year in which the
captive insurer wrote no direct premiums or assumed no
reinsurance premiums and was not a dormant captive insurer, the
captive insurer shall pay a tax of $5,000 for that year. The maximum
aggregate tax for any year must not exceed $175,000. The
maximum aggregate tax to be paid by a sponsored captive insurer
applies only to each protected cell and does not apply to the
sponsored captive insurer as a whole.
4. Two or more captive insurers under common ownership and
control must be taxed as if they were a single captive insurer.
5. Notwithstanding any specific statute to the contrary and
except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the tax provided for
by this section constitutes all the taxes collectible pursuant to the
laws of this State from a captive insurer, and no occupation tax or
other taxes may be levied or collected from a captive insurer by this
State or by any county, city or municipality within this State, except
for taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 363A, 363B or 363C of NRS
and ad valorem taxes on real or personal property located in this
State used in the production of income by the captive insurer.
6. Twenty-five percent of the revenues collected from the tax
imposed pursuant to this section must be deposited with the State
-
*AB74*

– 184 –
Treasurer for credit to the [Account for the Regulation and
Supervision of Captive Insurers] Fund for Insurance
Administration and Enforcement created [pursuant to NRS
694C.460.] by NRS 680C.100. The remaining 75 percent of the
revenues collected must be deposited with the State Treasurer for
credit to the State General Fund.
7. A captive insurer that is issued a license pursuant to this
chapter after July 1, 2003, is entitled to receive a nonrefundable
credit of $5,000 applied against the aggregate taxes owed by the
captive insurer for the first year in which the captive insurer incurs
any liability for the payment of taxes pursuant to this section. A
captive insurer is entitled to a nonrefundable credit pursuant to this
section not more than once after the captive insurer is initially
licensed pursuant to this chapter.
8. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Common ownership and control” means:
(1) In the case of a stock insurer, the direct or indirect
ownership of 80 percent or more of the outstanding voting stock of
two or more corporations by the same member or members.
(2) In the case of a mutual insurer, the direct or indirect
ownership of 80 percent or more of the surplus and the voting power
of two or more corporations by the same member or members.
(b) “Net direct premiums” means the direct premiums collected
or contracted for on policies or contracts of insurance written by a
captive insurer during the preceding calendar year, less the amounts
paid to policyholders as return premiums, including dividends on
unabsorbed premiums or premium deposits returned or credited to
policyholders.
Sec. 231. NRS 694C.460 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.460 [1. There is hereby created in the Fund for
Insurance Administration and Enforcement created by NRS
680C.100 an Account for the Regulation and Supervision of Captive
Insurers. Money in the Account must be used only to carry out the
provisions of this chapter or for any other purpose authorized by the
Legislature.] Except as otherwise provided in NRS [680C.110 and]
694C.450, all fees and assessments received by the Commissioner
or Division pursuant to this chapter must be credited to the
[Account. Not more than 2 percent of the tax collected and
deposited in the Account pursuant to NRS 694C.450, may, upon
application by the Division or an agency for economic development
to, and with the approval of, the Interim Finance Committee, be
transferred to an agency for economic development to be used by
-
*AB74*

– 185 –
that agency to promote the industry of captive insurance in this
State.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all payments
from the Account for the maintenance of staff and associated
expenses, including contractual services, as necessary, must be
disbursed from the State Treasury only upon warrants issued by the
State Controller, after receipt of proper documentation of the
services rendered and expenses incurred.
3. At the end of each fiscal year, that portion of the balance in
the Account which exceeds $500,000 must be transferred to the
State General Fund.
4. The State Controller may anticipate receipts to the Account
and issue warrants based thereon.] Fund for Insurance
Administration and Enforcement created by NRS 680C.100.
Sec. 232. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 233 to 237, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 233. “Medical management technique” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 299 of this act.
Sec. 234. “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.645.
Sec. 235. “Provider network contract” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 687B.658.
Sec. 236. “Provider of health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 237. “Therapeutic equivalent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 302 of this act.
Sec. 238. NRS 695A.001 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.001 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 695A.003 to
695A.044, inclusive, and sections 233 to 237, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 239. NRS 695A.1843 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1843 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the benefit coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the society;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
-
*AB74*

– 186 –
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the society.
2. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall
reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
society for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal
to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the society for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. A society shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A society shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
5. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
-
*AB74*

– 187 –
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 240. NRS 695A.1845 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1845 1. A benefit contract must provide coverage for
benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid testing for high-risk strains of human
papillomavirus every 3 years for women 30 years of age and older;
and
(b) Administering the human papillomavirus vaccine, as
recommended for vaccination by a competent authority, including,
without limitation, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
Food and Drug Administration or the manufacturer of the vaccine.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage to obtain any benefit provided in the
benefit contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit contract
solely because the person applying for or covered by the contract
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
-
*AB74*

– 188 –
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit contract
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a society may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Human] , “human papillomavirus vaccine” means the
Quadrivalent Human Papillomavirus Recombinant Vaccine or its
successor which is approved by the Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human papillomavirus infection and cervical
cancer.
[(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 241. NRS 695A.1853 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1853 1. A society that issues a benefit contract shall
provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling and testing for
harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women under
circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or testing,
as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. A society shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
-
*AB74*

– 189 –
3. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2022, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
[4. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 242. NRS 695A.1855 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1855 1. A benefit contract must provide coverage for
benefits payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) A mammogram to screen for breast cancer annually for
insureds who are 40 years of age or older.
(b) An imaging test to screen for breast cancer on an interval
and at the age deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary,
as recommended by the insured’s provider of health care based on
personal or family medical history or additional factors that may
increase the risk of breast cancer for the insured.
(c) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age deemed
most appropriate, when medically necessary, as recommended by
the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate an abnormality
which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from a mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or an imaging test described in paragraph (b); or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other
form of cost-sharing or require a longer waiting period or other
condition for coverage to obtain any benefit provided in a benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit contract
solely because the person applying for or covered by the contract
uses or may use any such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 190 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit contract
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a society may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified benefit contract with
respect to the deductible of such a benefit contract after the insured
has satisfied the minimum deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223,
except with respect to items or services that constitute preventive
care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the
prohibitions of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall apply regardless
of whether the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 223 has been
satisfied.
7. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
-
*AB74*

– 191 –
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified] , “qualified benefit contract” means a benefit
contract that has a high deductible and is in compliance with 26
U.S.C. § 223 for the purposes of establishing a health savings
account.
Sec. 243. NRS 695A.1856 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1856 1. A society that issues a benefit contract shall
provide coverage for the examination of a person who is pregnant
for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the society; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after July 1,
2021, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the contract that conflicts with
the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical] , “medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 652.060.
[(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the society. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 244. NRS 695A.1859 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1859 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a society that issues a benefit contract shall include in
the contract coverage for medically necessary biomarker testing for
the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management and ongoing
monitoring of cancer when such biomarker testing is supported by
medical and scientific evidence. Such evidence includes, without
limitation:
-
*AB74*

– 192 –
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A society shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens.
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of cancer; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the society.
3. If a society requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the society shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a society to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience;
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the society; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.
5. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the benefit contract or
renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is
void.
6. As used in this section:
-
*AB74*

– 193 –
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A gene mutation or characteristic; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
-
*AB74*

– 194 –
[(f) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the society. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 245. NRS 695A.1865 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1865 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8,
a society that offers or issues a benefit contract which provides
coverage for prescription drugs or devices shall include in the
contract coverage for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Listed in subsection 11; and
(4) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Listed in subsection 11;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion of a device for contraception or removal of such a
device if the device was inserted while the insured was covered by
the same benefit contract;
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraception and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(g) Voluntary sterilization for women.
2. A society shall provide coverage for any services listed in
subsection 1 which are within the authorized scope of practice of a
pharmacist when such services are provided by a pharmacist who is
employed by or serves as an independent contractor of an in-
network pharmacy and in accordance with the applicable provider
network contract. Such coverage must be provided to the same
extent as if the services were provided by another provider of health
care, as applicable to the services being provided. The terms of the
policy must not limit:
-
*AB74*

– 195 –
(a) Coverage for services listed in subsection 1 and provided by
such a pharmacist to a number of occasions less than the coverage
for such services when provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services listed in subsection 1 and
provided by such a pharmacist to an amount less than the amount
reimbursed for similar services provided by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
3. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
4. If a covered therapeutic equivalent listed in subsection 1 is
not available or a provider of health care deems a covered
therapeutic equivalent to be medically inappropriate, an alternate
therapeutic equivalent prescribed by a provider of health care must
be covered by the society.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 9, 10 and 12, a
society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for any benefit included in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit contract
solely because the person applying for or covered by the contract
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement to the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
6. Coverage pursuant to this section for the covered dependent
of an insured must be the same as for the insured.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a benefit
contract subject to the provisions of this chapter that is delivered,
issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, has the
legal effect of including the coverage required by this section, and
any provision of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with
this section is void.
8. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract and which is
affiliated with a religious organization is not required to provide the
-
*AB74*

– 196 –
coverage required by subsection 1 if the society objects on religious
grounds. Such a society shall, before the issuance of a benefit
contract and before the renewal of such a contract, provide to the
prospective insured written notice of the coverage that the society
refuses to provide pursuant to this subsection.
9. A society may require an insured to pay a higher deductible,
copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception if the insured
refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent of the drug.
10. For each of the 18 methods of contraception listed in
subsection 11 that have been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration, a benefit contract must include at least one drug or
device for contraception within each method for which no
deductible, copayment or coinsurance may be charged to the
insured, but the society may charge a deductible, copayment or
coinsurance for any other drug or device that provides the same
method of contraception. If the society charges a copayment or
coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the society may only
require an insured to pay the copayment or coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
11. The following 18 methods of contraception must be
covered pursuant to this section:
(a) Voluntary sterilization for women;
(b) Surgical sterilization implants for women;
(c) Implantable rods;
(d) Copper-based intrauterine devices;
(e) Progesterone-based intrauterine devices;
(f) Injections;
(g) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs;
(h) Progestin-based drugs;
(i) Extended- or continuous-regimen drugs;
(j) Estrogen- and progestin-based patches;
(k) Vaginal contraceptive rings;
(l) Diaphragms with spermicide;
(m) Sponges with spermicide;
(n) Cervical caps with spermicide;
(o) Female condoms;
(p) Spermicide;
(q) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs for
emergency contraception or progestin-based drugs for emergency
contraception; and
(r) Ulipristal acetate for emergency contraception.
12. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a society may use medical management techniques, including,
-
*AB74*

– 197 –
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
13. A society shall not:
(a) Use medical management techniques to require an insured to
use a method of contraception other than the method prescribed or
ordered by a provider of health care;
(b) Require an insured to obtain prior authorization for the
benefits described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1; or
(c) Refuse to cover a contraceptive injection or the insertion of a
device described in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of subsection 11 at a
hospital immediately after an insured gives birth.
14. A society must provide an accessible, transparent and
expedited process which is not unduly burdensome by which an
insured, or the authorized representative of the insured, may request
an exception relating to any medical management technique used by
the society to obtain any benefit required by this section without a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance.
15. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that has entered
into a contract with a society to provide services to insureds through
a network plan offered or issued by the society.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(d)] “Provider network contract” [means] includes a contract
between a society and a [provider of health care or] pharmacy
specifying the rights and responsibilities of the society and the
[provider of health care or] pharmacy [, as applicable,] for delivery
of health care services pursuant to a network plan.
[(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(f) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
-
*AB74*

– 198 –
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.]
Sec. 246. NRS 695A.1867 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1867 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
society that issues a benefit contract shall include in the benefit
contract coverage for the medically necessary treatment of
conditions relating to gender dysphoria and gender incongruence.
Such coverage must include coverage of medically necessary
psychosocial and surgical intervention and any other medically
necessary treatment for such disorders provided by:
(a) Endocrinologists;
(b) Pediatric endocrinologists;
(c) Social workers;
(d) Psychiatrists;
(e) Psychologists;
(f) Gynecologists;
(g) Speech-language pathologists;
(h) Primary care physicians;
(i) Advanced practice registered nurses;
(j) Physician assistants; and
(k) Any other providers of medically necessary services for the
treatment of gender dysphoria or gender incongruence.
2. This section does not require a benefit contract to include
coverage for cosmetic surgery performed by a plastic surgeon or
reconstructive surgeon that is not medically necessary.
3. A society that issues a benefit contract shall not
categorically refuse to cover medically necessary gender-affirming
treatments or procedures or revisions to prior treatments if the
contract provides coverage for any such services, procedures or
revisions for purposes other than gender transition or affirmation.
4. A society that issues a benefit contract may prescribe
requirements that must be satisfied before the society covers
surgical treatment of conditions relating to gender dysphoria or
gender incongruence for an insured who is less than 18 years of age.
Such requirements may include, without limitation, requirements
that:
(a) The treatment must be recommended by a psychologist,
psychiatrist or other mental health professional;
(b) The treatment must be recommended by a physician;
(c) The insured must provide a written expression of the desire
of the insured to undergo the treatment;
-
*AB74*

– 199 –
(d) A written plan for treatment that covers at least 1 year must
be developed and approved by at least two providers of health care;
and
(e) Parental consent is provided for the insured unless the
insured is expressly authorized by law to consent on his or her own
behalf.
5. When determining whether treatment is medically necessary
for the purposes of this section, a society must consider the most
recent Standards of Care published by the World Professional
Association for Transgender Health, or its successor organization.
6. A society shall make a reasonable effort to ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the society. If, after a reasonable effort, the society is unable
to make such benefits available through such a provider of health
care, the society may treat the treatment that the society is unable to
make available through such a provider of health care in the same
manner as other services provided by a provider of health care who
does not participate in the network plan of the society.
7. If an insured appeals the denial of a claim or coverage under
this section on the grounds that the treatment requested by the
insured is not medically necessary, the society must consult with a
provider of health care who has experience in prescribing or
delivering gender-affirming treatment concerning the medical
necessity of the treatment requested by the insured when
considering the appeal.
8. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after July 1,
2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit contract or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cosmetic surgery”:
(1) Means a surgical procedure that:
(I) Does not meaningfully promote the proper function of
the body;
(II) Does not prevent or treat illness or disease; and
(III) Is primarily directed at improving the appearance of
a person.
(2) Includes, without limitation, cosmetic surgery directed at
preserving beauty.
(b) “Gender dysphoria” means distress or impairment in social,
occupational or other areas of functioning caused by a marked
difference between the gender identity or expression of a person and
-
*AB74*

– 200 –
the sex assigned to the person at birth which lasts at least 6 months
and is shown by at least two of the following:
(1) A marked difference between gender identity or
expression and primary or secondary sex characteristics or
anticipated secondary sex characteristics in young adolescents.
(2) A strong desire to be rid of primary or secondary sex
characteristics because of a marked difference between such sex
characteristics and gender identity or expression or a desire to
prevent the development of anticipated secondary sex characteristics
in young adolescents.
(3) A strong desire for the primary or secondary sex
characteristics of the gender opposite from the sex assigned at birth.
(4) A strong desire to be of the opposite gender or a gender
different from the sex assigned at birth.
(5) A strong desire to be treated as the opposite gender or a
gender different from the sex assigned at birth.
(6) A strong conviction of experiencing typical feelings and
reactions of the opposite gender or a gender different from the sex
assigned at birth.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient; and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending or
approving a health care service or product does not, by itself, make
that health care service or product medically necessary.
[(d) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the society. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 201 –
Sec. 247. NRS 695A.1873 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1873 1. A society that issues a benefit contract shall
include in the benefit contract coverage for:
(a) Necessary case management services for an insured who has
been diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Medically necessary care for an insured who has been
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants.
2. A society that issues a benefit contract which provides
coverage for prescription drugs shall include in the benefit contract
coverage for medically necessary prescription drugs to treat sickle
cell disease and its variants.
3. A society may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to use
for such treatment.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other health
care management services to assist patients and providers of health
care, including, without limitation, identifying and facilitating
additional resources and treatments, providing information about
treatment options and facilitating communication between providers
of services to a patient.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services. The
term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy, prior
authorization or categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type
or method of administration.
(c)] “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.055.
[(d)] (c) “Sickle cell disease and its variants” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.4927.
Sec. 248. NRS 695A.1874 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1874 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the contract coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder, including, without limitation, lofexidine.
(b) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder, including, without limitation, buprenorphine,
methadone and naltrexone.
-
*AB74*

– 202 –
(c) The services described in NRS 639.28079 when provided by
a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the
society. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the
provision of reimbursement for such services.
(d) Any service for the treatment of substance use disorder
provided by a provider of primary care if the service is covered
when provided by a specialist and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall
reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network
plan of the society for the services described in NRS 639.28079 at a
rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar
services.
3. A society shall provide the coverage required by paragraphs
(a) and (b) of subsection 1 regardless of whether the drug is
included in the formulary of the society.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a society
shall not subject the benefits required by paragraphs (a), (b) and (c)
of subsection 1 to medical management techniques, other than step
therapy. A society may subject the benefits required by paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 to other reasonable medical management
techniques when the benefits are provided by a pharmacist in
accordance with NRS 639.28079.
5. A society shall not:
(a) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 1; or
(b) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service.
6. A society shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
7. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the contract that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
-
*AB74*

– 203 –
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 249. NRS 695A.1875 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1875 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the contract coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
-
*AB74*

– 204 –
(j) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit contract
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit contract
solely because the person applying for or covered by the contract
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit contract
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a society may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
[6. As used in this section:
-
*AB74*

– 205 –
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 250. NRS 695A.256 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.256 1. A benefit contract which provides coverage for
prescription drugs must not require an insured to submit to a step
therapy protocol before covering a drug approved by the Food and
Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric
condition of the insured, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in the network plan of the society is located 60
miles or more from the residence of the insured; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the insured, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of a benefit contract subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this section is void.
3. As used in this section:
-
*AB74*

– 206 –
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) [“Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care is
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the society. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c)] “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
insured to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the insured before his or her benefit contract
provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 251. NRS 695A.500 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.500 The Commissioner, or any person the Commissioner
may appoint, may examine any domestic, foreign or alien society
which is transacting business or applying for admission to transact
business in this state in the same manner as authorized for the
examination of domestic, foreign or alien insurers. For the purposes
of this section, the provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,]
sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act are applicable to societies.
Sec. 252. NRS 695B.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.030 As used in this chapter:
1. “Dental services” means general and special dental services
ordinarily provided by dentists licensed under the provisions of
chapter 631 of NRS to practice in the State of Nevada in accordance
with the generally accepted practices of the community at the time
the service is rendered, and the furnishing of necessary appliances,
drugs, medicines and supplies, prosthetic appliances, orthodontic
appliances, metal, ceramic and other restorations.
2. “Hospital services” means the furnishing or providing of any
or all of the following:
(a) Maintenance and care in the hospital, including but not
limited to, nursing care, drugs, medicines, supplies, physiotherapy,
transportation and use of facilities and appliances.
(b) Reimbursement of the beneficiary or subscriber for, but
without requiring that the beneficiary or subscriber first pay,
expenses incurred for any of the items included in paragraph (a).
(c) Reimbursement, at a uniform rate, of the beneficiary or
subscriber for, but without requiring that the beneficiary or
subscriber first pay, the costs and expenses incurred for medical
supplies.
(d) Reimbursement for expenses incurred outside of the hospital
for continued care and treatment following the subscriber’s
-
*AB74*

– 207 –
discharge from the hospital, for nursing service, necessary
appliances, drugs, medicines, supplies and any other services which
would have been available in the hospital (excluding physicians’
services), whether or not provided through a hospital.
(e) Reimbursement for ambulance service expenses.
3. “Medical management technique” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 299 of this act.
4. “Medical services” means the furnishing or providing of any
or all of the following:
(a) Medical or surgical services, in or out of a hospital, by a
physician licensed to practice under the laws of Nevada.
(b) Reimbursement for expenses incurred for nursing services,
necessary appliances, drugs, medicines, supplies and any other
health care services.
5. “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.645.
6. “Provider network contract” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 687B.658.
7. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
8. “Therapeutic equivalent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 302 of this act.
Sec. 253. NRS 695B.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.160 1. Every corporation subject to the provisions of
this chapter shall annually:
(a) On or before March 1, file in the Office of the Commissioner
a statement verified by at least two of the principal officers of the
corporation, showing its condition and affairs as of December 31 of
the preceding calendar year. The statement must be in the form
required by the Commissioner and must contain statements relative
to the matters required to be established as a condition precedent to
maintaining or operating a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental
service plan and to other matters which the Commissioner may
prescribe.
(b) Pay all applicable fees for the renewal of a certificate of
authority and the fee for the filing of an annual statement.
2. Every corporation subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall file a financial statement pursuant to NRS 680A.265,
as required pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 680A.265.
3. Every corporation subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall file with the Commissioner and the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners a quarterly statement in the form most
recently adopted by the National Association of Insurance
-
*AB74*

– 208 –
Commissioners for that type of insurer. The quarterly statement
must be:
(a) Prepared in accordance with the instructions which are
applicable to that form, including, without limitation, the required
date of submission for the form; and
(b) Filed by electronic means.
4. The Commissioner may examine, as often as the
Commissioner deems it desirable, the affairs of every corporation
subject to the provisions of this chapter. The Commissioner shall, if
practicable, examine each such corporation at least once in every 3
years, and in any event, at least once in every 5 years, as to its
condition, fulfillment of its contractual obligations and compliance
with applicable laws. The actual expenses of the examination must
be paid by the corporation in accordance with the provisions of
[NRS 679B.290.] section 19 of this act. The Commissioner shall
refuse to issue a certificate of authority or shall revoke a certificate
of authority issued to any corporation which neglects or refuses to
pay such expenses.
Sec. 254. NRS 695B.185 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.185 A group contract for hospital, medical or dental
services which offers a difference of payment between preferred
providers of health care and providers of health care who are not
preferred:
1. [May not require a deductible of more than $600 difference
per admission to a facility for inpatient treatment which is not a
preferred provider of health care.
2. May not require a deductible of more than $500 difference
per treatment, other than inpatient treatment at a hospital, by a
provider which is not preferred.
3.] May not require an insured, another insurer who issues
policies of group health insurance, a nonprofit medical service
corporation or a health maintenance organization to pay any amount
in excess of the deductible or coinsurance due from the insured
based on the rates agreed upon with a provider.
[4. May not provide for a difference in percentage rates of
payment for coinsurance of more than 30 percentage points between
the copayment required to be paid by the insured to a preferred
provider of health care and the copayment required to be paid by the
insured to a provider of health care who is not preferred.
5.] 2. Must require that the deductible and payment for
coinsurance paid by the insured to a preferred provider of health
care be applied to the negotiated reduced rates of that provider.
[6.] 3. Must provide that if there is a particular service which a
preferred provider of health care does not provide and the provider
-
*AB74*

– 209 –
of health care who is treating the insured determines that the use of
the service is necessary for the health of the insured, the service
shall be deemed to be provided by the preferred provider of health
care.
[7.] 4. Must require the corporation to process a claim of a
provider of health care who is not preferred not later than 30
working days after the date on which proof of the claim is received.
Sec. 255. NRS 695B.19046 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.19046 1. A policy of health insurance offered or issued
by a hospital or medical services corporation which provides
coverage for prescription drugs must not require an insured to
submit to a step therapy protocol before covering a drug approved
by the Food and Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a
psychiatric condition of the insured, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in the network plan of the hospital or medical
services corporation is located 60 miles or more from the residence
of the insured; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the insured, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of a policy of health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this
section is void.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
-
*AB74*

– 210 –
(b) [“Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care is provided, in whole or in
part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
hospital or medical services corporation. The term does not include
an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c)] “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
insured to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the insured before his or her policy of health
insurance offered or issued by a hospital or medical services
corporation provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 256. NRS 695B.19087 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.19087 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a hospital or medical service corporation that issues a
policy of health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for
medically necessary biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment,
appropriate management and ongoing monitoring of cancer when
such biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific
evidence. Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A hospital or medical service corporation shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens.
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of cancer; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the hospital or medical service
corporation.
-
*AB74*

– 211 –
3. If a hospital or medical service corporation requires an
insured to obtain prior authorization for a biomarker test described
in subsection 1, the hospital or medical service corporation shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a hospital or
medical service corporation to provide coverage of biomarker
testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience;
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the hospital or medical service
corporation; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the policy or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
-
*AB74*

– 212 –
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical service corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
service corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 257. NRS 695B.1911 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1911 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
issues a policy of health insurance shall provide coverage for
screening, genetic counseling and testing for harmful mutations in
the BRCA gene for women under circumstances where such
screening, genetic counseling or testing, as applicable, is required by
NRS 457.301.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation shall ensure that
the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
-
*AB74*

– 213 –
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2022, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 258. NRS 695B.1912 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1912 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical service must provide coverage for benefits
payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) A mammogram to screen for breast cancer annually for
insureds who are 40 years of age or older.
(b) An imaging test to screen for breast cancer on an interval
and at the age deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary,
as recommended by the insured’s provider of health care based on
personal or family medical history or additional factors that may
increase the risk of breast cancer for the insured.
(c) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age deemed
most appropriate, when medically necessary, as recommended by
the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate an abnormality
which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from a mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or an imaging test described in paragraph (b); or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a contract for hospital or medical service shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other
form of cost-sharing or require a longer waiting period or other
-
*AB74*

– 214 –
condition to obtain any benefit provided in a contract for hospital or
medical service pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A contract for hospital or medical service subject to the
provisions of this chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is
void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified contract for hospital or
medical service with respect to the deductible of such a contract for
hospital or medical service after the insured has satisfied the
minimum deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, except with
respect to items or services that constitute preventive care pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the prohibitions of
paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall apply regardless of whether the
minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 223 has been satisfied.
7. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
-
*AB74*

– 215 –
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a contract for hospital or medical
service offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not include
an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified] , “qualified contract for hospital or medical
service” means a contract for hospital or medical service that has a
high deductible and is in compliance with 26 U.S.C. § 223 for the
purposes of establishing a health savings account.
Sec. 259. NRS 695B.1913 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1913 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
issues a policy of health insurance shall provide coverage for the
examination of a person who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the hospital or medical
services corporation; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
July 1, 2021, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that conflicts with
the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical] , “medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 652.060.
[(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 216 –
Sec. 260. NRS 695B.1915 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1915 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
hospital or medical services corporation that issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for the
medically necessary treatment of conditions relating to gender
dysphoria and gender incongruence. Such coverage must include
coverage of medically necessary psychosocial and surgical
intervention and any other medically necessary treatment for such
disorders provided by:
(a) Endocrinologists;
(b) Pediatric endocrinologists;
(c) Social workers;
(d) Psychiatrists;
(e) Psychologists;
(f) Gynecologists;
(g) Speech-language pathologists;
(h) Primary care physicians;
(i) Advanced practice registered nurses;
(j) Physician assistants; and
(k) Any other providers of medically necessary services for the
treatment of gender dysphoria or gender incongruence.
2. This section does not require a policy of health insurance to
include coverage for cosmetic surgery performed by a plastic
surgeon or reconstructive surgeon that is not medically necessary.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation that issues a
policy of health insurance shall not categorically refuse to cover
medically necessary gender-affirming treatments or procedures or
revisions to prior treatments if the policy provides coverage for any
such services, procedures or revisions for purposes other than
gender transition or affirmation.
4. A hospital or medical services corporation that issues a
policy of health insurance may prescribe requirements that must be
satisfied before the hospital or medical services corporation covers
surgical treatment of conditions relating to gender dysphoria or
gender incongruence for an insured who is less than 18 years of age.
Such requirements may include, without limitation, requirements
that:
(a) The treatment must be recommended by a psychologist,
psychiatrist or other mental health professional;
(b) The treatment must be recommended by a physician;
(c) The insured must provide a written expression of the desire
of the insured to undergo the treatment;
-
*AB74*

– 217 –
(d) A written plan for treatment that covers at least 1 year must
be developed and approved by at least two providers of health care;
and
(e) Parental consent is provided for the insured unless the
insured is expressly authorized by law to consent on his or her own
behalf.
5. When determining whether treatment is medically necessary
for the purposes of this section, a hospital or medical services
corporation must consider the most recent Standards of Care
published by the World Professional Association for Transgender
Health, or its successor organization.
6. A hospital or medical services corporation shall make a
reasonable effort to ensure that the benefits required by subsection 1
are made available to an insured through a provider of health care
who participates in the network plan of the hospital or medical
services corporation. If, after a reasonable effort, the hospital or
medical services corporation is unable to make such benefits
available through such a provider of health care, the hospital or
medical services corporation may treat the treatment that the
hospital or medical services corporation is unable to make available
through such a provider of health care in the same manner as other
services provided by a provider of health care who does not
participate in the network plan of the hospital or medical services
corporation.
7. If an insured appeals the denial of a claim or coverage under
this section on the grounds that the treatment requested by the
insured is not medically necessary, the hospital or medical services
corporation must consult with a provider of health care who has
experience in prescribing or delivering gender-affirming treatment
concerning the medical necessity of the treatment requested by the
insured when considering the appeal.
8. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
July 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or renewal which is
in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cosmetic surgery”:
(1) Means a surgical procedure that:
(I) Does not meaningfully promote the proper function of
the body;
(II) Does not prevent or treat illness or disease; and
(III) Is primarily directed at improving the appearance of
a person.
-
*AB74*

– 218 –
(2) Includes, without limitation, cosmetic surgery directed at
preserving beauty.
(b) “Gender dysphoria” means distress or impairment in social,
occupational or other areas of functioning caused by a marked
difference between the gender identity or expression of a person and
the sex assigned to the person at birth which lasts at least 6 months
and is shown by at least two of the following:
(1) A marked difference between gender identity or
expression and primary or secondary sex characteristics or
anticipated secondary sex characteristics in young adolescents.
(2) A strong desire to be rid of primary or secondary sex
characteristics because of a marked difference between such sex
characteristics and gender identity or expression or a desire to
prevent the development of anticipated secondary sex characteristics
in young adolescents.
(3) A strong desire for the primary or secondary sex
characteristics of the gender opposite from the sex assigned at birth.
(4) A strong desire to be of the opposite gender or a gender
different from the sex assigned at birth.
(5) A strong desire to be treated as the opposite gender or a
gender different from the sex assigned at birth.
(6) A strong conviction of experiencing typical feelings and
reactions of the opposite gender or a gender different from the sex
assigned at birth.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient; and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending or
approving a health care service or product does not, by itself, make
that health care service or product medically necessary.
[(d) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
-
*AB74*

– 219 –
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 261. NRS 695B.1916 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1916 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical service which provides coverage for prescription
drugs or devices shall include in the contract coverage for any type
of hormone replacement therapy which is lawfully prescribed or
ordered and which has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or
medical service that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall
not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for a prescription for hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use in
the future hormone replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A contract for hospital or medical service subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after October 1, 1999, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is
void.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage for fertility drugs.
[5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 220 –
Sec. 262. NRS 695B.1918 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1918 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical service which provides coverage for outpatient
care shall include in the contract coverage for any health care
service related to hormone replacement therapy.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or
medical service that provides coverage for outpatient care shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for outpatient care related to hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use in
the future hormone replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A contract for hospital or medical service subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after October 1, 1999, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is
void.
[4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 263. NRS 695B.1919 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1919 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8,
an insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or medical
service shall include in the contract coverage for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Listed in subsection 12; and
(4) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is:
-
*AB74*

– 221 –
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Listed in subsection 12;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion of a device for contraception or removal of such a
device if the device was inserted while the insured was covered by
the same contract for hospital or medical service;
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraception and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(g) Voluntary sterilization for women.
2. An insurer shall provide coverage for any services listed in
subsection 1 which are within the authorized scope of practice of a
pharmacist when such services are provided by a pharmacist who is
employed by or serves as an independent contractor of an in-
network pharmacy and in accordance with the applicable provider
network contract. Such coverage must be provided to the same
extent as if the services were provided by another provider of health
care, as applicable to the services being provided. The terms of the
policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services listed in subsection 1 and provided by
such a pharmacist to a number of occasions less than the coverage
for such services when provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services listed in subsection 1 and
provided by such a pharmacist to an amount less than the amount
reimbursed for similar services provided by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
3. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or
medical services must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
4. If a covered therapeutic equivalent listed in subsection 1 is
not available or a provider of health care deems a covered
therapeutic equivalent to be medically inappropriate, an alternate
therapeutic equivalent prescribed by a provider of health care must
be covered by the insurer.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 10, 11 and 13,
an insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or medical
service shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit included in the contract for
hospital or medical service pursuant to subsection 1;
-
*AB74*

– 222 –
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement to the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
6. Coverage pursuant to this section for the covered dependent
of an insured must be the same as for the insured.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a contract for
hospital or medical service subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the contract or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
8. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or
medical service and which is affiliated with a religious organization
is not required to provide the coverage required by subsection 1 if
the insurer objects on religious grounds. Such an insurer shall,
before the issuance of a contract for hospital or medical service and
before the renewal of such a contract, provide to the prospective
insured written notice of the coverage that the insurer refuses to
provide pursuant to this subsection.
9. If an insurer refuses, pursuant to subsection 8, to provide the
coverage required by subsection 1, an employer may otherwise
provide for the coverage for the employees of the employer.
10. An insurer may require an insured to pay a higher
deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception if
the insured refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent of the drug.
11. For each of the 18 methods of contraception listed in
subsection 12 that have been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration, a contract for hospital or medical service must
include at least one drug or device for contraception within each
method for which no deductible, copayment or coinsurance may be
charged to the insured, but the insurer may charge a deductible,
copayment or coinsurance for any other drug or device that provides
the same method of contraception. If the insurer charges a
-
*AB74*

– 223 –
copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the insurer
may only require an insured to pay the copayment or coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
12. The following 18 methods of contraception must be
covered pursuant to this section:
(a) Voluntary sterilization for women;
(b) Surgical sterilization implants for women;
(c) Implantable rods;
(d) Copper-based intrauterine devices;
(e) Progesterone-based intrauterine devices;
(f) Injections;
(g) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs;
(h) Progestin-based drugs;
(i) Extended- or continuous-regimen drugs;
(j) Estrogen- and progestin-based patches;
(k) Vaginal contraceptive rings;
(l) Diaphragms with spermicide;
(m) Sponges with spermicide;
(n) Cervical caps with spermicide;
(o) Female condoms;
(p) Spermicide;
(q) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs for
emergency contraception or progestin-based drugs for emergency
contraception; and
(r) Ulipristal acetate for emergency contraception.
13. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or medical
services may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
14. An insurer shall not:
(a) Use medical management techniques to require an insured to
use a method of contraception other than the method prescribed or
ordered by a provider of health care;
(b) Require an insured to obtain prior authorization for the
benefits described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1; or
(c) Refuse to cover a contraceptive injection or the insertion of a
device described in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of subsection 12 at a
hospital immediately after an insured gives birth.
15. An insurer must provide an accessible, transparent and
expedited process which is not unduly burdensome by which an
-
*AB74*

– 224 –
insured, or the authorized representative of the insured, may request
an exception relating to any medical management technique used by
the insurer to obtain any benefit required by this section without a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance.
16. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that has entered
into a contract with an insurer to provide services to insureds
through a network plan offered or issued by the insurer.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a contract for hospital or medical
service offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not include
an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d)] “Provider network contract” [means] includes a contract
between an insurer and a [provider of health care or] pharmacy
specifying the rights and responsibilities of the insurer and the
[provider of health care or] pharmacy [, as applicable,] for delivery
of health care services pursuant to a network plan.
[(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(f) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and classification as a therapeutic equivalent.]
Sec. 264. NRS 695B.19195 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.19195 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical service shall include in the contract coverage
for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
-
*AB74*

– 225 –
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression;
(h) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
(i) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(j) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(k) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a contract for hospital or medical service shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the contract for
hospital or medical service pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 226 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A contract for hospital or medical service subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is
void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
[6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a contract for hospital or medical
service offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not include
an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 265. NRS 695B.19197 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.19197 1. A hospital or medical services corporation
that offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder, including, without limitation, lofexidine.
(b) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
-
*AB74*

– 227 –
use disorder, including, without limitation, buprenorphine,
methadone and naltrexone.
(c) The services described in NRS 639.28079 when provided by
a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the
hospital or medical services corporation. The Commissioner shall
adopt regulations governing the provision of reimbursement for
such services.
(d) Any service for the treatment of substance use disorder
provided by a provider of primary care if the service is covered
when provided by a specialist and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall reimburse a pharmacist
or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the hospital or
medical services corporation for the services described in NRS
639.28079 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation shall provide the
coverage required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1
regardless of whether the drug is included in the formulary of the
hospital or medical services corporation.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a hospital or
medical services corporation shall not subject the benefits required
by paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy. A hospital or
medical services corporation may subject the benefits required by
paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1 to other reasonable medical
management techniques when the benefits are provided by a
pharmacist in accordance with NRS 639.28079.
5. A hospital or medical services corporation shall not:
(a) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 1; or
(b) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service.
6. A hospital or medical services corporation shall ensure that
the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
-
*AB74*

– 228 –
7. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 266. NRS 695B.1924 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1924 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the hospital or medical services organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy using a drug
to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
-
*AB74*

– 229 –
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the hospital
or medical services corporation.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
hospital or medical services corporation for the services described in
NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement
provided to a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the hospital or
medical services corporation for any service to test for, prevent or
treat human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to
the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar
services.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A hospital or medical services corporation shall ensure that
the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
-
*AB74*

– 230 –
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 267. NRS 695B.1925 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1925 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical service must provide coverage for benefits
payable for expenses incurred for:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid testing for high-risk strains of human
papillomavirus every 3 years for women 30 years of age and older;
and
(b) Administering the human papillomavirus vaccine at such
ages as recommended for vaccination by a competent authority,
including, without limitation, the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, the Food and Drug Administration or the manufacturer of
the vaccine.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise required by subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a contract for hospital or medical service shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the contract for
hospital or medical service pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
-
*AB74*

– 231 –
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A contract for hospital or medical service subject to the
provisions of this chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is
void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Human] , “human papillomavirus vaccine” means the
Quadrivalent Human Papillomavirus Recombinant Vaccine or its
successor which is approved by the Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human papillomavirus infection and cervical
cancer.
[(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a contract for hospital or medical
service offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not include
an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 268. NRS 695B.1929 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1929 1. A hospital or medical service corporation that
issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the policy
coverage for:
(a) Necessary case management services for an insured who has
been diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Medically necessary care for an insured who has been
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants.
2. A hospital or medical service corporation that issues a policy
of health insurance which provides coverage for prescription drugs
-
*AB74*

– 232 –
shall include in the policy coverage for medically necessary
prescription drugs to treat sickle cell disease and its variants.
3. A hospital or medical service corporation may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any available
clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating
to any benefit required by this section or the type of provider of
health care to use for such treatment.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other health
care management services to assist patients and providers of health
care, including, without limitation, identifying and facilitating
additional resources and treatments, providing information about
treatment options and facilitating communication between providers
of services to a patient.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services. The
term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy, prior
authorization or categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type
or method of administration.
(c)] “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.055.
[(d)] (c) “Sickle cell disease and its variants” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.4927.
Sec. 269. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, sections 2 to 41,
inclusive, of this act, subsections 2, 4, 17, 18 and 30 of NRS
680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060, inclusive, chapter 681B of
NRS, NRS 686A.010 to [686A.315,] 686A.325, inclusive, and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act, NRS 686B.010 to
686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to 687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070
to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150, 687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200
to 687B.255, inclusive, 687B.270, 687B.310 to 687B.380, inclusive,
[687B.410, 687B.420,] 687B.402 to 687B.430, inclusive, 687B.500
and chapters 692B, 692C, 693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of this
chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
-
*AB74*

– 233 –
Sec. 270. NRS 695C.030 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.030 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Comprehensive health care services” means medical
services, dentistry, drugs, psychiatric and optometric and all other
care necessary for the delivery of services to the consumer.
2. “Enrollee” means a natural person who has been voluntarily
enrolled in a health care plan.
3. “Evidence of coverage” means any certificate, agreement or
contract issued to an enrollee setting forth the coverage to which the
enrollee is entitled.
4. “Health care plan” means any arrangement whereby any
person undertakes to provide, arrange for, pay for or reimburse any
part of the cost of any health care services and at least part of the
arrangement consists of arranging for or the provision of health care
services paid for by or on behalf of the enrollee on a periodic
prepaid basis.
5. “Health care services” means any services included in the
furnishing to any natural person of medical or dental care or
hospitalization or incident to the furnishing of such care or
hospitalization, as well as the furnishing to any person of any other
services for the purpose of preventing, alleviating, curing or healing
human illness or injury.
6. “Health maintenance organization” means any person which
provides or arranges for provision of a health care service or
services and is responsible for the availability and accessibility of
such service or services to its enrollees, which services are paid for
or on behalf of the enrollees on a periodic prepaid basis without
regard to the dates health services are rendered and without regard
to the extent of services actually furnished to the enrollees, except
that supplementing the fixed prepayments by nominal additional
payments for services in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Commissioner shall not be deemed to render the arrangement not to
be on a prepaid basis. A health maintenance organization, in
addition to offering health care services, may offer indemnity or
service benefits provided through insurers or otherwise.
7. “Medical management technique” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 299 of this act.
8. “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.645.
9. “Provider” means any physician, hospital or other person
who is licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to furnish health
care services.
-
*AB74*

– 234 –
10. “Provider network contract” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 687B.658.
11. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
12. “Therapeutic equivalent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in section 302 of this act.
Sec. 271. NRS 695C.055 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.055 1. The provisions of NRS 449.465, 679A.200,
679B.152, 679B.700, subsections 7 and 8 of NRS 680A.270,
subsections 2, 4, 17, 18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.020 to
680B.060, inclusive, chapters 681B and 686A of NRS, NRS
686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.122 to 687B.128, inclusive,
687B.310 to 687B.420, inclusive, [and] 687B.500 and 687B.600 to
687B.850, inclusive, and chapters 692C and 695G of NRS apply to
a health maintenance organization.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, unless the context requires
that a provision apply only to insurers, any reference in those
sections to “insurer” must be replaced by “health maintenance
organization.”
Sec. 272. NRS 695C.070 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.070 Each application for a certificate of authority must
be verified by an officer or authorized representative of the
applicant, must be in a form prescribed by the Commissioner, and
must set forth or be accompanied by the following:
1. A copy of the basic organizational document, if any, of the
applicant, and all amendments thereto;
2. A copy of the bylaws, rules or regulations, or a similar
document, if any, regulating the conduct of the internal affairs of the
applicant;
3. A list of the names, addresses and official positions of the
persons who will be responsible for the conduct of the affairs of the
applicant, including all members of the board of directors, board of
trustees, executive committee, or other governing board or
committee, the officers in the case of a corporation, and the partners
or members in the case of a partnership or association;
4. A copy of any contract made or to be made between any
providers or persons listed in subsection 3 and the applicant;
5. A statement generally describing the health maintenance
organization, its health care plan or plans, the location of facilities at
which health care services will be regularly available to enrollees
and the type of health care personnel who will provide the health
care services;
-
*AB74*

– 235 –
6. A copy of the form of evidence of coverage to be issued to
the enrollees;
7. A copy of the form of the group contract, if any, which is to
be issued to employers, unions, trustees or other organizations;
8. Certified financial statements showing the applicant’s assets,
liabilities and sources of financial support;
9. The proposed method of marketing the plan, a financial plan
which includes a 3-year projection of the initial operating results
anticipated and the sources of [working] capital and surplus and
any other sources of funding;
10. A power of attorney, executed by the applicant, appointing
the Commissioner and the authorized deputies of the Commissioner
as the true and lawful attorney of such applicant in and for this State
upon whom all lawful process in any legal action or proceeding
against the health maintenance organization on a cause of action
arising in this State may be served;
11. A statement reasonably describing the geographic area to
be served;
12. A description of the procedures for resolving complaints
and procedures for external reviews to be used as required under
NRS 695C.260;
13. A description of the procedures and programs to be
implemented to meet the quality of health care requirements in
NRS 695C.080;
14. A description of the mechanism by which enrollees will be
afforded an opportunity to participate in matters of program content
under subsection 2 of NRS 695C.110; and
15. Such other information as the Commissioner may require
to make the determinations required in NRS 695C.080.
Sec. 273. NRS 695C.090 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.090 The Commissioner shall issue or deny a certificate
of authority to any person filing an application pursuant to NRS
695C.060 within 90 days after certification. Issuance of a certificate
of authority must be granted upon payment of the fees prescribed in
NRS 695C.230 if the Commissioner is satisfied that the following
conditions are met:
1. The persons responsible for the conduct of the affairs of the
applicant are competent, trustworthy and possess good reputations.
2. The Commissioner certifies, in accordance with NRS
695C.080, that the health maintenance organization’s proposed plan
of operation meets the requirements of subsection 1 of
NRS 695C.080.
3. The health care plan furnishes comprehensive health care
services.
-
*AB74*

– 236 –
4. The health maintenance organization is financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to meet its obligations
to enrollees and prospective enrollees. In making this determination,
the Commissioner may consider:
(a) The financial soundness of the health care plan’s
arrangements for health care services and the schedule of charges
used in connection therewith;
(b) The adequacy of [working] capital [;] and surplus;
(c) Any agreement with an insurer, a government, or any other
organization for insuring the payment of the cost of health care
services;
(d) Any agreement with providers for the provision of health
care services; and
(e) Any surety bond or deposit of cash or securities submitted in
accordance with NRS 695C.270 as a guarantee that the obligations
will be duly performed.
5. The enrollees will be afforded an opportunity to participate
in matters of program content pursuant to NRS 695C.110.
6. Nothing in the proposed method of operation, as shown by
the information submitted pursuant to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070
and 695C.140, or by independent investigation is contrary to the
public interest.
Sec. 274. NRS 695C.16932 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.16932 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a health maintenance organization that issues a health
care plan shall include in the plan coverage for medically necessary
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate
management and ongoing monitoring of cancer when such
biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific evidence.
Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A health maintenance organization shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens.
-
*AB74*

– 237 –
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
enrollee or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of cancer; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the health maintenance organization.
3. If a health maintenance organization requires an enrollee to
obtain prior authorization for a biomarker test described in
subsection 1, the health maintenance organization shall respond to a
request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a health
maintenance organization to provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience;
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the health maintenance
organization; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
-
*AB74*

– 238 –
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 239 –
Sec. 275. NRS 695C.16934 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.16934 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
a health maintenance organization that issues a health care plan shall
include in the health care plan coverage for the medically necessary
treatment of conditions relating to gender dysphoria and gender
incongruence. Such coverage must include coverage of medically
necessary psychosocial and surgical intervention and any other
medically necessary treatment for such disorders provided by:
(a) Endocrinologists;
(b) Pediatric endocrinologists;
(c) Social workers;
(d) Psychiatrists;
(e) Psychologists;
(f) Gynecologists;
(g) Speech-language pathologists;
(h) Primary care physicians;
(i) Advanced practice registered nurses;
(j) Physician assistants; and
(k) Any other providers of medically necessary services for the
treatment of gender dysphoria or gender incongruence.
2. This section does not require a health care plan to include
coverage for cosmetic surgery performed by a plastic surgeon or
reconstructive surgeon that is not medically necessary.
3. A health maintenance organization that issues a health care
plan shall not categorically refuse to cover medically necessary
gender-affirming treatments or procedures or revisions to prior
treatments if the plan provides coverage for any such services,
procedures or revisions for purposes other than gender transition or
affirmation.
4. A health maintenance organization that issues a health care
plan may prescribe requirements that must be satisfied before the
health maintenance organization covers surgical treatment of
conditions relating to gender dysphoria or gender incongruence for
an enrollee who is less than 18 years of age. Such requirements may
include, without limitation, requirements that:
(a) The treatment must be recommended by a psychologist,
psychiatrist or other mental health professional;
(b) The treatment must be recommended by a physician;
(c) The enrollee must provide a written expression of the desire
of the enrollee to undergo the treatment;
(d) A written plan for treatment that covers at least 1 year must
be developed and approved by at least two providers of health care;
and
-
*AB74*

– 240 –
(e) Parental consent is provided for the enrollee unless the
enrollee is expressly authorized by law to consent on his or her own
behalf.
5. When determining whether treatment is medically necessary
for the purposes of this section, a health maintenance organization
must consider the most recent Standards of Care prescribed by the
World Professional Association for Transgender Health, or its
successor organization.
6. A health maintenance organization shall make a reasonable
effort to ensure that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made
available to an enrollee through a provider of health care who
participates in the network plan of the health maintenance
organization. If, after a reasonable effort, the health maintenance
organization is unable to make such benefits available through such
a provider of health care, the health maintenance organization may
treat the treatment that the health maintenance organization is
unable to make available through such a provider of health care in
the same manner as other services provided by a provider of health
care who does not participate in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization.
7. If an enrollee appeals the denial of a claim or coverage under
this section on the grounds that the treatment requested by the
enrollee is not medically necessary, the health maintenance
organization must consult with a provider of health care who has
experience in prescribing or delivering gender-affirming treatment
concerning the medical necessity of the treatment requested by the
enrollee when considering the appeal.
8. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after July 1,
2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or renewal which is in
conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cosmetic surgery”:
(1) Means a surgical procedure that:
(I) Does not meaningfully promote the proper function of
the body;
(II) Does not prevent or treat illness or disease; and
(III) Is primarily directed at improving the appearance of
a person.
(2) Includes, without limitation, cosmetic surgery directed at
preserving beauty.
(b) “Gender dysphoria” means distress or impairment in social,
occupational or other areas of functioning caused by a marked
difference between the gender identity or expression of a person and
-
*AB74*

– 241 –
the sex assigned to the person at birth which lasts at least 6 months
and is shown by at least two of the following:
(1) A marked difference between gender identity or
expression and primary or secondary sex characteristics or
anticipated secondary sex characteristics in young adolescents.
(2) A strong desire to be rid of primary or secondary sex
characteristics because of a marked difference between such sex
characteristics and gender identity or expression or a desire to
prevent the development of anticipated secondary sex characteristics
in young adolescents.
(3) A strong desire for the primary or secondary sex
characteristics of the gender opposite from the sex assigned at birth.
(4) A strong desire to be of the opposite gender or a gender
different from the sex assigned at birth.
(5) A strong desire to be treated as the opposite gender or a
gender different from the sex assigned at birth.
(6) A strong conviction of experiencing typical feelings and
reactions of the opposite gender or a gender different from the sex
assigned at birth.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient; and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending or
approving a health care service or product does not, by itself, make
that health care service or product medically necessary.
[(d) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 242 –
Sec. 276. NRS 695C.1694 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1694 1. A health maintenance organization which
offers or issues a health care plan that provides coverage for
prescription drugs or devices shall include in the plan coverage for
any type of hormone replacement therapy which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration.
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall
not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for hormone replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use in the future hormone replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an enrollee, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an
enrollee.
3. Evidence of coverage subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 1999, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the evidence of
coverage or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a health
maintenance organization to provide coverage for fertility drugs.
[5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 277. NRS 695C.16947 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.16947 1. A health care plan which provides coverage
for prescription drugs must not require an enrollee to submit to a
step therapy protocol before covering a drug approved by the Food
and Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric
condition of the enrollee, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
-
*AB74*

– 243 –
enrollee or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
enrollee in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph
(1), (2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3) who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization is located 60 miles or more from the
residence of the enrollee; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the enrollee, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of a health care plan subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this section is void.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) [“Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care is provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set
of providers under contract with the health maintenance
organization. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c)] “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
enrollee to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the enrollee before his or her health care
plan provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 278. NRS 695C.1695 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1695 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan which provides coverage for outpatient
care shall include in the plan coverage for any health care service
related to hormone replacement therapy.
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan that provides coverage for outpatient care shall not:
-
*AB74*

– 244 –
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for outpatient care related to hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use in the future hormone replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an enrollee, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an
enrollee.
3. Evidence of coverage subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 1999, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the evidence of
coverage or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
[4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 279. NRS 695C.1696 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1696 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a
health maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Listed in subsection 12; and
(4) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Listed in subsection 12;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion of a device for contraception or removal of such a
device if the device was inserted while the enrollee was covered by
the same health care plan;
-
*AB74*

– 245 –
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraception and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(g) Voluntary sterilization for women.
2. A health maintenance organization shall provide coverage
for any services listed in subsection 1 which are within the
authorized scope of practice of a pharmacist when such services are
provided by a pharmacist who is employed by or serves as an
independent contractor of an in-network pharmacy and in
accordance with the applicable provider network contract. Such
coverage must be provided to the same extent as if the services were
provided by another provider of health care, as applicable to the
services being provided. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services listed in subsection 1 and provided by
such a pharmacist to a number of occasions less than the coverage
for such services when provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services listed in subsection 1 and
provided by such a pharmacist to an amount less than the amount
reimbursed for similar services provided by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
3. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
4. If a covered therapeutic equivalent listed in subsection 1 is
not available or a provider of health care deems a covered
therapeutic equivalent to be medically inappropriate, an alternate
therapeutic equivalent prescribed by a provider of health care must
be covered by the health maintenance organization.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 10, 11 and 13, a
health maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care
plan shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit included in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 246 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
6. Coverage pursuant to this section for the covered dependent
of an enrollee must be the same as for the enrollee.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a health care
plan subject to the provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued
for delivery or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, has the legal
effect of including the coverage required by this section, and any
provision of the plan or the renewal which is in conflict with this
section is void.
8. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan and which is affiliated with a religious organization
is not required to provide the coverage required by subsection 1 if
the health maintenance organization objects on religious grounds.
Such an organization shall, before the issuance of a health care plan
and before the renewal of such a plan, provide to the prospective
enrollee written notice of the coverage that the health maintenance
organization refuses to provide pursuant to this subsection.
9. If a health maintenance organization refuses, pursuant to
subsection 8, to provide the coverage required by subsection 1, an
employer may otherwise provide for the coverage for the employees
of the employer.
10. A health maintenance organization may require an enrollee
to pay a higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for
contraception if the enrollee refuses to accept a therapeutic
equivalent of the drug.
11. For each of the 18 methods of contraception listed in
subsection 12 that have been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration, a health care plan must include at least one drug or
device for contraception within each method for which no
deductible, copayment or coinsurance may be charged to the
enrollee, but the health maintenance organization may charge a
deductible, copayment or coinsurance for any other drug or device
that provides the same method of contraception. If the health
maintenance organization charges a copayment or coinsurance for a
drug for contraception, the health maintenance organization may
only require an enrollee to pay the copayment or coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
-
*AB74*

– 247 –
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
12. The following 18 methods of contraception must be
covered pursuant to this section:
(a) Voluntary sterilization for women;
(b) Surgical sterilization implants for women;
(c) Implantable rods;
(d) Copper-based intrauterine devices;
(e) Progesterone-based intrauterine devices;
(f) Injections;
(g) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs;
(h) Progestin-based drugs;
(i) Extended- or continuous-regimen drugs;
(j) Estrogen- and progestin-based patches;
(k) Vaginal contraceptive rings;
(l) Diaphragms with spermicide;
(m) Sponges with spermicide;
(n) Cervical caps with spermicide;
(o) Female condoms;
(p) Spermicide;
(q) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs for
emergency contraception or progestin-based drugs for emergency
contraception; and
(r) Ulipristal acetate for emergency contraception.
13. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a health maintenance organization may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any available
clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating
to any benefit required by this section or the type of provider of
health care to use for such treatment.
14. A health maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Use medical management techniques to require an enrollee
to use a method of contraception other than the method prescribed
or ordered by a provider of health care;
(b) Require an enrollee to obtain prior authorization for the
benefits described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1; or
(c) Refuse to cover a contraceptive injection or the insertion of a
device described in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of subsection 12 at a
hospital immediately after an enrollee gives birth.
15. A health maintenance organization must provide an
accessible, transparent and expedited process which is not unduly
burdensome by which an enrollee, or the authorized representative
of the enrollee, may request an exception relating to any medical
management technique used by the health maintenance organization
to obtain any benefit required by this section without a higher
deductible, copayment or coinsurance.
-
*AB74*

– 248 –
16. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that has entered
into a contract with a health maintenance organization to provide
services to enrollees through a network plan offered or issued by the
health maintenance organization.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d)] “Provider network contract” [means] includes a contract
between a health maintenance organization and a [provider of health
care or] pharmacy specifying the rights and responsibilities of the
health maintenance organization and the [provider of health care or]
pharmacy [, as applicable,] for delivery of health care services
pursuant to a network plan.
[(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(f) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.]
Sec. 280. NRS 695C.1698 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1698 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
-
*AB74*

– 249 –
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression;
(h) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the enrollee or as ordered by a provider of health care;
(i) Smoking cessation programs for an enrollee who is 18 years
of age or older not more than two cessation attempts per year and
four counseling sessions per year;
(j) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(k) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a health
maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
-
*AB74*

– 250 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a health maintenance organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
[6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 281. NRS 695C.1699 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1699 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder, including, without limitation, lofexidine.
(b) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder, including, without limitation, buprenorphine,
methadone and naltrexone.
-
*AB74*

– 251 –
(c) The services described in NRS 639.28079 when provided by
a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the
health maintenance organization. The Commissioner shall adopt
regulations governing the provision of reimbursement for such
services.
(d) Any service for the treatment of substance use disorder
provided by a provider of primary care if the service is covered
when provided by a specialist and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy that
participates in the network plan of the health maintenance
organization for the services described in NRS 639.28079 at a rate
equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar
services.
3. A health maintenance organization shall provide the
coverage required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1
regardless of whether the drug is included in the formulary of the
health maintenance organization.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a health
maintenance organization shall not subject the benefits required by
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1 to medical management
techniques, other than step therapy. A health maintenance
organization may subject the benefits required by paragraphs (b) and
(c) of subsection 1 to other reasonable medical management
techniques when the benefits are provided by a pharmacist in
accordance with NRS 639.28079.
5. A health maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 1; or
(b) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service.
6. A health maintenance organization shall ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
7. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*AB74*

– 252 –
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 282. NRS 695C.1728 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1728 1. A health maintenance organization that issues
a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Necessary case management services for an enrollee who has
been diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Medically necessary care for an enrollee who has been
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants.
2. A health maintenance organization that issues a health care
plan which provides coverage for prescription drugs shall include in
the plan coverage for medically necessary prescription drugs to treat
sickle cell disease and its variants.
3. A health maintenance organization shall establish a plan for
each enrollee under 18 years of age who has been diagnosed with
sickle cell disease and its variants to transition the enrollee from
pediatric care to adult care when the enrollee reaches 18 years of
age.
4. A health maintenance organization may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any available
clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating
to any benefit required by this section or the type of provider of
health care to use for such treatment.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other health
care management services to assist patients and providers of health
care, including, without limitation, identifying and facilitating
-
*AB74*

– 253 –
additional resources and treatments, providing information about
treatment options and facilitating communication between providers
of services to a patient.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services. The
term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy, prior
authorization or categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type
or method of administration.
(c)] “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.055.
[(d)] (c) “Sickle cell disease and its variants” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.4927.
Sec. 283. NRS 695C.17347 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.17347 1. A health maintenance organization that issues
a health care plan shall provide coverage for screening, genetic
counseling and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for
women under circumstances where such screening, genetic
counseling or testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. A health maintenance organization shall ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2022, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
[4. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 284. NRS 695C.1735 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1735 1. A health care plan of a health maintenance
organization must provide coverage for benefits payable for
expenses incurred for:
(a) A mammogram to screen for breast cancer annually for
enrollees who are 40 years of age or older.
-
*AB74*

– 254 –
(b) An imaging test to screen for breast cancer on an interval
and at the age deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary,
as recommended by the enrollee’s provider of health care based on
personal or family medical history or additional factors that may
increase the risk of breast cancer for the enrollee.
(c) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age deemed
most appropriate, when medically necessary, as recommended by
the enrollee’s provider of health care to evaluate an abnormality
which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from a mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or an imaging test described in paragraph (b); or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a health
maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
enrollee to pay a deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other
form of cost-sharing or require a longer waiting period or other
condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any benefit provided in the health care plan pursuant to
subsection 1;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
-
*AB74*

– 255 –
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a health maintenance organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an enrollee
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified health care plan with
respect to the deductible of such a health care plan after the enrollee
has satisfied the minimum deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223,
except with respect to items or services that constitute preventive
care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the
prohibitions of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall apply regardless
of whether the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 223 has been
satisfied.
7. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified] , “qualified health care plan” means a health
care plan of a health maintenance organization that has a high
deductible and is in compliance with 26 U.S.C. § 223 for the
purposes of establishing a health savings account.
Sec. 285. NRS 695C.1737 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1737 1. A health maintenance organization that issues
a health care plan shall provide coverage for the examination of a
person who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
-
*AB74*

– 256 –
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
enrollee by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the health maintenance
organization; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after July 1,
2021, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts with the
provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical] , “medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 652.060.
[(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 286. NRS 695C.1743 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1743 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the health maintenance organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization.
-
*AB74*

– 257 –
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
health maintenance organization for the services described in NRS
639.28085 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization for any service to test for, prevent or treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the
rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar services.
3. A health maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the enrollee is diagnosed.
4. A health maintenance organization shall ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
-
*AB74*

– 258 –
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 287. NRS 695C.1745 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1745 1. A health care plan of a health maintenance
organization must provide coverage for benefits payable for
expenses incurred for:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid testing for high-risk strains of human
papillomavirus every 3 years for women 30 years of age and older;
and
(b) Administering the human papillomavirus vaccine as
recommended for vaccination by a competent authority, including,
without limitation, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
Food and Drug Administration or the manufacturer of the vaccine.
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a health
maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. Any evidence of coverage subject to the provisions of this
chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
-
*AB74*

– 259 –
after January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the evidence of
coverage or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a health maintenance organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Human] , “human papillomavirus vaccine” means the
Quadrivalent Human Papillomavirus Recombinant Vaccine or its
successor which is approved by the Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human papillomavirus infection and cervical
cancer.
[(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 288. NRS 695C.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.300 1. No health maintenance organization or
representative thereof may cause or knowingly permit the use of
advertising which is untrue or misleading, solicitation which is
untrue or misleading or any form of evidence of coverage which is
deceptive. For purposes of this chapter:
(a) A statement or item of information shall be deemed to be
untrue if it does not conform to fact in any respect which is or may
be significant to an enrollee of, or person considering enrollment in,
a health care plan.
(b) A statement or item of information shall be deemed to be
misleading, whether or not it may be literally untrue if, in the total
context in which such statement is made or such item of information
is communicated, such statement or item of information may be
reasonably understood by a reasonable person not possessing special
knowledge regarding health care coverage, as indicating any benefit
-
*AB74*

– 260 –
or advantage or the absence of any exclusion, limitation or
disadvantage of possible significance to an enrollee of, or person
considering enrollment in, a health care plan if such benefit or
advantage or absence of limitation, exclusion or disadvantage does
not in fact exist.
(c) An evidence of coverage shall be deemed to be deceptive if
the evidence of coverage taken as a whole, and with consideration
given to typography and format as well as language, shall be such as
to cause a reasonable person not possessing special knowledge
regarding health care plans and evidences of coverage therefor to
expect benefits, services, charges or other advantages which the
evidence of coverage does not provide or which the health care plan
issuing such evidence of coverage does not regularly make available
for enrollees covered under such evidence of coverage.
2. NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act shall be construed to apply
to health maintenance organizations, health care plans and evidences
of coverage except to the extent that the nature of health
maintenance organizations, health care plans and evidences of
coverage render the sections therein clearly inappropriate.
3. An enrollee may not be cancelled or not renewed except for
the failure to pay the charge for such coverage or for cause as
determined in the master contract.
4. No health maintenance organization, unless licensed as an
insurer, may use in its name, contracts, or literature any of the words
“insurance,” “casualty,” “surety,” “mutual” or any other words
descriptive of the insurance, casualty or surety business or
deceptively similar to the name or description of any insurance or
surety corporation doing business in this State.
5. No person not certificated under this chapter shall use in its
name, contracts or literature the phrase “health maintenance
organization” or the initials “HMO.”
Sec. 289. NRS 695C.310 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.310 1. The Commissioner shall make an examination
of the affairs of any health maintenance organization and providers
with whom such organization has contracts, agreements or other
arrangements pursuant to its health care plan as often as the
Commissioner deems it necessary for the protection of the interests
of the people of this State, but not less frequently than once every 3
years.
2. The Commissioner shall make an examination concerning
any compliance program used by a health maintenance organization
and any report, as determined to be appropriate by the
Commissioner, regarding the health maintenance organization
-
*AB74*

– 261 –
produced by an organization which examines best practices in the
insurance industry. The Commissioner shall make such an
examination as often as the Commissioner deems it necessary for
the protection of the interests of the people of this State, but not less
frequently than once every 3 years.
3. In making an examination pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, the
Commissioner:
(a) Shall determine whether the health maintenance organization
is in compliance with this Code, including, without limitation,
whether any relationship or transaction between the health
maintenance organization and any other health maintenance
organization is in compliance with this Code; and
(b) May examine any account, record, document or transaction
of any health maintenance organization or any provider which
relates to:
(1) Compliance with this Code by the health maintenance
organization which is the subject of the examination;
(2) Any relationship or transaction between the health
maintenance organization which is the subject of the examination
and any other health maintenance organization; or
(3) Any relationship or transaction between the health
maintenance organization which is the subject of the examination
and any provider.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for the
purposes of an examination pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, each
health maintenance organization and provider shall, upon the
request of the Commissioner or an examiner designated by the
Commissioner, submit its books and records relating to any
applicable health care plan to the Commissioner or the examiner, as
applicable. Medical records of natural persons and records of
physicians providing service pursuant to a contract with a health
maintenance organization are not subject to such examination,
although the records, except privileged medical information, are
subject to subpoena upon a showing of good cause. For the purpose
of examinations, the Commissioner may administer oaths to and
examine the officers and agents of a health maintenance
organization and the principals of providers concerning their
business.
5. The expenses of examinations pursuant to this section must
be assessed, billed and paid in accordance with the provisions of
[NRS 679B.290.] section 19 of this act.
6. In lieu of an examination pursuant to this section, the
Commissioner may accept the report of an examination made by the
insurance commissioner of another state or an applicable regulatory
agency of another state.
-
*AB74*

– 262 –
Sec. 290. NRS 695C.317 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.317 The Commissioner shall use the procedures required
by:
1. [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.290,] Sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of
this act when conducting an examination of a health maintenance
organization.
2. NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive, when conducting a
hearing involving a health maintenance organization.
Sec. 291. NRS 695D.270 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695D.270 1. The Commissioner shall, not less frequently
than once every 3 years, conduct an examination of an organization
for dental care pursuant to [NRS 679B.250 to 679B.300,] sections 2
to 41, inclusive [.] , of this act.
2. The Commissioner may examine any organization which
holds a certificate of authority from this State or another state at any
other time the Commissioner deems necessary. For those
organizations transacting business in this State which are not
organized in this State, the Commissioner may accept a full report
of the last examination of the organization certified by the state
officer who supervises those organizations in the other state, if that
examination is equivalent to an examination conducted by the
Commissioner.
3. The Commissioner shall, in like manner, examine all
organizations applying for a certificate of authority.
Sec. 292. NRS 695D.290 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695D.290 The provisions of NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,]
686A.325, inclusive, and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act
relating to trade practices and frauds apply to organizations for
dental care.
Sec. 293. NRS 695E.170 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695E.170 1. A risk retention group and its agents and
representatives are subject to the provisions of:
(a) NRS 680A.205 and any regulations adopted pursuant
thereto, including, without limitation, regulations relating to the
standards which may be used by the Commissioner in determining
whether a risk retention group is in a hazardous financial condition.
(b) NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive [.] , and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act. Any injunction obtained
pursuant to those sections must be obtained from a court of
competent jurisdiction.
-
*AB74*

– 263 –
2. All premiums paid for coverages within this state to a risk
retention group are subject to the provisions of chapter 680B of
NRS. Each risk retention group shall report all premiums paid to it
and shall pay the taxes on premiums and any related fines or
penalties for risks resident, located or to be performed in the state.
3. Any person acting as an agent or a broker for a risk retention
group pursuant to NRS 695E.210 shall:
(a) Report to the Commissioner each premium for direct
business for risks resident, located or to be performed in this State
which the person has placed with or on behalf of a risk retention
group that is not chartered in this State.
(b) Maintain a complete and separate record of each policy
obtained from each risk retention group. Each record maintained
pursuant to this subsection must be made available upon request by
the Commissioner for examination pursuant to [NRS 679B.240,]
section 16 of this act, and must include, for each policy and each
kind of insurance provided therein:
(1) The limit of liability;
(2) The period covered;
(3) The effective date;
(4) The name of the risk retention group which issued the
policy;
(5) The gross annual premium charged; and
(6) The amount of return premiums, if any.
4. As used in this section, “premiums for direct business”
means any premium written in this State for a policy of insurance.
The term does not include any premium for reinsurance or for a
contract between members of a risk retention group.
Sec. 294. NRS 695E.210 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695E.210 1. The provisions of chapters 683A and 685A of
NRS apply to any person acting, or offering to act, as an agent or
broker for:
(a) A purchasing group;
(b) A member of a purchasing group under the group policy; or
(c) A risk retention group transacting insurance in this State.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions
of chapter 679B of NRS and sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act
apply to purchasing groups and risk retention groups, and to the
provisions of this chapter, to the extent that the provisions of chapter
679B of NRS and sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act are not
specifically preempted by the Product Liability Risk Retention Act
of 1981, as amended by the Risk Retention Amendments of 1986.
3. A risk retention group that violates any provision of this
chapter is subject to the fines and penalties, including revocation of
-
*AB74*

– 264 –
its right to do business in this state, applicable to licensed insurers
under this title.
Sec. 295. NRS 695F.090 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695F.090 1. Prepaid limited health service organizations are
subject to the provisions of this chapter and to the following
provisions, to the extent reasonably applicable:
(a) NRS 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, concerning rates and
essential insurance.
(b) NRS 687B.310 to 687B.420, inclusive, concerning
cancellation and nonrenewal of policies.
(c) NRS 687B.122 to 687B.128, inclusive, concerning
readability of policies.
(d) The requirements of NRS 679B.152.
(e) The fees imposed pursuant to NRS 449.465.
(f) NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive, and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act concerning trade practices
and frauds.
(g) The assessment imposed pursuant to NRS 679B.700.
(h) Chapter 683A of NRS.
(i) To the extent applicable, the provisions of NRS 689B.340 to
689B.580, inclusive, and chapter 689C of NRS relating to the
portability and availability of health insurance.
(j) NRS 689A.035, 689A.0463, 689A.410 [, 689A.413] and
689A.415.
(k) NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060, inclusive, concerning premium
tax, premium tax rate, annual report and estimated quarterly tax
payments. For the purposes of this paragraph, unless the context
otherwise requires that a section apply only to insurers, any
reference in those sections to “insurer” must be replaced by a
reference to “prepaid limited health service organization.”
(l) Chapter 692C of NRS, concerning holding companies.
(m) NRS 689A.637, concerning health centers.
(n) Chapter 681B of NRS, concerning assets and liabilities.
(o) NRS 682A.400 to 682A.468, inclusive, concerning
investments.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a prepaid limited health service organization is
included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 296. NRS 695F.159 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695F.159 1. Evidence of coverage which provides coverage
for prescription drugs must not require an enrollee to use a step
therapy protocol before covering a drug approved by the Food and
-
*AB74*

– 265 –
Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric
condition of the enrollee, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
enrollee or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
enrollee in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph
(1), (2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3) who participates in the network plan of the prepaid limited
health service organization is located 60 miles or more from the
residence of the enrollee; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the enrollee, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of an evidence of coverage subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this
section is void.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Network plan” [means evidence of coverage offered by a
prepaid limited health service organization under which] has the
[financing and delivery of medical care is provided, in whole or]
meaning ascribed to it in [part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the prepaid limited health service organization.
The term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.] NRS 687B.645.
(c) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
enrollee to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the enrollee before his or her evidence of
coverage provides coverage for the recommended drug.
-
*AB74*

– 266 –
Sec. 297. NRS 695F.310 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695F.310 1. The Commissioner may examine the affairs of
any prepaid limited health service organization as often as is
reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the residents of this
State, but not less frequently than once every 3 years.
2. A prepaid limited health service organization shall make its
books and records available for examination and cooperate with the
Commissioner to facilitate the examination.
3. In lieu of such an examination, the Commissioner may
accept the report of an examination conducted by the commissioner
of insurance of another state.
4. An examination conducted pursuant to this section must be
conducted in accordance with the provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to
679B.300,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive [.] , of this act.
5. A prepaid limited health service organization may be
investigated in accordance with NRS 679B.600 to 679B.700,
inclusive.
Sec. 298. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 299 to 302, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 299. “Medical management technique” means a
practice which is used to control the cost or use of health care
services or prescription drugs. The term includes, without
limitation, the use of step therapy, prior authorization and
categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type or method of
administration.
Sec. 300. “Network plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.645.
Sec. 301. “Provider network contract” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 687B.658.
Sec. 302. “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
1. Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
2. Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
3. Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.
Sec. 303. NRS 695G.010 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 695G.012 to
-
*AB74*

– 267 –
695G.085, inclusive, and sections 299 to 302, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 304. NRS 695G.019 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.019 “Health benefit plan” [means a policy, contract,
certificate or agreement offered or issued by a health carrier to
provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for or reimburse any of] has the
[costs of health care services.] meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.470.
Sec. 305. NRS 695G.070 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.070 “Provider of health care” [means:
1. A physician or other health care practitioner who is licensed
or otherwise authorized] has the meaning ascribed to it in [this
State to furnish any health care service; and
2. An institution providing health care services or other setting
in which health care services are provided, including, without
limitation, a hospital, surgical center for ambulatory patients, facility
for skilled nursing, residential facility for groups, laboratory and any
other such licensed facility.] NRS 629.031.
Sec. 306. NRS 695G.1702 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1702 1. A health care plan which provides coverage for
prescription drugs must not require an insured to submit to a step
therapy protocol before covering a drug approved by the Food and
Drug Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric
condition of the insured, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in the network plan of the managed care
organization is located 60 miles or more from the residence of the
insured; and
-
*AB74*

– 268 –
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the insured, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
2. Any provision of a health care plan subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after July 1, 2023, which is in conflict with this section is void.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) [“Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care is provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers under contract with the managed care organization.
The term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c)] “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires an
insured to use a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs
other than a drug that a practitioner recommends for treatment of a
psychiatric condition of the insured before his or her health care
plan provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 307. NRS 695G.1703 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1703 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a managed care organization that issues a health care
plan shall include in the plan coverage for medically necessary
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate
management and ongoing monitoring of cancer when such
biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific evidence.
Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A managed care organization shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens.
-
*AB74*

– 269 –
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of cancer; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the managed care organization.
3. If a managed care organization requires an insured to obtain
prior authorization for a biomarker test described in subsection 1,
the managed care organization shall respond to a request for such
prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a managed care
organization to provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience;
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the managed care
organization; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan or renewal
which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
-
*AB74*

– 270 –
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
-
*AB74*

– 271 –
Sec. 308. NRS 695G.1705 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1705 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the managed care organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
2. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization for the services described in NRS
639.28085 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the managed care
organization for any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of
reimbursement provided to a physician for similar services.
3. A managed care organization shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
-
*AB74*

– 272 –
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A managed care organization shall ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 309. NRS 695G.171 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.171 1. A health care plan issued by a managed care
organization must provide coverage for benefits payable for
expenses incurred for:
(a) Deoxyribonucleic acid testing for high-risk strains of human
papillomavirus every 3 years for women 30 years of age and older;
and
(b) Administering the human papillomavirus vaccine as
recommended for vaccination by a competent authority, including,
without limitation, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
Food and Drug Administration or the manufacturer of the vaccine.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
-
*AB74*

– 273 –
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan which
provides coverage for prescription drugs shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in a health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. An evidence of coverage for a health care plan subject to the
provisions of this chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the evidence of coverage or the renewal thereof which is in
conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Human] , “human papillomavirus vaccine” means the
Quadrivalent Human Papillomavirus Recombinant Vaccine or its
successor which is approved by the Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human papillomavirus infection and cervical
cancer.
[(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
-
*AB74*

– 274 –
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 310. NRS 695G.1712 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1712 1. A managed care organization that issues a
health care plan shall provide coverage for screening, genetic
counseling and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for
women under circumstances where such screening, genetic
counseling or testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. A managed care organization shall ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2022, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
[4. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 311. NRS 695G.1713 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1713 1. A health care plan issued by a managed care
organization must provide coverage for benefits payable for
expenses incurred for:
(a) A mammogram to screen for breast cancer annually for
insureds who are 40 years of age or older.
-
*AB74*

– 275 –
(b) An imaging test to screen for breast cancer on an interval
and at the age deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary,
as recommended by the insured’s provider of health care based on
personal or family medical history or additional factors that may
increase the risk of breast cancer for the insured.
(c) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age deemed
most appropriate, when medically necessary, as recommended by
the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate an abnormality
which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from a mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or an imaging test described in paragraph (b); or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan which
provides coverage for prescription drugs shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other
form of cost-sharing or require a longer waiting period or other
condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a managed care organization may use medical management
-
*AB74*

– 276 –
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified health care plan with
respect to the deductible of such a health care plan after the insured
has satisfied the minimum deductible pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223,
except with respect to items or services that constitute preventive
care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the
prohibitions of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall apply regardless
of whether the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 223 has been
satisfied.
7. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified] , “qualified health care plan” means a health
care plan issued by a managed care organization that has a high
deductible and is in compliance with 26 U.S.C. § 223 for the
purposes of establishing a health savings account.
Sec. 312. NRS 695G.1714 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1714 1. A managed care organization that issues a
health care plan shall provide coverage for the examination of a
person who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
-
*AB74*

– 277 –
that participates in the network plan of the managed care
organization; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after July 1,
2021, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts with the
provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical] , “medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 652.060.
[(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 313. NRS 695G.1715 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1715 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8,
a managed care organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration;
(3) Listed in subsection 11; and
(4) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Listed in subsection 11;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispenses by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion of a device for contraception or removal of such a
device if the device was inserted while the insured was covered by
the same health care plan;
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraception and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; and
(g) Voluntary sterilization for women.
-
*AB74*

– 278 –
2. A managed care organization shall provide coverage for any
services listed in subsection 1 which are within the authorized scope
of practice of a pharmacist when such services are provided by a
pharmacist who is employed by or serves as an independent
contractor of an in-network pharmacy and in accordance with the
applicable provider network contract. Such coverage must be
provided to the same extent as if the services were provided by
another provider of health care, as applicable to the services being
provided. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services listed in subsection 1 and provided by
such a pharmacist to a number of occasions less than the coverage
for such services when provided by another provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services listed in subsection 1 and
provided by such a pharmacist to an amount less than the amount
reimbursed for similar services provided by a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse.
3. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
4. If a covered therapeutic equivalent listed in subsection 1 is
not available or a provider of health care deems a covered
therapeutic equivalent to be medically inappropriate, an alternate
therapeutic equivalent prescribed by a provider of health care must
be covered by the managed care organization.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 9, 10 and 12, a
managed care organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit included in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefits;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefits;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefits to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefits to an insured; or
-
*AB74*

– 279 –
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefits.
6. Coverage pursuant to this section for the covered dependent
of an insured must be the same as for the insured.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a health care
plan subject to the provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued
for delivery or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, has the legal
effect of including the coverage required by this section, and any
provision of the plan or the renewal which is in conflict with this
section is void.
8. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan and which is affiliated with a religious organization is not
required to provide the coverage required by subsection 1 if the
managed care organization objects on religious grounds. Such an
organization shall, before the issuance of a health care plan and
before the renewal of such a plan, provide to the prospective insured
written notice of the coverage that the managed care organization
refuses to provide pursuant to this subsection.
9. A managed care organization may require an insured to pay
a higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for
contraception if the insured refuses to accept a therapeutic
equivalent of the drug.
10. For each of the 18 methods of contraception listed in
subsection 11 that have been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration, a health care plan must include at least one drug or
device for contraception within each method for which no
deductible, copayment or coinsurance may be charged to the
insured, but the managed care organization may charge a deductible,
copayment or coinsurance for any other drug or device that provides
the same method of contraception. If the managed care organization
charges a copayment or coinsurance for a drug for contraception, the
managed care organization may only require an enrollee to pay the
copayment or coinsurance:
(a) Once for the entire amount of the drug dispensed for the plan
year; or
(b) Once for each 1-month supply of the drug dispensed.
11. The following 18 methods of contraception must be
covered pursuant to this section:
(a) Voluntary sterilization for women;
(b) Surgical sterilization implants for women;
(c) Implantable rods;
(d) Copper-based intrauterine devices;
(e) Progesterone-based intrauterine devices;
(f) Injections;
(g) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs;
-
*AB74*

– 280 –
(h) Progestin-based drugs;
(i) Extended- or continuous-regimen drugs;
(j) Estrogen- and progestin-based patches;
(k) Vaginal contraceptive rings;
(l) Diaphragms with spermicide;
(m) Sponges with spermicide;
(n) Cervical caps with spermicide;
(o) Female condoms;
(p) Spermicide;
(q) Combined estrogen- and progestin-based drugs for
emergency contraception or progestin-based drugs for emergency
contraception; and
(r) Ulipristal acetate for emergency contraception.
12. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
13. A managed care organization shall not:
(a) Use medical management techniques to require an insured to
use a method of contraception other than the method prescribed or
ordered by a provider of health care;
(b) Require an insured to obtain prior authorization for the
benefits described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection 1; or
(c) Refuse to cover a contraceptive injection or the insertion of a
device described in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of subsection 11 at a
hospital immediately after an insured gives birth.
14. A managed care organization must provide an accessible,
transparent and expedited process which is not unduly burdensome
by which an insured, or the authorized representative of the insured,
may request an exception relating to any medical management
technique used by the managed care organization to obtain any
benefit required by this section without a higher deductible,
copayment or coinsurance.
15. As used in this section:
(a) “In-network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that has entered
into a contract with a managed care organization to provide services
to insureds through a network plan offered or issued by the managed
care organization.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
-
*AB74*

– 281 –
(c) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(d)] “Provider network contract” [means] includes a contract
between a managed care organization and a [provider of health care
or] pharmacy specifying the rights and responsibilities of the
managed care organization and the [provider of health care or]
pharmacy [, as applicable,] for delivery of health care services
pursuant to a network plan.
[(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(f) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.]
Sec. 314. NRS 695G.1717 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1717 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
-
*AB74*

– 282 –
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
(j) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
-
*AB74*

– 283 –
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
[6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 315. NRS 695G.1718 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1718 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
managed care organization that issues a health care plan shall
include in the health care plan coverage for the medically necessary
treatment of conditions relating to gender dysphoria and gender
incongruence. Such coverage must include coverage of medically
necessary psychosocial and surgical intervention and any other
medically necessary treatment for such disorders provided by:
(a) Endocrinologists;
(b) Pediatric endocrinologists;
(c) Social workers;
(d) Psychiatrists;
(e) Psychologists;
(f) Gynecologists;
(g) Speech-language pathologists;
(h) Primary care physicians;
(i) Advanced practice registered nurses;
(j) Physician assistants; and
-
*AB74*

– 284 –
(k) Any other providers of medically necessary services for the
treatment of gender dysphoria or gender incongruence.
2. This section does not require a health care plan to include
coverage for cosmetic surgery performed by a plastic surgeon or
reconstructive surgeon that is not medically necessary.
3. A managed care organization that issues a health care plan
shall not categorically refuse to cover medically necessary gender-
affirming treatments or procedures or revisions to prior treatments if
the plan provides coverage for any such services, procedures or
revisions for purposes other than gender transition or affirmation.
4. A managed care organization that issues a health care plan
may prescribe requirements that must be satisfied before the
managed care organization covers surgical treatment of conditions
relating to gender dysphoria or gender incongruence for an insured
who is less than 18 years of age. Such requirements may include,
without limitation, requirements that:
(a) The treatment must be recommended by a psychologist,
psychiatrist or other mental health professional;
(b) The treatment must be recommended by a physician;
(c) The insured must provide a written expression of the desire
of the insured to undergo the treatment;
(d) A written plan for treatment that covers at least 1 year must
be developed and approved by at least two providers of health care;
and
(e) Parental consent is provided for the insured unless the
insured is expressly authorized by law to consent on his or her own
behalf.
5. When determining whether treatment is medically necessary
for the purposes of this section, a managed care organization must
consider the most recent Standards of Care prescribed by the World
Professional Association for Transgender Health, or its successor
organization.
6. A managed care organization shall make a reasonable effort
to ensure that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made
available to an insured through a provider of health care who
participates in the network plan of the managed care organization.
If, after a reasonable effort, the managed care organization is unable
to make such benefits available through such a provider of health
care, the managed care organization may treat the treatment that the
managed care organization is unable to make available through such
a provider of health care in the same manner as other services
provided by a provider of health care who does not participate in the
network plan of the managed care organization.
7. If an insured appeals the denial of a claim or coverage under
this section on the grounds that the treatment requested by the
-
*AB74*

– 285 –
insured is not medically necessary, the managed care organization
must consult with a provider of health care who has experience in
prescribing or delivering gender-affirming treatment concerning the
medical necessity of the treatment requested by the insured when
considering the appeal.
8. Evidence of coverage subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
July 1, 2023, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or renewal which is
in conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Cosmetic surgery”:
(1) Means a surgical procedure that:
(I) Does not meaningfully promote the proper function of
the body;
(II) Does not prevent or treat illness or disease; and
(III) Is primarily directed at improving the appearance of
a person.
(2) Includes, without limitation, cosmetic surgery directed at
preserving beauty.
(b) “Gender dysphoria” means distress or impairment in social,
occupational or other areas of functioning caused by a marked
difference between the gender identity or expression of a person and
the sex assigned to the person at birth which lasts at least 6 months
and is shown by at least two of the following:
(1) A marked difference between gender identity or
expression and primary or secondary sex characteristics or
anticipated secondary sex characteristics in young adolescents.
(2) A strong desire to be rid of primary or secondary sex
characteristics because of a marked difference between such sex
characteristics and gender identity or expression or a desire to
prevent the development of anticipated secondary sex characteristics
in young adolescents.
(3) A strong desire for the primary or secondary sex
characteristics of the gender opposite from the sex assigned at birth.
(4) A strong desire to be of the opposite gender or a gender
different from the sex assigned at birth.
(5) A strong desire to be treated as the opposite gender or a
gender different from the sex assigned at birth.
(6) A strong conviction of experiencing typical feelings and
reactions of the opposite gender or a gender different from the sex
assigned at birth.
(c) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
-
*AB74*

– 286 –
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate with regard to type, frequency,
extent, location and duration;
(3) Not provided primarily for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of a
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient; and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
 A provider of health care prescribing, ordering, recommending or
approving a health care service or product does not, by itself, make
that health care service or product medically necessary.
[(d) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 316. NRS 695G.1719 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1719 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder, including, without limitation, lofexidine.
(b) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder, including, without limitation, buprenorphine,
methadone and naltrexone.
(c) The services described in NRS 639.28079 when provided by
a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization. The Commissioner shall adopt
regulations governing the provision of reimbursement for such
services.
(d) Any service for the treatment of substance use disorder
provided by a provider of primary care if the service is covered
when provided by a specialist and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
-
*AB74*

– 287 –
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy that participates
in the network plan of the managed care organization for the
services described in NRS 639.28079 at a rate equal to the rate of
reimbursement provided to a physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
3. A managed care organization shall provide the coverage
required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1 regardless of
whether the drug is included in the formulary of the managed care
organization.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a managed
care organization shall not subject the benefits required by
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1 to medical management
techniques, other than step therapy. A managed care organization
may subject the benefits required by paragraphs (b) and (c) of
subsection 1 to other reasonable medical management techniques
when the benefits are provided by a pharmacist in accordance with
NRS 639.28079.
5. A managed care organization shall not:
(a) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 1; or
(b) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service.
6. A managed care organization shall ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
7. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
-
*AB74*

– 288 –
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Primary] , “primary care” means the practice of family
medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology
and midwifery.
[(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.]
Sec. 317. NRS 695G.174 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.174 1. A managed care organization that issues a
health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Necessary case management services for an insured
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants; and
(b) Medically necessary care for an insured who has been
diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its variants.
2. A managed care organization that issues a health care plan
which provides coverage for prescription drugs shall include in the
plan coverage for medically necessary prescription drugs to treat
sickle cell disease and its variants.
3. A managed care organization shall establish a plan for each
insured under 18 years of age who has been diagnosed with sickle
cell disease and its variants to transition the insured from pediatric
care to adult care when the insured reaches 18 years of age.
4. A managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Case management services” means medical or other health
care management services to assist patients and providers of health
care, including, without limitation, identifying and facilitating
additional resources and treatments, providing information about
treatment options and facilitating communication between providers
of services to a patient.
(b) [“Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services. The
term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy, prior
authorization or categorizing drugs and devices based on cost, type
or method of administration.
(c)] “Sickle cell disease and its variants” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.4927.
-
*AB74*

– 289 –
Sec. 318. NRS 695H.140 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695H.140 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the Commissioner may conduct examinations to enforce the
provisions of this chapter pursuant to the provisions of [NRS
679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act at
such times as the Commissioner deems necessary. For the purposes
of this chapter, the Commissioner is not required to comply with the
requirement in [NRS 679B.230] section 16 of this act that insurers
be examined not less frequently than every 5 years.
2. A person who is responsible for conducting the business
activities of a medical discount plan shall, upon the request of the
Commissioner, make available to the Commissioner for inspection
any accounts, books and records concerning the medical discount
plan which are reasonably necessary to enable the Commissioner to
determine whether the medical discount plan is in compliance with
the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 319. NRS 696A.170 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696A.170 1. Every motor club shall be subject to
examination by the Commissioner in the manner and under the
conditions provided for examination of insurers contained in [NRS
679B.230 to 679B.290,] sections 2 to 41, inclusive [.] , of this act.
2. The expense of such examination shall be paid by the motor
club.
Sec. 320. NRS 696A.360 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696A.360 Motor clubs are also subject, in the same manner as
insurers, to the following provisions of this Code to the extent
reasonably applicable:
1. Chapter 679A of NRS (scope and definitions);
2. Chapter 679B of NRS (Commissioner of Insurance);
3. NRS 683A.400 (fiduciary funds);
4. Chapter 685B of NRS (unauthorized insurers);
5. NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive , and
sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act (trade practices and frauds);
[and]
6. Chapter 696B of NRS (delinquent insurers) [.] ; and
7. Sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act (examinations).
Sec. 321. NRS 696B.100 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696B.100 “Impairment” exists as to:
1. A stock insurer when [the] :
(a) The insurer’s admitted assets do not at least equal the sum of
its liabilities, including also its paid-in capital stock account and the
-
*AB74*

– 290 –
minimum surplus required to be maintained under this Code for
authority to transact the kinds of insurance transacted [.] ; or
(b) The insurer has a total adjusted capital that is less than its
authorized control level of risk-based capital required pursuant to
NRS 681B.550 and any regulations adopted by the Commissioner
pursuant to that section.
2. A mutual insurer when [the] :
(a) The insurer’s admitted assets do not at least equal the sum of
the insurer’s liabilities and the minimum surplus required under this
Code to be maintained for authority to transact the kinds of
insurance transacted [.] ; or
(b) The insurer has a total adjusted capital that is less than its
authorized control level of risk-based capital required pursuant to
NRS 681B.550 and any regulations adopted by the Commissioner
pursuant to that section.
Sec. 322. NRS 696B.110 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696B.110 “Insolvency” exists:
1. When the insurer fails to meet its obligations as they mature;
2. When [a stock] an insurer’s admitted assets are less than the
sum of its liabilities ; [and its paid-in capital stock account;]
3. When [a mutual] an insurer’s [assets are] total adjusted
capital is less than [the sum of] its [liabilities] mandatory control
level of risk-based capital required pursuant to NRS 681B.550 and
any regulations adopted by the [minimum basic surplus required]
Commissioner pursuant to [be maintained by the insurer under this
Code for authority to transact the kinds of insurance transacted;]
that section; or
4. As otherwise expressly provided in this Code.
Sec. 323. NRS 696C.110 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696C.110 1. During the period an insurer is under
administrative supervision pursuant to NRS 696C.100, the
Commissioner or an appointee [designated by] of the Commissioner
shall serve as the administrative supervisor of the insurer. A person
appointed by the Commissioner pursuant to this subsection is not
required to be an employee of the Division.
2. The Commissioner may identify any one or more actions
specified in subsection 3 as actions which the insurer shall not take
during the period the insurer remains under administrative
supervision pursuant to NRS 696C.100 unless the insurer obtains
approval in advance from the administrative supervisor [designated]
appointed pursuant to subsection 1.
-
*AB74*

– 291 –
3. If identified by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 2,
the insurer shall not, without obtaining approval in advance from the
administrative supervisor:
(a) Dispose of, convey or encumber any of its assets or its
business in force;
(b) Withdraw money from any of its bank accounts;
(c) Lend any of its money;
(d) Invest any of its money;
(e) Transfer any of its property;
(f) Incur any debt, obligation or liability;
(g) Merge or consolidate with another insurer or any other
business entity as defined in NRS 682A.025;
(h) Approve new premiums or renew any policies;
(i) Enter into any new reinsurance contract or treaty;
(j) Terminate, surrender, forfeit, convert or lapse any insurance
policy, certificate or contract, except for nonpayment of premiums
due;
(k) Release, pay or refund premium deposits, accrued cash or
loan values, unearned premiums or other reserves on any insurance
policy, certificate or contract;
(l) Make any material change in management; or
(m) Increase any salary or benefit of an officer or director,
increase the preferential payment of a bonus or dividend or increase
any other payment deemed by the Commissioner to be preferential.
Sec. 324. NRS 696C.130 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696C.130 1. During the period an insurer is under
administrative supervision pursuant to NRS 696C.100, the insurer
may contest any action taken or proposed to be taken by the
administrative supervisor [designated] appointed pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 696C.110 on the ground that the action would
not result in improving the condition of the insurer. To contest an
action taken or proposed to be taken by the administrative
supervisor, the insurer must submit a request for reconsideration to
the administrative supervisor. If the administrative supervisor, upon
reconsideration, denies the insurer’s request, the insurer may request
a review of the decision of the administrative supervisor pursuant to
NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive.
2. Any action taken by the Commissioner pursuant to this
chapter is subject to:
(a) Review pursuant to NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive,
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Judicial review pursuant to chapter 233B of NRS.
-
*AB74*

– 292 –
Sec. 325. NRS 696C.150 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696C.150 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at the
time of any proceeding or during the pendency of any proceeding
held pursuant to this chapter, the Commissioner may meet with an
administrative supervisor [designated] appointed by the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 696C.110, and with
the attorney or other representative of the administrative supervisor
[designated] appointed pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 696C.110,
without the presence of any other person:
1. To carry out the duties of the Commissioner under this
chapter; or
2. To allow the administrative supervisor to carry out his or her
duties under this chapter.
Sec. 326. NRS 696C.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696C.160 The Commissioner may:
1. Adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the purposes
and provisions of this chapter;
2. In addition to an administrative supervisor [designated]
appointed by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
696C.110, employ any other counsels, actuaries, clerks and
assistants as the Commissioner deems necessary for the
administrative supervision of an insurer; and
3. Require an insurer placed under administrative supervision
to pay the compensation and expenses of the administrative
supervisor [designated] appointed by the Commissioner pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 696C.110 and any other counsels, actuaries,
clerks and assistants described in subsection 2.
Sec. 327. NRS 696C.170 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696C.170 There shall be no liability on the part of, and no
cause of action of any nature against, the Commissioner or any
employee or agent of the Commissioner, or an administrative
supervisor [designated] appointed pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
696C.110, for any action taken by them in the performance of their
powers and duties under this chapter.
Sec. 328. NRS 695K.080 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695K.080 “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS [695G.070.] 629.031.
Sec. 329. NRS 697.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
697.360 Licensed bail agents, bail solicitors and bail
enforcement agents, and general agents are also subject to the
-
*AB74*

– 293 –
following provisions of this Code, to the extent reasonably
applicable:
1. Chapter 679A of NRS.
2. Chapter 679B of NRS.
3. NRS 683A.261.
4. NRS 683A.301.
5. NRS 683A.311.
6. NRS 683A.331.
7. NRS 683A.341.
8. NRS 683A.361.
9. NRS 683A.400.
10. NRS 683A.451.
11. NRS 683A.461.
12. NRS 683A.500.
13. NRS 683A.520.
14. NRS 686A.010 to [686A.310,] 686A.325, inclusive [.] ,
and sections 80 to 93, inclusive, of this act.
15. Sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 330. NRS 7.107 is hereby amended to read as follows:
7.107 1. An attorney licensed in this State who performs the
functions of a real estate broker in a real estate transaction shall
comply with the standards of business ethics that apply to a real
estate broker pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS, including, without
limitation, such standards set forth in NRS 645.635 . [and 645.645.]
2. An attorney who performs the functions of a real estate
broker and who does not comply with the standards of business
ethics that apply to a real estate broker as required pursuant to
subsection 1 may be disciplined by the State Bar of Nevada pursuant
to the rules of the Supreme Court.
3. The provisions of this section do not require an attorney who
performs the functions of a real estate broker in a real estate
transaction to obtain a license to practice as a real estate broker
pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS.
Sec. 331. NRS 40.607 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.607 “Builder’s warranty” means a warranty issued or
purchased by or on behalf of a contractor for the protection of a
claimant. The term:
1. Includes a warranty contract issued by or on behalf of a
contractor whose liability pursuant to the warranty contract is
subsequently insured by a risk retention group that operates in
compliance with chapter 695E of NRS and insures all or any part of
the liability of a contractor for the cost to repair a constructional
defect in a residence.
-
*AB74*

– 294 –
2. Does not include [a policy of insurance for home protection
as defined in NRS 690B.100 or] a service contract as defined in
NRS 690C.080.
Sec. 332. NRS 118A.290 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
118A.290 1. The landlord shall at all times during the
tenancy maintain the dwelling unit in a habitable condition. A
dwelling unit is not habitable if it violates provisions of housing or
health codes concerning the health, safety, sanitation or fitness for
habitation of the dwelling unit or if it substantially lacks:
(a) Effective waterproofing and weather protection of the roof
and exterior walls, including windows and doors.
(b) Plumbing facilities which conformed to applicable law when
installed and which are maintained in good working order.
(c) A water supply approved under applicable law, which is:
(1) Under the control of the tenant or landlord and is capable
of producing hot and cold running water;
(2) Furnished to appropriate fixtures; and
(3) Connected to a sewage disposal system approved under
applicable law and maintained in good working order to the extent
that the system can be controlled by the landlord.
(d) Adequate heating facilities which conformed to applicable
law when installed and are maintained in good working order.
(e) Electrical lighting, outlets, wiring and electrical equipment
which conformed to applicable law when installed and are
maintained in good working order.
(f) An adequate number of appropriate receptacles for garbage
and rubbish in clean condition and good repair at the
commencement of the tenancy. The landlord shall arrange for the
removal of garbage and rubbish from the premises unless the parties
by written agreement provide otherwise.
(g) Building, grounds, appurtenances and all other areas under
the landlord’s control at the time of the commencement of the
tenancy in every part clean, sanitary and reasonably free from all
accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents, insects and
vermin.
(h) Floors, walls, ceilings, stairways and railings maintained in
good repair.
(i) Ventilating, air-conditioning and other facilities and
appliances, including elevators, maintained in good repair if
supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord.
2. The landlord and tenant may agree that the tenant is to
perform specified repairs, maintenance tasks and minor remodeling
only if:
-
*AB74*

– 295 –
(a) The agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith;
and
(b) The agreement does not diminish the obligations of the
landlord to other tenants in the premises.
3. An agreement pursuant to subsection 2 is not entered into in
good faith if the landlord has a duty under subsection 1 to perform
the specified repairs, maintenance tasks or minor remodeling and
the tenant enters into the agreement because the landlord or his or
her agent has refused to perform them.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the landlord
shall not require a tenant to pay any fee or other charge for the
performance of any repairs, maintenance tasks or other work for
which the landlord has a duty under subsection 1 to perform,
including, without limitation, any fee or other charge to cover the
costs of any deductible or copayment under a [policy of insurance
for home protection or] service contract for the performance of any
such repairs, maintenance tasks or other work.
5. The landlord may require a tenant to pay any fee or other
charge for the performance of any repairs, maintenance tasks or
other work necessary for a condition caused by the tenant’s own
deliberate or negligent act or omission or that of a member of his or
her household or other person on the premises with his or her
consent.
6. As used in this section [:
(a) “Insurance for home protection” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 690B.100.
(b) “Service] , “service contract” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 690C.080.
Sec. 333. NRS 233B.039 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
233B.039 1. The following agencies are entirely exempted
from the requirements of this chapter:
(a) The Governor.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
209.221 and 209.2473, the Department of Corrections.
(c) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) The Office of the Military.
(e) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 368A.140 and 463.765,
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.620, the Division
of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
-
*AB74*

– 296 –
(h) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.390, the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 533.365, the Office of
the State Engineer.
(j) The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry acting to enforce the provisions of
NRS 618.375.
(k) The Administrator of the Division of Industrial Relations of
the Department of Business and Industry in establishing and
adjusting the schedule of fees and charges for accident benefits
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 616C.260.
(l) The Board to Review Claims in adopting resolutions to carry
out its duties pursuant to NRS 445C.310.
(m) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
391.323, the Department of Education, the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education are subject to the provisions of this chapter
for the purpose of adopting regulations but not with respect to any
contested case.
3. The special provisions of:
(a) Chapter 612 of NRS for the adoption of an emergency
regulation or the distribution of regulations by and the judicial
review of decisions of the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(b) Chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for the
determination of contested claims;
(c) Chapter 91 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of the
Administrator of the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
(d) NRS 90.800 for the use of summary orders in contested
cases,
 prevail over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The provisions of NRS 233B.122, 233B.124, 233B.125 and
233B.126 do not apply to the Department of Health and Human
Services in the adjudication of contested cases involving the
issuance of letters of approval for health facilities and agencies.
5. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any order for immediate action, including, but not limited
to, quarantine and the treatment or cleansing of infected or infested
animals, objects or premises, made under the authority of the State
Board of Agriculture, the State Board of Health, or any other agency
of this State in the discharge of a responsibility for the preservation
of human or animal health or for insect or pest control;
-
*AB74*

– 297 –
(b) An extraordinary regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy
adopted pursuant to NRS 453.2184;
(c) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to NRS 388.255 or 394.1694;
(d) The judicial review of decisions of the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada;
(e) The adoption, amendment or repeal of policies by the
Rehabilitation Division of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation pursuant to NRS 426.561 or 615.178;
(f) The adoption or amendment of a rule or regulation to be
included in the State Plan for Services for Victims of Crime by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 217.130;
(g) The adoption, amendment or repeal of rules governing the
conduct of contests and exhibitions of unarmed combat by the
Nevada Athletic Commission pursuant to NRS 467.075;
(h) The adoption, amendment or repeal of standards of content
and performance for courses of study in public schools by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools and the
State Board of Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(i) The adoption, amendment or repeal of the statewide plan to
allocate money from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created by
NRS 433.732 established by the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734;
[or]
(j) The adoption or amendment of a data request by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 687B.404 [.] ; or
(k) An order issued by the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 42 of this act.
6. The State Board of Parole Commissioners is subject to the
provisions of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations but
not with respect to any contested case.
7. The Department of Corrections is subject to the provisions
of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations relating to
fiscal policy, correspondence with inmates and visitation with
inmates of the Department of Corrections.
Sec. 334. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
-
*AB74*

– 298 –
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
-
*AB74*

– 299 –
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
[679B.285,] 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, sections 26, 36, 37 and 220 of this act, sections 35, 38 and
41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law
to be confidential, all public books and public records of a
governmental entity must be open at all times during office hours to
inspection by any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or
memorandum may be prepared from those public books and public
records. Any such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to
-
*AB74*

– 300 –
supply the general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the
records or may be used in any other way to the advantage of the
governmental entity or of the general public. This section does not
supersede or in any manner affect the federal laws governing
copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in any other manner the
rights of a person in any written book or record which is
copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 335. NRS 289.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.470 “Category II peace officer” means:
-
*AB74*

– 301 –
1. The bailiffs of the district courts, justice courts and
municipal courts whose duties require them to carry weapons and
make arrests;
2. Subject to the provisions of NRS 258.070, constables and
their deputies;
3. Inspectors employed by the Nevada Transportation
Authority who exercise those powers of enforcement conferred by
chapters 706 and 712 of NRS;
4. Special investigators who are employed full-time by the
office of any district attorney or the Attorney General;
5. Investigators of arson for fire departments who are specially
designated by the appointing authority;
6. Investigators for the State Forester Firewarden who are
specially designated by the State Forester Firewarden and whose
primary duties are related to the investigation of arson;
7. Agents of the Nevada Gaming Control Board who exercise
the powers of enforcement specified in NRS 289.360, 463.140 or
463.1405, except those agents whose duties relate primarily to
auditing, accounting, the collection of taxes or license fees, or the
investigation of applicants for licenses;
8. Investigators and administrators of the Division of
Compliance Enforcement of the Department of Motor Vehicles who
perform the duties specified in subsection 2 of NRS 481.048;
9. Officers and investigators of the Section for the Control of
Emissions From Vehicles and the Enforcement of Matters Related
to the Use of Special Fuel of the Department of Motor Vehicles who
perform the duties specified in subsection 3 of NRS 481.0481;
10. Legislative police officers of the State of Nevada;
11. Parole counselors of the Division of Child and Family
Services of the Department of Health and Human Services;
12. Criminal investigators who are employed by the Division
of Child and Family Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services;
13. Juvenile probation officers and deputy juvenile probation
officers employed by the various judicial districts in the State of
Nevada or by a department of juvenile justice services established
by ordinance pursuant to NRS 62G.210 whose official duties require
them to enforce court orders on juvenile offenders and make arrests;
14. Field investigators of the Taxicab Authority;
15. Security officers employed full-time by a city or county
whose official duties require them to carry weapons and make
arrests;
16. The chief of a department of alternative sentencing created
pursuant to NRS 211A.080 and the assistant alternative sentencing
officers employed by that department;
-
*AB74*

– 302 –
17. Agents of the Cannabis Compliance Board who exercise
the powers of enforcement specified in NRS 289.355;
18. Criminal investigators who are employed by the Secretary
of State; [and]
19. The Inspector General of the Department of Corrections
and any person employed by the Department as a criminal
investigator [.] ; and
20. Investigators and administrators of the Division of
Insurance of the Department of Business and Industry who
perform the duties specified in NRS 679B.600 to 679B.700,
inclusive.
Sec. 336. NRS 315.725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.725 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, any
two or more affordable housing entities may establish and
participate in a program to jointly self-insure and jointly purchase
insurance or reinsurance for coverage under a plan of:
(a) Casualty insurance, as that term is defined in NRS
681A.020, except for workers’ compensation and employer’s
liability coverage;
(b) Marine and transportation insurance, as that term is defined
in NRS 681A.050;
(c) Property insurance, as that term is defined in NRS 681A.060;
(d) Surety insurance, as that term is defined in NRS 681A.070;
or
(e) Insurance for any combination of the kinds of insurance
listed in paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive.
2. A program established pursuant to subsection 1 must be
administered by an entity which is organized as a nonprofit
corporation, limited-liability company, partnership or trust, whether
organized under the laws of this State or another state or operating
in another state. A majority of the board of directors or other
governing body of the entity administering the program must be
affiliated with one or more of the affordable housing entities
participating in the program.
3. This section does not apply to an affordable housing entity
that individually self-insures or participates in a risk pooling
arrangement, including a risk retention group or a risk purchasing
group, with respect to the kinds of insurance set forth in
subsection 1.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section or by specific
statute:
(a) A program established pursuant to subsection 1 and the
entity administering the program:
(1) Shall be deemed not to be providing coverage which
constitutes insurance; and
-
*AB74*

– 303 –
(2) Are not subject to the provisions of title 57 of NRS; and
(b) The entity administering a program established pursuant to
subsection 1 shall be deemed not to be engaging in the transaction
of insurance.
5. The entity administering a program established pursuant to
subsection 1 shall provide any affordable housing entity that seeks
to participate in the program with a written notice, in 10-point type
or larger, before the affordable housing entity begins participating in
the program, that the program is not regulated by the Commissioner
and that, if the program or the entity administering the program is
found insolvent, a claim under the program is not covered by the
Nevada Insurance Guaranty Association Act.
6. The entity administering a program established pursuant to
subsection 1 shall submit to the Commissioner:
(a) Within 105 days after the end of the program’s fiscal year:
(1) An annual financial statement for the program audited by
a certified public accountant; and
(2) An annual actuarial analysis for the program prepared by
an actuary who meets the qualification standards for issuing
statements of actuarial opinion in the United States established by
the American Academy of Actuaries or its successor organization;
and
(b) Within 30 days after:
(1) Filing with any other regulatory body, a claims audit
report relating to the entity or the program, a copy of the claims
audit report filed with the other regulatory body;
(2) Issuance by any other regulatory body of a report of
examination relating to the entity or the program, a copy of the
report of examination issued by the other regulatory body;
(3) The effective date of a plan of financing, management
and operation for the entity or the program or any material change in
such a plan, a copy of the plan or material change; and
(4) The effective date of any material change in the scope of
regulation of the entity or the program by any other state in which
the entity operates, a statement of the material change.
7. The Commissioner may order an examination of a program
established pursuant to subsection 1 or the entity administering the
program based upon any credible evidence that the program or
entity is in violation of this section or is operating or being operated
while in an unsafe financial condition. Such an examination must be
administered in accordance with [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,]
sections 2 to 41, inclusive, of this act and any regulations adopted
pursuant thereto.
8. If the Commissioner determines that a program established
pursuant to subsection 1 or the entity administering the program is
-
*AB74*

– 304 –
in violation of this section or is operating or being operated while in
an unsafe financial condition, the Commissioner may issue and
serve upon the entity administering the program an order to cease
and desist from the violation or from administering or in any way
operating the program.
9. The Commissioner may hold a hearing, without a request by
any party, to determine whether a program established pursuant to
subsection 1 or the entity administering the program is in violation
of this section or is operating or being operated while in an unsafe
financial condition. A person aggrieved by any act or failure of the
Commissioner to act, or by any report, rule, regulation or order of
the Commissioner relating to this section, may request a hearing.
Any hearing held pursuant to this subsection must be held in
accordance with NRS 679B.310 to 679B.370, inclusive, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
10. The provisions of this section must be liberally construed
to grant affordable housing entities maximum flexibility to jointly
self-insure and jointly purchase insurance or reinsurance to the
extent that a program established pursuant to subsection 1 is being
administered and otherwise operated in a safe financial condition
and in a sound manner.
11. Each entity administering a program established pursuant
to subsection 1 shall, on or before January 15 of each odd-numbered
year, submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature. The report must include,
without limitation, a list of the affordable housing entities
participating in the program and any other information the Director
deems relevant.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” means housing projects in which some
of the dwelling units may be purchased or rented, with or without
government assistance, on a basis that is affordable to persons of
low income.
(b) “Affordable housing entity” means:
(1) A housing authority created under the laws of this State
or another jurisdiction and any agency or instrumentality of a
housing authority, including, but not limited to, a legal entity created
to enter into an agreement which complies with NRS 277.055;
(2) A nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this
State or another state that is engaged in providing affordable
housing; or
(3) A general or limited partnership or limited-liability
company which is engaged in providing affordable housing and
which is affiliated with a housing authority described in
-
*AB74*

– 305 –
subparagraph (1) or a nonprofit corporation described in
subparagraph (2) if the housing authority or nonprofit corporation:
(I) Has, or has the right to acquire, a financial or
ownership interest in the partnership or limited-liability company;
(II) Has the power to direct the management or policies of
the partnership or limited-liability company; or
(III) Has entered into a contract to lease, manage or
operate the affordable housing owned by the partnership or limited-
liability company.
(c) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Insurance.
Sec. 337. NRS 439B.727 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439B.727 “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS [695G.070.] 629.031.
Sec. 338. NRS 439B.736 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439B.736 1. “Third party” includes, without limitation:
(a) The issuer of a health benefit plan, as defined in NRS
[695G.019,] 687B.470, which provides coverage for medically
necessary emergency services;
(b) The Public Employees’ Benefits Program established
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 287.043; and
(c) Any other entity or organization that elects pursuant to NRS
439B.757 for the provisions of NRS 439B.700 to 439B.760,
inclusive, to apply to the provision of medically necessary
emergency services by out-of-network providers to covered persons.
2. The term does not include the State Plan for Medicaid, the
Children’s Health Insurance Program or a health maintenance
organization, as defined in NRS 695C.030, or managed care
organization, as defined in NRS 695G.050, when providing health
care services through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under
the State Plan for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s
Health Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department.
Sec. 339. Chapter 452 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Administrator may adopt such regulations as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this section
and NRS 452.640 to 452.740, inclusive, which relate to
endowment care.
Sec. 340. NRS 452.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
452.180 1. It is unlawful for a cemetery authority, its
officers, employees or agents, or a seller or agent certified or
licensed pursuant to NRS 689.450 to 689.595, inclusive, to
represent that an endowment care fund or any other fund set up for
-
*AB74*

– 306 –
maintaining care is perpetual or permanent, or to sell, offer for sale
or advertise any plot under representation that the plot is under
endowment care, before an endowment care fund has been
established for the cemetery in which the plot is situated. Any
person violating any of the provisions of NRS 452.050 to 452.180,
inclusive, is personally liable for all damages resulting to any person
by reason of such violation, and upon conviction thereof is guilty of
a misdemeanor.
2. The Administrator, for the purpose of ascertaining the assets,
conditions and affairs of any endowment care cemetery, may
examine the books, records, documents and assets of any
endowment care cemetery operating, or being organized to operate
as such a cemetery, in the State of Nevada, and may make whatever
other investigations as may be necessary to determine that the
cemetery is complying fully with the provisions of NRS 452.050 to
452.180, inclusive.
3. If, after an examination or investigation, the Administrator
has just cause to believe that a cemetery granted a permit under the
provisions of NRS 452.050 to 452.180, inclusive, has failed to
comply with the provisions and requirements of NRS 452.050 to
452.180, inclusive, and any regulations adopted thereunder, the
Administrator may, after due notice and hearing, if the
Administrator finds that the cemetery authority has violated those
requirements or regulations, revoke or refuse to renew the permit of
that cemetery authority and refer the violation to the Attorney
General to determine if further action should be taken under
subsection 1.
4. The provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2
to 41, inclusive, of this act apply to any examination conducted
under this section. Unless the context requires that a provision apply
only to insurers, any reference in those sections to “insurer” must be
replaced by a reference to “cemetery authority” or the person being
examined.
Sec. 341. NRS 452.640 is hereby amended to read as follows:
452.640 As used in NRS 452.640 to 452.740, inclusive, and
section 339 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Administrator” means the Commissioner of Insurance.
2. “Cemetery authority” means a person who owns or controls
any real property dedicated for use as a cemetery for pets pursuant
to NRS 452.655, and who operates a cemetery for pets on that
property.
Sec. 342. NRS 452.735 is hereby amended to read as follows:
452.735 1. It is unlawful for a cemetery authority, its
officers, employees or agents, or a seller or agent certified or
licensed pursuant to NRS 689.450 to 689.595, inclusive, to:
-
*AB74*

– 307 –
(a) Represent that a trust fund for the endowment care of the
cemetery is perpetual or permanent; or
(b) Sell, offer for sale or advertise any plot under representation
that the plot is under endowment care,
 before a trust fund for the endowment care of the cemetery has
been established for the cemetery in which the plot is situated.
2. The Administrator, for the purpose of ascertaining the assets,
conditions and affairs of a cemetery for pets, may examine the
books, records, documents and assets of a cemetery for pets
operating, or being organized to operate as such a cemetery, in this
state and may make any other investigations as may be necessary to
determine that the cemetery is complying fully with the provisions
of NRS 452.705 to 452.740, inclusive.
3. The provisions of [NRS 679B.230 to 679B.300,] sections 2
to 41, inclusive, of this act apply to any examination conducted
under this section. Unless the context requires that a provision apply
only to insurers, any reference in those sections to “insurer” must be
replaced by a reference to “cemetery authority” or the person being
examined.
Sec. 343. NRS 616B.027 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616B.027 1. Every insurer shall:
(a) Provide an office in this State operated by the insurer or its
third-party administrator in which:
(1) A complete file, or a reproduction of the complete file, of
each claim is accessible, in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 616B.021;
(2) Persons authorized to act for the insurer and, if necessary,
licensed pursuant to chapter 683A of NRS, may receive information
related to a claim and provide the services to an employer and his or
her employees required by chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS;
and
(3) An employee or his or her employer, upon request, is
provided with information related to a claim filed by the employee
or a copy or other reproduction of the information from the file for
that claim, in accordance with the provisions of NRS 616B.021.
(b) Provide statewide toll-free telephone service to the office
maintained pursuant to paragraph (a).
2. Each private carrier shall provide:
(a) Adequate services to its insured employers in controlling
losses; and
(b) Adequate information on the prevention of industrial
accidents and occupational diseases.
3. An employee of a private carrier who is licensed as [a
company] an adjuster pursuant to chapter 684A of NRS or a person
-
*AB74*

– 308 –
who acts as a third-party administrator pursuant to chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS for a private carrier who
administers a claim arising under chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive,
or chapter 617 of NRS from a location outside of this State pursuant
to subsection 1 of NRS 616B.0275 shall make himself or herself
available to communicate in real time with the claimant or a
representative of the claimant Monday through Friday, 9 a.m. to 5
p.m. local time in this State, excluding any day declared to be a
legal holiday pursuant to NRS 236.015.
Sec. 344. NRS 616B.0275 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616B.0275 1. An employee of a private carrier who is
licensed as [a company] an adjuster pursuant to chapter 684A of
NRS or a person who acts as a third-party administrator pursuant to
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS for a
private carrier may administer claims arising under chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS from a location in or outside
of this State. All records concerning a claim administered pursuant
to this subsection must be maintained at one or more offices located
in this State or by computer in a microphotographic, electronic or
other similar format that produces an accurate reproduction of the
original.
2. An employee of a private carrier who is not licensed as [a
company] an adjuster pursuant to chapter 684A of NRS or a person
who acts as a third-party administrator pursuant to chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS for a self-insured employer
or an association of self-insured public or private employers may
administer claims arising under chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive,
or chapter 617 of NRS only from one or more offices located in this
State. All records concerning a claim administered pursuant to this
subsection must be maintained in those offices.
3. The Commissioner may:
(a) Under exceptional circumstances, waive the requirements of
subsections 1 and 2; and
(b) Adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 345. NRS 616B.303 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616B.303 For the purposes of NRS 616B.306, 616B.309 and
616B.318, an employer is insolvent if [the] :
1. The employer’s assets are less than the employer’s liabilities
[.] ; or
2. The employer fails to pay its outstanding obligations as
they mature in the regular course of its business.
-
*AB74*

– 309 –
Sec. 346. NRS 616B.395 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616B.395 1. The Commissioner may examine the books,
records, accounts and assets of an association of self-insured public
or private employers as the Commissioner deems necessary to carry
out the provisions of NRS 616B.350 to 616B.446, inclusive. The
Commissioner shall so examine each association of self-insured
public or private employers not less frequently than every 5 years.
2. The expense of any examination conducted pursuant to this
section must be paid by the association.
Sec. 347. NRS 616B.422 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616B.422 1. If the assets of an association of self-insured
public or private employers are insufficient to make certain the
prompt payment of all compensation under chapters 616A to 617,
inclusive, of NRS and to maintain the reserves required by NRS
616B.419, as described in subsection 4, the association shall
immediately notify the Commissioner of the deficiency and:
(a) Transfer any surplus acquired from a previous fund year to
the current fund year to make up the deficiency;
(b) Transfer money from its administrative account to its claims
account;
(c) Collect an additional assessment from its members in an
amount required to make up the deficiency; or
(d) Take any other action to make up the deficiency which is
approved by the Commissioner.
 Any action taken to address the deficiency must be
accompanied by a corrective action plan, filed with the
Commissioner and subject to his or her approval, that details how
the action will remedy the deficiency and prevent a deficiency
from reoccurring.
2. If the association wishes to transfer any surplus from one
fund year to another, the association must first notify the
Commissioner of the transfer.
3. The Commissioner shall order the association to make up
any deficiency pursuant to subsection 1 if the association fails to do
so within 30 days after notifying the Commissioner of the
deficiency. The association shall be deemed insolvent if it fails to:
(a) Collect an additional assessment from its members within 30
days after being ordered to do so by the Commissioner; or
(b) Make up the deficiency in any other manner within 60 days
after being ordered to do so by the Commissioner.
4. For the purposes of this section, the assets of an
association are insufficient to maintain the reserves required by
NRS 616B.419 if the assets of the association, excluding any
-
*AB74*

– 310 –
securities posted pursuant to NRS 616B.353, are less than the
required reserves.
Sec. 348. NRS 616B.428 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
616B.428 1. The Commissioner may impose an
administrative fine for each violation of any provision of NRS
616B.350 to 616B.446, inclusive, or any regulation adopted
pursuant thereto. Except as otherwise provided in those sections, the
amount of the fine may not exceed $1,000 for each violation or an
aggregate amount of $10,000.
2. The Commissioner may withdraw the certificate of an
association of self-insured public or private employers if:
(a) The association’s certificate was obtained by fraud;
(b) The application for certification contained a material
misrepresentation;
(c) The association is found to be insolvent;
(d) The association fails to have five or more members;
(e) The association fails to pay the costs of any examination or
any penalty, fee or assessment required by the provisions of chapters
616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS;
(f) The association fails to comply with any of the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 616A, 616C, 616D or 617 of NRS, or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto;
(g) The association fails to comply with any order of the
Commissioner within the time prescribed by the provisions of
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS or in the
order of the Commissioner; [or]
(h) The association or its third-party administrator
misappropriates, converts, illegally withholds or refuses to pay any
money to which a person is entitled and that was entrusted to the
association in its fiduciary capacity [.] ; or
(i) The association fails to notify the Commissioner of a
deficiency pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 616B.422.
3. If the Commissioner withdraws the certification of an
association of self-insured public or private employers, each
employer who is a member of the association remains liable for his
or her obligations incurred before and after the order of withdrawal.
4. Any employer who is a member of an association whose
certification is withdrawn shall, on the effective date of the
withdrawal, qualify as an employer pursuant to NRS 616B.650.
Sec. 349. NRS 631.3458 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
631.3458 1. A person shall not provide dental services
through teledentistry to a patient who is located at an originating site
in this State unless the person:
-
*AB74*

– 311 –
(a) Is licensed to practice dentistry, dental hygiene or dental
therapy in this State; and
(b) Has complied with subsection 2 of NRS 631.220.
2. The provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted
thereto, including, without limitation, clinical requirements, ethical
standards and requirements concerning the confidentiality of
information concerning patients, apply to services provided through
teledentistry to the same extent as if such services were provided in
person or by other means.
3. A licensee who provides dental services through
teledentistry, including, without limitation, providing consultation
and recommendations for treatment, issuing a prescription,
diagnosing, correcting the position of teeth and using orthodontic
appliances, shall provide such services in accordance with the same
standards of care and professional conduct as when providing those
services in person or by other means.
4. A licensee shall not:
(a) Provide treatment for any condition based solely on the
results of an online questionnaire; or
(b) Engage in activity that is outside his or her scope of practice
while providing services through teledentistry.
5. Nothing in this section or NRS 631.34581 to 631.34586,
inclusive, prohibits an organization for dental care or an
administrator of a health benefit plan that provides dental coverage
from negotiating rates of reimbursement for services provided
through teledentistry with a dentist, dental hygienist or dental
therapist.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
[695G.019.] 687B.470.
(b) “Organization for dental care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695D.060.
Sec. 350. Any money remaining on July 1, 2025, in the
Account for the Regulation and Supervision of Captive Insurers
created by NRS 694C.460 remains in the Fund for Insurance
Administration and Enforcement created by NRS 680C.100 and
may be used for any other purpose for which any money in the Fund
may be used.
Sec. 351. 1. Any valid license issued before July 1, 2025,
that a person holds as a company adjuster or a staff adjuster shall be
deemed to be a license as an independent adjuster and remains valid
until its date of expiration.
2. As used in this section:
-
*AB74*

– 312 –
(a) “Company adjuster” and “staff adjuster” have the meanings
ascribed to them in NRS 684A.030, as that section existed on
June 30, 2025.
(b) “Independent adjuster” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 684A.030, as amended by section 67 of this act.
Sec. 352. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 353. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, make such
changes as necessary so that references to a “company adjuster” or
“staff adjuster” are changed to an “independent adjuster.”
Sec. 354. NRS 645.645, 679B.230, 679B.240, 679B.250,
679B.260, 679B.270, 679B.280, 679B.282, 679B.285, 679B.287,
679B.290, 679B.300, 689A.413, 689B.068, 689C.196, 689C.320,
690B.100, 690B.110, 690B.120, 690B.130, 690B.140, 690B.150,
690B.155, 690B.160, 690B.170, 690B.175, 690B.180, 695A.195,
695B.316, 695C.203 and 695D.217 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 355. 1. This section and sections 1 to 327, inclusive,
and 329 to 354, inclusive, of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
2. Section 328 of this act becomes effective on January 1,
2026.
-
*AB74*

– 313 –
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
645.645 Additional grounds for disciplinary action:
Unprofessional and improper conduct relating to sale of
insurance for home protection.
679B.230 Examination of insurers.
679B.240 Examination of holding companies, subsidiaries,
agents, promoters, independent review organizations and
others.
679B.250 Conduct of examination; access to records;
corrections; penalty.
679B.260 Appraisal of asset.
679B.270 Report of examination: Filing; contents;
evidentiary effect in certain proceedings.
679B.280 Report of examination: Delivery of copy and
notice to examinee; right of examinee to review and respond to
report; entry of order by Commissioner; Commissioner
authorized to order insurer to cure violation.
679B.282 Report of examination: Hearing; filing for public
inspection; forwarding filed report to examinee; distribution
and presentation of report of examination of domestic insurer.
679B.285 Report of examination: Disclosure;
confidentiality.
679B.287 Limitations on actions and liability for
communicating or delivering information or data pursuant to
examination; Commissioner, representatives and examiners
entitled to attorney’s fees and costs in certain tort actions.
679B.290 Expense of examination; billing for examination;
regulations.
679B.300 Deposit of money; payment of certain expenses.
689A.413 Insurer prohibited from denying coverage solely
because claim involves act that constitutes domestic violence or
applicant or insured was victim of domestic violence.
689B.068 Insurer prohibited from denying coverage solely
because claim involves act that constitutes domestic violence or
applicant or insured was victim of domestic violence.
689C.196 Insurer prohibited from denying coverage solely
because claim involves act that constitutes domestic violence or
applicant or insured was victim of domestic violence.
689C.320 Required notification when carrier discontinues
transacting insurance in this State or particular geographic
-
*AB74*

– 314 –
service area of state; restrictions on carrier that discontinues
transacting insurance.
690B.100 Definitions.
690B.110 Applicability of other provisions.
690B.120 Exemption of person selling insurance from
licensing requirements as agent, broker or solicitor.
690B.130 Deposit of securities or surety bond; maintenance
of capital stock or surplus, premium reserves and losses and loss
expense reserves.
690B.140 Investments in tangible personal property:
Limitation; waiver.
690B.150 Filing of annual and quarterly statements.
690B.155 Provision requiring binding arbitration
authorized; procedures for arbitration.
690B.160 Contracts: Specifications; cancellation; renewal.
690B.170 Contracts: Regulations on content.
690B.175 Regulations regarding administrative expenses
for insurers and accounting standards.
690B.180 Prohibited acts.
695A.195 Society prohibited from denying coverage solely
because claim involves act that constitutes domestic violence or
applicant or insured was victim of domestic violence.
695B.316 Corporation prohibited from denying coverage
solely because claim involves act that constitutes domestic
violence or applicant or insured was victim of domestic violence.
695C.203 Health maintenance organization prohibited
from denying coverage solely because claim involves act that
constitutes domestic violence or applicant or insured was victim
of domestic violence.
695D.217 Organization for dental care prohibited from
denying coverage solely because claim involves act that
constitutes domestic violence or applicant or insured was victim
of domestic violence.
H
-
*AB74*